 PRIMERICA Corp., New York, raised its quarterly 14% to eight cents a share, from seven cents, payable Nov. 24 to stock of record Nov. 6.  The financial services company, which has about 98.8 million shares outstanding, noted its "continued confidence in the ongoing strength of the operations."  Compaq Computer Corp. said that its net income rose 51% in the third quarter, bolstered by unusual gains from its investment in a disk-drive maker and reflecting continued growth in its European operations.  The computer maker said net jumped to $87 million, or $2.02 a share, from $58 million, or $1.40 a share, a year earlier.  Sales increased 36% to $683 million from $502 million.  The latest quarter's results, however, included a pretax gain of $13.7 million, or 20 cents a share, in the carrying value of the company's investment in Conner Peripherals Inc. and a $7.6 million gain, or 11 cents a share, from the sale of one million Conner shares.  Net for the nine months was $254 million, or $5.94 a share, up 56% from $163 million, or $4.06 a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 50% to $2.1 billion from $1.4 billion.  Net for the year-earlier nine months also included a gain of $9.7 million, or 15 cents a share, in the carrying value of the Conner investment.  Michael Swavely, president of Compaq's North America division, attributed the company's third-quarter performance to continued increases in international sales, which accounted for 43% of the company's sales, a 74% increase from a year earlier.  "Over the next couple of years we would not be surprised to see Europe and international {sales} represent 50% of the company's revenues," he said.  During the third quarter, Compaq purchased a former Wang Laboratories manufacturing facility in Stirling, Scotland, which will be used for international service and repair operations.  Mr. Swavely said the new space will allow Compaq to increase the manufacturing capacity of its plant in Erskine, Scotland.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Compaq shares fell $1.625 to $108.625.  Wilson H. Taylor, president and chief executive officer of this insurance and financial services concern, was elected to the additional post of chairman.  Mr. Taylor, 45 years old, succeeds Robert D. Kilpatrick, 64, who is retiring, as reported earlier.  Mr. Kilpatrick will remain a director.  Diversified Investment Group Inc. said it agreed to be acquired by Star States Corp. for stock valued at $13.75 a share, or about $24.4 million.  Diversified, the holding company for Fidelity Federal Savings & Loan Association, said the agreement also gives Star States the option to acquire 588,300 of Diversified's 1,774,326 shares outstanding "under certain circumstances."  The acquisition would give Wilmington, Del.-based Star States access to the Pennsylvania market.  The agreement is subject to regulatory approval and resolution of lawsuits brought by certain Diversified holders in connection with the proposed merger.  Chandler Insurance Co. said it expects to report third-quarter net income jumped 97% to $2.8 million, or 51 cents a share.  In the year-earlier quarter, the automobile and trucking insurer had earnings of $1.4 million, or 48 cents a share on a restated basis, on revenue of $16.5 million.  In an interview, W. Brent LeGere, chairman and chief executive officer, said he expects revenue in the latest quarter to total about $28 million.  The earnings-per-share figures reflect a 25% stock dividend in June 1989.  Mr. LeGere attributed the earnings increase to growth in the company's longhaul trucking insurance lines and the ability to keep premium rates firm.  Calgon Carbon Corp. said it will build a $40 million plant for producing granular activated carbon.  The maker of water-treatment chemicals and equipment said it will select the plant site early next year, and production is expected to begin in 1991.  Call Jim Wright's office in downtown Fort Worth, Texas, these days and the receptionist still answers the phone, "Speaker Wright's office."  The former congressman, who resigned as speaker of the House after an investigation of his financial dealings, is ensconced in his district office, maintained by taxpayers on a $200,000 allowance.  He is negotiating a rich book contract to boot.  One of the hottest tickets on Washington's social calendar this fall was a charity benefit honoring former Congressman Tony Coelho, who landed a million-dollar job on Wall Street after resigning over a controversial junk-bond investment last summer.  Michael Deaver, the former White House aide, has become the most recent addition to the teeming ranks of fallen politicians and officials earning their way as lobbyists and consultants here.  Mr. Deaver has reopened a public-relations business.  Surviving scandal has become a rite of political passage at a time when a glut of scandal has blunted this town's sensibility.  Let the president demand strict new ethics rules: With four sitting House members accused of sexual misdeeds, amid the unfolding HUD scandal and after the Wright debacle, "people are slightly dulled by scandal," says political humorist Art Buchwald.  "It now takes something really weird to inspire public outrage."  Not all the scandal-tripped have enjoyed soft landings.  But many have.  "These people bounce back more resiliently than regular people," says Washington writer Suzanne Garment, who is working on a history of post-Watergate scandal.  Given their own penchant for book writing, it is surprising that none of the masters of scandal survival have yet published a guide to the art.  For there is an emerging protocol -- indeed, an etiquette -- to it.  Among the rules:  Pretend Nothing Happened  As if he were still in his old job, Mr. Wright, by resigning with his title instead of being forced from his job, by law enjoys a $120,000 annual office expense allowance, three paid staffers, up to $67,000 for stationery and telephones and continued use of the franking privilege.  Not to mention a generous federal pension.  There is also a busy schedule of speaking engagements at $10,000 a pop, at tony places including the Yale Political Union.  "He's as busy as he was as speaker," reports Mr. Wright's administrative aide, Larry Shannon.  Atone  On the edge of fashionable Georgetown, in a chic office with a river view and a number of corporate clients whom he won't name, Mr. Deaver is trying to reclaim his reputation as one of the savviest image makers in town.  There are few mementos of his days as White House deputy chief of staff and confidant of Ronald and Nancy Reagan.  The former $3 million-a-year lobbyist now frequents shelters for the homeless and devotes a third of his time counseling other recovering alcoholics.  "I feel better than I ever have in my life," he says.  Mr. Deaver confessed to his alcoholism during his trial on perjury charges.  He is also a recovering workaholic, relaxing with his family and creating topiary, or garden-shrub sculpture, a fashionable pursuit for which he developed a passion during his three-year legal ordeal.  One sign of Mr. Deaver's renaissance: an appearance on ABC's "Nightline" for a show on pack journalism.  Host Ted Koppel introduced him as "the media master of the Reagan Administration," with nary a mention of Mr. Deaver's conviction in 1987 on perjury charges.  Finding God  "When someone says, 'I've turned to God,' everybody lays off," observes Frank Mankiewicz, an old Washington hand and former aide to Robert Kennedy.  Thus have Charles Colson and Jeb Magruder launched successful post-Watergate careers at the pulpit.  But it doesn't always work so smoothly.  After allegations surfaced in a 1985 divorce contest that he had beaten his wife, SEC enforcement chief John Fedders retreated to a Trappist monastery in rural Virginia.  He is now in solo law practice in Washington, but his fees have been meager and he failed in efforts to win a chunk of his ex-wife's royalties on her tell-all book.  From time to time he returns to the monastery for prayer, meditation and pro bono legal work.  Mr. Fedders is philosophical about his travails.  "This whole experience has been an opportunity for internal growth," he says.  He sees a psychoanalyst five mornings a week.  "I've surrendered to the circumstances," Mr. Fedders says.  "The word surrender has a precise psychoanalytic meaning.  My universe has changed.  I'm enjoying my life and who I am today.  The aspect of being a mega-lawyer isn't as important."  Don't Linger  "The best thing you can do is get off the screen," says Mr. Buchwald.  Nobody proved that more masterfully than Mr. Coelho, the former Democratic majority whip.  Declaring that there was life after Congress, he resigned almost immediately after media reports questioned the propriety of a 1986 junk-bond investment, before any official investigations took hold.  Among the glitterati who turned out in bipartisan black-tie force to benefit the Coelho Epilepsy Fund last month were Sen. Robert Dole, Rep. Newt Gingrich, and other kingpins of Congress.  Dan Rather served as emcee.  From his new, million-dollar-a-year perch on Wall Street as a managing director of Wertheim Schroder & Co., Mr. Coelho reports that many of his former colleagues have contacted him to find out how they, too, can pursue investment banking careers.  It Helps to Be Male  Male scandal victims invariably fare better.  Anne Burford, the former EPA chief who resigned under fire in 1983 during a flap with Congress, was kayoed in the confrontation, even though she was never charged with official wrondgoing.  She worked part-time as a consultant and wrote a book, but never restarted her high-powered legal career.  It didn't help when, in 1986, she was charged (and then cleared) on allegations of public drunkenness.  "I cut my losses and ran," she says, from her new home in Colorado, where she is busy remodeling.  Mrs. Burford remains bitter over the overwhelming legal expenses involved in clearing her name.  "My husband was instantly impoverished by the very act of marrying me," she says.  Another former EPA official, Rita Lavelle, is still struggling after her conviction in 1983 on perjury charges.  "There's nothing she could do to bring herself back to where she was," says her lawyer, James Bierbower.  "You could say she survived, but it wasn't easy on her."  No book contracts have been dangled before Deborah Gore Dean, the reigning queen of the HUD scandal.  Donna Rice of Gary Hart fame failed to obtain a book contract and lost her modeling contract for "No Excuses" jeans.  Fawn Hall, Oliver North's former secretary, has yet to launch a hoped-for television news career, according to her lawyer.  Rita Jenrette, the former wife of Abscam-indicted Rep. John Jenrette, has yet to hit it big in Hollywood, although with roles in such movies as "Zombie Island Massacre" and "Aunt Ida's Bikini Shop," she is doing a lot better than her former husband.  He was back in jail over the summer on shoplifting charges.  Be the Star  Central figures -- such as Richard Nixon -- usually fare better than those with supporting roles.  Richard Secord, the retired Air Force general felled in the Iran-Contra scandal, is all but ruined -- forced to sell his Virginia home and pull his kids out of college, according to a recent fund-raising appeal sent out on his behalf.  Yet his co-defendant in the case -- also a former military officer by the name of Oliver North -- has been busily and profitably burnishing his involvement in the affair.  What accounts for the difference?  During the televised Iran-Contra hearings, Mr. North came off as a patriot from central casting.  Mr. Secord's performance was decidedly less inspiring.  Mr. North remains in heavy demand as a speaker, for fees reported in the $20,000 range.  Even in the wake of Hurricane Hugo 750 people turned out in a remote Virginia town in September for a "family tribute" to Mr. North given by two dozen conservative members of Congress.  If Sex Is Involved, All Bets Are Off  Sex scandals make people look careless and silly, and one of the worst sins in Washington is to be laughed at.  "You can be wicked, but not foolish," says Mr. Mankiewicz.  Nevertheless, Rep. Gerry Studds of Massachusetts was handily re-elected because of the candor with which he handled revelations that he had sex with a male congressional page in 1983.  Former Rep. Robert Bauman, a Maryland Republican who lost his seat in 1980 after he was caught soliciting sex from a 16-year-old boy, has never regained his professional footing as a lawyer.  Mr. Bauman, a conservative, says he was deserted by the right wing.  "Conservatives shoot their own," he says.  If the political establishment is reluctant to forgive sexual misadventures, the private sector sometimes will.  John Tower was accused of womanizing and boozing during his unsuccessful bid to win confirmation as secretary of defense earlier this year.  Now he is writing a book, serving on an elite foreign policy advisory board and consulting for an array of corporate clients, including British publishing mogul Robert Maxwell.  Become a Lobbyist  When all else fails, Gucci Gulch -- the fabled halls of the Capitol inhabited by lobbyists and their imported shoes -- offers a welcome environment for fallen officials.  Former Rep. Fernand St Germain, brought down by the savings-and-loan crisis, now represents -- you guessed it -- savings-and-loans associations.  Some become pseudo-lobbyists.  John Mack promptly quit his job last spring as an aide to Speaker Wright amid public outrage over Mr. Mack's violent attack on a young woman when he was 19 years old.  After a few weeks in seclusion, Mr. Mack opened a consulting firm, but not to enable him to directly lobby; that would require him to disclose his clients by registering as a lobbyist.  Still, Mr. Mack says he talks to "30 members of Congress a week."  Misery Loves Company  Other scandal survivors are sometimes the best source of solace.  Raymond Donovan, the New Jersey construction executive who was forced to resign as labor secretary and indicted in 1985, only to be acquitted of fraud charges, often calls other scandal-tossed public figures to offer a sympathetic ear.  Each time a new scandal hits, he says, "it pulls the scabs off your knees."  One of the first people to come to the Deaver home after his troubles erupted was former Nixon aide John Ehrlichman, whom Mr. Deaver scarcely knew.  "He reassured me that the hurricane would end," Mr. Deaver recalls.  Mr. Bauman received an encouraging letter from the recognized master of scandal survival, Richard Nixon.  Says Mr. Bauman: "If things get really tough, I can always auction it off at Sotheby's."  The Canadian government, with a view to becoming more politically active in Latin America, is expected to announce tomorrow its application to join the Organization of American States, a Washington-based regional agency.  The expected Canadian move has been welcomed by the Bush administration even though Canada has opposed such U.S. actions as the trade embargo against Cuba, the invasion of Grenada and the military support for Nicaragua's Contra guerrillas.  Latin American countries have long urged Canada to join the OAS in the hopes that it would be a counterweight to the U.S., which for many years tended to dominate the 32-nation organization.  Even though the U.S. also has supported Canadian membership, it hasn't been a Washington priority.  "The fact that we might not side with the Americans may be a reason why Canada's membership in the OAS hasn't been, over the years, an item high on the U.S. agenda," said Allan Gotlieb, former Canadian ambassador to the U.S.  The Canadian application is expected to be announced in San Jose, Costa Rica, by Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney, who is attending a centenary celebration of Costa Rican democracy.  "Canada has a larger and more beneficial role to play in the hemisphere," Mr. Mulroney said recently.  Some Canadian political commentators have opposed Canada's joining what they see as a U.S.-dominated organization.  "Canada could do plenty of things to get serious about Latin America without running the risk of getting caught in the cross fire" between the U.S. and Latin American members of the OAS, said Jeffrey Simpson, a columnist in Toronto's Globe & Mail newspaper.  Canada, at times, could be an awkward OAS partner for the U.S. if its United Nations voting record is an indication.  In U.N. General Assembly votes last year, Canada voted the same as the U.S. only 63% of the time.  France voted the same as the U.S. 76% of the time, West Germany 79% and Britain 83%.  Larry Birns, director of the Washington-based Council on Hemispheric Affairs, a liberal research group, said that Latin American countries would be "profoundly disappointed" if Canada were to follow the U.S. lead in the OAS. "Latin Americans see Canada as a non-interventionist power that respects their sovereignty," he said.  The OAS, which tries to promote peace and economic development within the Americas, is attempting to find a settlement of the current Panama political crisis.  Cuba has been suspended from OAS membership, but the organization's members are discussing Cuba's reinstatement.  Robert H. Knight's Oct. 5 editorial-page article bemoaning violence in comedy movies ("Hollywood, You Slay Me") is interesting, but somewhat off-base.  As a fan of older movies from the 1920s on, I do not find modern comedies contain violence, sex and foul language to any greater degree than other recent movies.  Older movies have plenty of violence, though it is portrayed in keeping with the more restrictive social conventions of the time.  For example, one of my favorite movies is the 1949 British comedy "Kind Hearts and Coronets," in which the entire comedy is based on actor Dennis Price's murdering eight titled relatives (all played by Alec Guinness) because they snubbed his mother and stand in the way of his acquiring the family title.  Similarly, one of the most popular comedy genres of the 1930s and '40s was the "murder mystery/ comedy."  The "Thin Man" series of movies, as well as many others, based their entire comedic appeal on the star detectives' witty quips and puns as other characters in the movies were murdered.  Further, I think Mr. Knight made a poor choice in picking "A Fish Called Wanda" as an example of the deplorable state of modern comedy movies.  The specific scene he mentions in which pet dogs are crushed is somewhat reminiscent of the continual plights that befall the coyote in the old Warner Bros.  "Road Runner" cartoons.  There is no slow-motion close-up, blood-and-guts portrayal of the animal's demise.  Keep in mind that this is the same movie in which a character is flattened by a steamroller only to pop right back up and peer in the window of a Boeing 747 -- from the outside -- as it takes off.  I will be the first to agree that there is much to be found wrong with modern movie making.  Many modern scriptwriters seem to be incapable of writing drama, or anything else, without foul-mouthed cursing.  Sex and violence are routinely included even when they are irrelevant to the script, and high-tech special effects are continually substituted for good plot and character development.  In short, we have a movie and television industry that is either incapable or petrified of making a movie unless it carries a PG-13 or R rating.  Hence copious amounts of gratuitous sex, violence and gutter language are included as a crutch.  However, these faults are not the exclusive property of modern comedies, and I believe Mr. Knight errs when he attempts to link this modern phenomenon too closely to a single category of movie making.  Michael Smith  St. Louis  Rochester Telephone Corp. said it agreed to buy Viroqua Telephone Co. of Viroqua, Wis.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Rochester will exchange shares of its common stock for all shares outstanding of Viroqua Telephone, a family-owned company.  Viroqua serves about 3,000 access lines in western Wisconsin.  The average unemployment rate in the 15 biggest industrialized democracies was steady in August at the 6.1% rate of the two previous months, the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD) said.  The August rate was 0.6 percentage point lower than in the like month a year earlier, reflecting the pickup of activity in the 15 countries.  The OECD said that most of the improvement occurred in the second half of last year; since February of this year, unemployment has been steady at around 6.2% of the labor force.  ALAMCO Inc. said its board has approved a 1-for-10 reverse stock split.  The Clarksburg, W.Va., producer of gas and oil, said it wants shareholders to approve the split because it would "enhance the marketability" and trading of the stock.  If approved at a shareholder meeting in December, the number of shares outstanding would decrease to five million from 50 million, and par value would rise to 10 cents from a penny.  Duriron Co. said it has agreed to buy Automax Inc., a Cincinnati maker of control accessories for industrial valves.  Terms weren't disclosed, but Duriron said the deal will be completed through an exchange of stock.  Closely held Automax has annual sales of about $10 million.  Duriron, a maker of pumps, valves and other controls, said the acquisition won't impact its 1989 profit.  Canadian manufacturers recorded a 0.8% decline in August in their backlog of unfilled orders, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The August drop was the fourth decline in five months.  Most of the August decrease was attributed to lower order backlogs in the primary metal and electric and electronics-product industries.  Manufacturers' shipments rose 0.3% in August following two months of declines.  Inventories fell 0.3% in August.  Burmah Oil PLC, a British independent oil company, said its West German subsidiary Castrol has a 49% share in Explonaft G.m.b.H., a new Polish lubricants company.  The remaining 51% of the joint venture will be controlled by Polish lubricants manufacturers, refiners and technical institutes.  Explonaft will develop application guidelines for lubricants, sell high-quality mineral oils, and offer services in industrial cleaning and related fields.  Burmah, which has a strong market position supplying marine lubricants and metal-working fluids in Poland, described the joint venture as "fairly small."  It didn't provide details of setup costs.  Du Pont Co. reported that third-quarter profit grew a robust 19% from a year ago on the strength of the company's operations in various chemicals and fibers, and in petroleum.  Du Pont also raised its quarterly dividend to $1.20 a share from $1.05, a change that will increase the annualized payout to shareholders by some $140 million.  Du Pont, unlike companies hurt badly by sharp price declines for basic chemicals and plastics, is benefiting from its broad range of businesses.  The profit gain was made despite a weakening in the housing market, for which the company is a supplier, and a strengthening in the dollar, which lowers the value of overseas earnings when they are translated into dollars.  The Wilmington, Del., company reported net of $547 million, or $2.36 a share, which was in line with Wall Street estimates.  In the year-earlier period, the company earned $461 million, or $1.91 a share.  Sales in the latest quarter were $8.59 billion, up 9.4% from $7.85 billion.  The dividend increase was Du Pont's second this year, an affirmation of statements by top executives that they intend to increase rewards to shareholders.  "We haven't benefited the shareholder as much as we need to," said Edgar Woolard Jr., Du Pont's chairman and chief executive officer, in an interview several months before he entered his current position in April.  The largest beneficiary will be Seagram Co., which owns about 23% of Du Pont.  A spokesman for Seagram, the Montreal wine and spirits concern controlled by the Bronfman family, said the company will post additional pretax profit of about $33 million a year because of the additional Du Pont dividends.  Du Pont also announced plans for a 3-for-1 stock split, although the initial higher dividend will be paid on pre-split shares.  Du Pont's stock rose $2.50 a share to close at $117.375 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  Seagram closed at $84.75, up 12.5 cents a share in Big Board trading.  Leading the gains for Du Pont in the latest quarter was its industrial products segment, where profit soared to $155 million from $99 million a year earlier.  The company benefited from continued strong demand and higher selling prices for titanium dioxide, a white pigment used in paints, paper and plastics.  James Fallon, a New Providence, N.J., marketing consultant to the chemicals industry, says Du Pont still holds an edge in making the pigment because the company was "first in with the technology" to lower costs.  He said Du Pont holds about 23% of the world-wide market, the largest single share, at a time when growing uses for the pigment have kept it in tight supply, although others are now adding low-cost production capacity.  Profit climbed to $98 million from $71 million in the petroleum segment, as Du Pont's Conoco Inc. oil company was helped by crude oil prices higher than a year ago and by higher natural gas prices and volume.  In the diversifed businesses segment, which includes herbicides, profit grew to $64 million from $27 million.  A spokesman said herbicide use in some areas of the U.S. was delayed earlier in the year by heavy rains, thus increasing sales in the third quarter.  In the fibers segment, profit rose to $180 million from $155 million, a gain Du Pont attributed to higher demand in the U.S. for most textile products.  Two segments posted lower earnings for the quarter.  Profit from coal fell to $41 million from $58 million, partly because of a miners' strike.  And profit from polymers dropped to $107 million from $122 million amid what Du Pont called lower demand and selling prices in certain packaging and industrial markets.  For the nine months, Du Pont earned $2 billion, or $8.46 a share, up 18% from $1.69 billion, or $7.03 a share, a year earlier.  Sales increased 10% to $26.54 billion from $24.05 billion.  The increased dividend will be paid Dec. 14 to holders of record Nov. 15.  The stock split, which is subject to holder approval, would be paid on a still unspecified date in January to holders of record Dec. 21.  American Medical International Inc. was dropped from the health care providers industry group of the Dow Jones Equity Market Index.  The company is being acquired.  U.S. Healthcare Inc. was added to the health care providers group.  Both moves are effective today.  The Canadian government plans to auction on Tuesday 750 million Canadian dollars (US$639.9 million) of 9.25% bonds due Dec. 1, 1999, the Finance Department said.  Proceeds of the issue will be used for general government purposes.  Finnish conglomerate Nokia Oy AB said it reached an agreement to buy Dutch cable company NKF Kabel B.V. for 420 million Finnish markka ($99.5 million).  Nokia said it will gain control over NKF Kabel by buying 51% of the shares in NKF Holding N.V., which owns NKF Kabel.  Western European leaders who favor speedy economic and monetary union are adding a new argument to their arsenal: the dizzying political changes under way in Eastern Europe.  French President Francois Mitterrand, European Community Commission President Jacques Delors, Spanish Prime Minister Felipe Gonzalez and others have begun linking the rapid changes in the East to the need to speed up changes in the West.  They are stressing that the best way for the West to help the East is to move faster towards Western European economic and monetary unity.  This would make the market-oriented system more attractive to Eastern countries, they argue, and allow greater economic aid and technological know-how to flow from West to East.  "The only response to the challenge being presented to us by the East," Mr. Mitterrand told the European Parliament in Strasbourg yesterday, "is to reinforce and accelerate the union and cohesion of the European Community."  Mr. Mitterrand proposed that a conference be convened next fall to write a new treaty for the EC allowing a European central bank, and that the treaty be ratified by 1992.  Mr. Mitterrand also proposed a separate "Bank for Europe" that would channel development money to the East.  One basis for linking change in the East and change in the West is the notion that integrating 110 million Eastern Europeans with 320 million Western Europeans is primarily the task of Europeans, despite the U.S.'s obvious strategic and economic interest.  Says a European strategist: "The U.S. tends to look at Eastern Europe {not including the Soviet Union} as Europe looks at Latin America: important but far away.  But for us in Western Europe, these are Europeans next door."  A reintegrated Europe implies big changes in 40-year-old military and economic policies.  There is likely to be a natural division of labor, says Francois Heisbourg, director of the International Institute for Strategic Studies in London, with the U.S. more engaged in strategic issues with the Soviet Union, and Western Europe more involved with specific aid measures for the East.  The designation at July's economic summit of major industrialized nations of the EC Commission as coordinator of Western aid to Poland and Hungary was a first step.  In part, this division is dictated by economics: West Germany is a net exporter of capital while the U.S. isn't.  While American aid efforts have been limited by budget problems, yesterday France announced a three-year, four billion French franc ($650 million) aid plan for Poland.  Despite sudden changes in the strategic equation, some Western European leaders, especially British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher, remain skeptical about European political and economic unity, and are unlikely to let East-West concerns change their minds.  But British analysts are beginning to link the issues.  "We need a Western Ostpolitik," says John Roper, of the Royal Institute of International Affairs in London, referring to West Germany's longstanding policy of a diplomatic opening to the East.  "For Poland and Hungary we need to think about a stick-and-carrot economic approach that would force them to price things realistically in return for removing all our tariff barriers."  He notes that the Marshall Plan of U.S. aid to Europe "didn't just throw money at post-war Europe, it also liberalized and opened up those markets."  The French analysis goes further.  "Most of the West's leaders have finally concluded that we all want perestroika {Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev's policy of economic restructuring} to succeed," says Hubert Vedrine, security adviser to Mr. Mitterrand.  "But they haven't yet drawn the operational policy conclusions."  He adds that with communism collapsing and Mr. Gorbachev scrambling to rejuvenate the Soviet economy, "Our interest lies in a controlled transformation, a contained nuclear reaction, so we need to help him, and not just with words."  Managing change, he adds, will require a lot more aid and a prominent role for the EC, especially in dealing with the question of German reunification.  Thierry de Montbrial, director of the French Institutue for International Relations in Paris, says it isn't clear what, exactly, West Germany wants.  Any push for a Gorbachev vision of a "common European home," implying the eventual dissolution of the EC, a Soviet-German partnership and the withdrawal of U.S. forces, "would be a very, very serious problem," he says.  He doubts a Bismarckian super state will emerge that would dominate Europe, but warns of "a risk of profound change in the heart of the European Community from a Germany that is too strong, even if democratic."  He adds: "We, and the rest of the EC have to talk to the Germans, now, frankly and raise these future risks with them."  While many commentators, particularly French ones, worry that hasty and emotional reaction to the changes in the East might lead to dangerous pressures for a denuclearized Europe or the speeded-up withdrawal of American troops, Mr. Roper in London sees a more positive scenario.  "There seems to be a message from Moscow there's a deal on offer," he says.  "They want reassurance we won't try to undermine or destroy the Warsaw Pact. . . .  In return, the U.K. and France could keep their nuclear weapons.  He adds: "Once both sides feel comfortable, it should be that much easier to make more progress toward the economic and social reforms that are now starting in the East."  Kyle Technology Corp. said a Seattle investor has signed a letter of intent to buy the company for about $3.1 million, or $1.20 a share.  The investor, Donald A. Wright, plans to run the company, said a spokesman for Kyle.  The transaction has been approved by Kyle's board, but requires the approval of the company's shareholders.  Kyle manufactures electronic components.  Dominion Textile Inc. holders adopted a shareholder-rights plan at the annual meeting.  The so-called poison pill took effect Aug. 9 pending ratification by holders.  Rights attached to the company's common shares were issued that are triggered if a hostile bidder acquires more than 20% of the shares outstanding.  Once triggered, the rights allow holders to buy additional shares at 50% of the then current market price or, at the board's discretion, to receive securities or assets.  Separately, Dominion Textile posted net income of 4.7 million Canadian dollars ($4 million), or 12 Canadian cents a share, for the fiscal-first quarter ended Sept. 30.  The company had a net loss of C$2.3 million, or 14 Canadian cents a share, a year ago.  Sales were C$348.2 million compared with C$307.2 a year earlier.  Computer Sciences Corp. said it received a U.S. Postal Service contract that will have a value of at least $33 million.  Computer Sciences will perform data processing work for the Postal Service under the three-year contract, which also includes two additional option years for which compensation hasn't yet been fixed.  Computer Sciences said its work will improve mail-processing efficiency.  For its fiscal year ended March 31, Computer Sciences had revenue of $1.3 billion.  Ohbayashi Corp. agreed to buy E.W. Howell Co., the U.S. subsidiary of Selmer-Sande AS, of Norway, for about $7 million.  Howell, a Port Washington, N.Y., construction concern, was established in 1891.  It has three U.S. branches.  Ohbayashi officials said the purchase was undertaken to participate in ventures in and around New York City.  They said Howell is particularly successful there because of its membership cooperation with local unions.  Ohbayashi is Japan's second largest construction company.  Until now, its inability to form membership ties with organized labor has kept it from penetrating the lucrative New York metropolitan area construction market.  The company also hopes the latest acquisition will help secure large construction orders from Japanese concerns with U.S. operations.  Ohbayashi cited industry publications crediting Howell, currently capitalized at $2.2 million, with receiving orders valued at $225 million in 1988.  The Japanese company received orders totaling 12.44 billion yen ($87.9 million) from its U.S. business activities during the fiscal year ended in March.  H. Marshall Schwarz was named chairman and chief executive officer of U.S. Trust Corp., a private-banking firm with assets under management of about $17 billion.  Mr. Schwarz, 52 years old, will succeed Daniel P. Davison Feb. 1, soon after Mr. Davison reaches the company's mandatory retirement age of 65.  Mr. Schwarz, who is president of U.S. Trust, will be succeeded in that post by Jeffrey S. Maurer, 42, who is executive vice president in charge of the company's asset-management group.  U.S. Trust, a 136-year-old institution that is one of the earliest high-net worth banks in the U.S., has faced intensifying competition from other firms that have established, and heavily promoted, private-banking businesses of their own.  As a result, U.S. Trust's earnings have been hurt.  But Mr. Schwarz welcomes the competition in U.S. Trust's flagship businesses, calling it "flattery."  Mr. Schwarz says the competition "broadens the base of opportunity for us."  Other firms "are dealing with the masses.  I don't believe they have the culture" to adequately service high-net-worth individuals, he adds.  U.S. Trust recently introduced certain mutual-fund products, which allow it to serve customers with minimum deposits of $250,000.  Previously, the company advertised at the $2 million level.  "We have always taken smaller accounts, but now we are looking for smaller accounts that will grow," Mr. Schwarz says.  "Our bread and butter is still the $2 million to $20 million account," he says.  The new services allow U.S. Trust to cater to the "new wealth," Mr. Schwarz says.  Quarterly net income this year has risen just over comparable periods in 1988, when year-end net was below the 1987 level.  In this year's third quarter, for example, net was $10.5 million, or $1.05 a share, compared with $10.3 million, or $1.02 a share, a year earlier.  Assets as of Sept. 30 fell to $2.46 billion from about $2.77 billion.  "We will have a reasonably flat year this year," Mr. Schwarz says.  Mr. Schwarz also said costs associated with U.S. Trust's planned move to midtown Manhattan from Wall Street will continue to be a drag on earnings through 1990.  Mr. Schwarz's great-grandfather founded the New York toy store F.A.O. Schwarz, but his family no longer has ties to the company.  Mr. Schwarz's father was a U.S. Trust trustee until 1974.  U.S. Trust also created a four-member office of the chairman, effective Feb. 1.  It will include Messrs.  Schwarz and Maurer.  Donald M. Roberts, 54, treasurer, and Frederick S. Wonham, 58, who takes responsibility for the funds-service group, were named vice chairmen and will serve in the office of the chairman.  Mr. Roberts continues as treasurer, and Mr. Wonham remains responsible for the offices of comptroller, planning, marketing and general services.  Frederick B. Taylor, 48, also was named a vice chairman and chief investment officer, a new post.  He previously held similar responsibilities.  Mr. Taylor also was named a director, increasing the board to 22, but is not part of the new office of the chairman.  James E. Bacon, 58, executive vice president, who has directed the funds-service group, will retire.  Sun Microsystems Inc., snapping back to profitability after its first quarterly loss as a public firm, said it earned $5.2 million, or seven cents a share, in the fiscal first quarter.  Sun, a maker of computer workstations, reported sales of $538.5 million for the quarter ended Sept. 29, up 39% from $388.5 million a year earlier.  In the 1988 period, the company earned $20.6 million, or 26 cents a share.  Sun's results were slightly better than expectations.  Earlier this month, the company said it expected to break even for the quarter on sales of $530 million.  In a statement, Scott McNealy, Sun's chief executive officer, said the company's performance was hampered by problems tied to the introduction of a major new family of computers in April.  One of those new computers, called Sparcstation 1, accounted for nearly half of the 28,000 systems Sun shipped in the quarter, he said.  More than two-thirds of the systems shipped, meanwhile, were products introduced in April.  But problems in manufacturing, forecasting demand and getting the bugs out of a new management information system made it extremely difficult for Sun to meet demand for its newest computers well into the summer.  These problems also resulted in Sun reporting a $20.3 million loss for its fourth quarter ended June 30.  Mr. McNealy said the issues that hurt Sun's performance earlier this year are now "largely" behind the firm, and he indicated that Sun's profitability should increase throughout the fiscal year.  Sun also reported a record backlog of orders.  While this indicates continued strong demand for the company's desk-top computers, Sun faces increasing competition from Digital Equipment Corp. and Hewlett-Packard Co. Recently, analysts have said Sun also is vulnerable to competition from International Business Machines Corp., which plans to introduce a group of workstations early next year, and Next Inc.  C.B. Rogers Jr. was named chief executive officer of this business information concern.  Mr. Rogers, 60 years old, succeeds J.V. White, 64, who will remain chairman and chairman of the executive committee.  Mr. Rogers, who was president and chief operating officer of Equifax, will retain his position as president.  The company said a new chief operating officer won't be appointed.  A merchant bank and investment fund have agreed to co-sponsor a reorganization plan to bring Sharon Steel Corp. out of Chapter 11 proceedings and to acquire the company's steel-related assets in a transaction valued at more than $300 million.  Castle Harlan Inc., a New York merchant bank, and Quantum Fund said they would acquire the assets for a combination of cash and the assumption of certain of Sharon's liabilities.  The balance of the company's assets and liabilities would be transferred to a new company that would be owned by Sharon's creditors.  Quantum said it has agreed to purchase as much as $50 million in equity in the new company, if necessary, for the confirmation of the plan.  Castle Harlan and Quantum said the plan is expected to be filed within 60 days with the U.S. Bankruptcy Court in Pittsburgh.  The agreement is subject to certain conditions, including obtaining financing.  Castle Harlan said that such financing is already being sought and that a formal proposal would be made to Sharon's Chapter 11 trustee and other Sharon creditors over the next few days.  Sharon, based in Farrell, Pa., filed for protection from creditors under the federal Bankruptcy Code in April 1987.  The company had been one of the maninstays of Miami Beach financier Victor Posner's empire.  Mr. Posner resigned as president and chief executive officer of Sharon in April 1988.  He remains chairman, but wields little power at the company.  Quantum Fund, based in New York, is a $2.1 billion investment fund managed by Soros Fund Management.  Quantum is Sharon's largest unsecured creditor.  The Castle Harlan group includes Walter Sieckman, former chief operating officer of Sharon, and Wolfgang Jansen, former executive vice president.  Executives at Sharon declined to comment on the proposal.  The company's trustee, F.E. Agnew, was unavailable for comment.  Two old friends, George Bush and Deng Xiaoping, are trying to limit further damage to U.S.-China ties.  But as Congress prepares a fresh package of sanctions against Beijing, the already-tense relationship could get worse.  The problem for Congress will be to weigh what China is saying to its people against the more conciliatory message it is delivering to the Bush administration.  In a move apparently aimed at heading off new punitive legislation, Mr. Deng sent an indirect signal to Washington via T.D. Lee, a Columbia University physicist who met Mr. Deng and other Chinese leaders in Beijing last month.  When he met with Mr. Bush on his return, Mr. Lee says, he told the president that the Chinese "made statements to me that I regard as a first step toward reconciliation."  The communication Mr. Lee brought represents the softer line the U.S. has been hoping to hear from Chinese officials since the June 4 massacre of pro-democracy demonstrators in Beijing.  The Chinese leader, Mr. Lee informed Mr. Bush, expressed some regret for what had happened in Beijing and conceded that China's officials bore some responsibility.  Mr. Lee says Mr. Deng told him: "We should not mind those who participated in demonstrations, signed anti-government materials and went on hunger strikes."  Mr. Deng added, says Mr. Lee, that "we really made mistakes.  We must not shirk our responsibility and we cannot just blame the demonstrators."  Mr. Lee also reported to the president that, in a separate meeting, Communist Party chief Jiang Zemin said the Chinese leadership "looked kindly on the students who took part in the demonstrations."  Mr. Jiang also pledged that the Chinese Red Cross would publish "very soon" a list of those killed.  And he told the physicist that China's leaders were "very much concerned" about the deaths and had arranged aid for the victims' families.  "I transmitted my conversations to the White House," Prof.  Lee says.  But, he adds, "I was not acting as a messenger."  He says that the Chinese never asked him to convey their statements to President Bush, but that the White House spontaneously invited him to do so.  Mr. Lee concedes the statements made to him are far different from others being issued in China, but attributes that to the fact that the situation in China is "very complex."  According to U.S. sources in Beijing, the administration hopes Mr. Deng's fairly conciliatory comments will prod Congress to be cautious about further sanctions against Beijing.  "The president doesn't want to have legislative sanctions," says a U.S. official.  "But he may not have a choice."  Given China's far-from-conciliatory statements to its own people, Mr. Bush may be unable to prevent new sanctions.  Beijing officials have said they will step up the campaign of arrests and intimidation against those who participated in the demonstrations.  Sentences have been stiff.  A university student got eight years for participating in the rallies, sources in Beijing said, while an 18-year-old worker got 10 years.  Nor has Beijing hinted to its citizens that it will publish the identities of those killed.  So far, the victims are officially considered evil-doers, and their families receive no compensation.  A man gunned down by a stray bullet while cycling to work carries, after his death, the official stigma of "counterrevolutionary," his wife says.  What's more, much of China's official rhetoric is hostile to the U.S. China frequently lambastes the U.S. Embassy for harboring astrophysicist Fang Lizhi, a political dissident who took refuge there after the massacre.  "In the U.S., there are still people who want to crush China and interfere in our internal affairs," Zhu Qizhen, China's new ambassador to the U.S., said as he left for Washington last week.  The House and Senate are to begin soon hashing out an agreement for sanctions legislation.  It will probably be attached to a State Department authorization bill, which Mr. Bush isn't expected to veto.  A congressional staffer involved in drafting the sanctions says they are likely to mirror those Mr. Bush enacted shortly after the massacre.  But as legislative action, they would carry greater weight and would be more difficult to rescind.  Measures already in effect that are expected to be made law include a ban on military sales and exchanges, a suspension of most high-level government contacts and a halt to U.S. trade enhancement programs, such as the Overseas Private Investment Corp. and the Trade Development Program.  Codifying those sanctions could prompt Chinese retaliation.  "If the two sides aren't careful, U.S.-China ties could spin downward, out of control," says a U.S. official in Beijing.  "Bush and Deng are hoping {that} cooler heads prevail."  The amount of blood surgical patients can donate and store before surgery can be increased by the new genetically engineered drug, EPO.  EPO, or erythropoietin, is a protein the human body makes to stimulate the growth of red blood cells.  A genetically engineered version of the human protein developed by Amgen Corp. of Thousand Oaks, Calif., recently has been marketed by the Ortho Pharmaceuticals division of Johnson & Johnson.  A competing version of EPO is being developed by Genetics Institute Inc. in Cambridge, Mass.  The drug is being used primarily to treat anemias.  A new experiment, reported in this week's New England Journal of Medicine, involved giving injections of Amgen's EPO to 23 patients who wanted to store units of their own blood.  The patients began receiving EPO injections about a month before their scheduled surgery.  They then began donating blood twice a week, receiving an EPO injection each time.  If tests indicated a low number of red cells, blood wasn't taken.  The EPO-treated patients donated an average of 5.4 units of blood each compared with only 4.1 units donated by a similar group of surgical patients who received a placebo injection.  The volume of red cells donated by the EPO-treated patients was 41% higher per donor, the research team representing a number of hospitals and blood banks reported.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  TAX SHELTERS CALLED Individual Retirement Accounts, or "IRAs," were created without fanfare on Sept. 2, 1974, but grew beyond expectations as an inducement to personal saving.  That Labor Day, in his first major act after succeeding the resigned Richard Nixon as president, Gerald R. Ford signed the Employee Retirement Income Security Act.  Pension reform was its main thrust.  Labor and business leaders, quoted at the White House Rose Garden rites, hailed its provisions for insuring corporate pension benefits.  IRAs were like stepchildren there.  The IRA's conception is murky.  In 1972, then Treasury Secretary George Shultz, with the key support of Sen. Carl Curtis, sought some form of pensions for the uncovered.  That year a four-man group headed by William Lieber in the Legislation and Regulations division of the Office of the Chief Counsel for the Internal Revenue Service, was assigned the task of designing a plan.  They used the 1962 Keogh Plan, a pension plan created by a New York congressman for the self-employed, as a partial model.  This team initially called its new model Personal Retirement Account, or "PRA."  But it didn't sing.  So they opted for IRA, naming it after Ira Cohen, a brilliant IRS actuary who helped them.  Ira, himself, confirms this account.  IRA rules have been changed over the years.  One in 1981 raised to $2,000 a year from $1,500 the amount a person could put, tax-deductible, into the tax-deferred accounts and widened coverage to people under employer retirement plans.  This caused an explosion of IRA promotions by brokers, banks, mutual funds and others.  But in 1986 Congress sharply reduced the number of people who could qualify for its benefits and IRA tax-deductions slowed their roaring growth.  IRA account assets have grown to about $400 billion from $393 billion last year and just $26 billion in 1981.  The Soviet State Bank announced a 90% devaluation of the ruble against the dollar for private transactions, in an apparent attempt to curb the nation's rapidly growing black market for hard currency.  The measure, which will take effect next Wednesday, will create a two-tier exchange rate.  Commercial transactions will continue to be based on the official rate of about 0.63 rubles to the dollar.  But for Soviet citizens who travel abroad for business or tourism, the rate will jump to 6.26 rubles to the dollar.  Tass news agency said the devaluation also will apply to foreigners' transactions.  But it didn't elaborate, and it remains unclear how far Western tourists and foreigners living in Moscow will be allowed to benefit from the sweeping rate cut.  The current ruble rate has long been out of line with the black market.  As Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev has opened up the country to foreign trade, the discrepancy has become ever greater.  Western tourists in the Soviet Union who could exchange a dollar -- albeit illegally -- for about four rubles a year ago are now being offered 15 rubles or more.  Even at such rates, black marketeers have been able to make big profits because of the dire shortage of consumer goods here.  They use dollars to buy Western items such as video recorders and personal computers and then sell them at a huge mark-up.  The going rate for a small personal computer that costs about $2,000 in the West is anywhere from 50,000 to 100,000 rubles.  Even a pack of 20 Western cigarettes can fetch 20 rubles or more.  With more than 300 billion rubles in savings accounts and little to spend them on, Soviet consumers grumble at the exorbitant black-market prices for such goods -- but they buy them anyway.  Moscow has already tacitly admitted that the ruble isn't worth much, announcing in August that it will pay Soviet farmers in hard currency for grain and other produce that they grow in excess of state-plan quotas.  "The absurdity of the official rate should seem obvious to everyone," the afternoon newspaper Izvestia wrote in a brief commentary on the devaluation.  The State Bank's move is part of a drive to iron out exchange-rate discrepancies as Moscow moves toward making the ruble convertible -- a goal that Soviet bankers and economists say is still far away.  Rumors of an impending devaluation have been circulating in Moscow for weeks, but the size of the cut took many Western bankers by surprise.  "It's much bigger than we expected," said one German banker, who asked not to be named.  The next step, which could have a larger effect on businesses, will come early next month, when the Bank for Foreign Economic Affairs is to hold its first auction of foreign currency.  Soviet companies needing Western currencies to buy equipment and supplies abroad will be able to submit bids.  Plans for the auction, which was supposed to take place last spring and become a regular event, have been thwarted by a lack of hard currency.  Soviet firms that hold some are unwilling to part with it, and joint ventures aren't yet allowed to participate.  The Kremlin also has been unwilling to provide hard currency for the auction, using a lot of it instead to finance emergency imports of consumer goods.  If foreign tourists and businesses could sell their currencies freely at the new, better exchange rate, that would enable the State Bank to increase its dollar reserves and would mop up some of the excess rubles in the economy at the same time.  But the amounts they exchange may be limited; most Soviet hotels, for example, demand payment in hard currency from Western visitors.  Unless other rules are changed, the devaluation could cause difficulties for the people it is primarily meant to help: Soviets who travel abroad.  Over the past three years, thousands of people here have made use of looser travel restrictions to get their first taste of life abroad.  But under current rules, they are allowed to change just 200 rubles into dollars and other currencies for each trip.  At the new rate, that would give them about $30 to travel on.  It isn't yet clear whether the 200-ruble limit will be lifted.  If it isn't, the black market for dollars probably will continue to thrive.  International Business Machines Corp. made news this summer when it landed an unusual contract to manage all of Eastman Kodak Co.'s data-processing needs.  But the computer giant appears to have lost a second key contract with Kodak to archrival Digital Equipment Corp.  Kodak yesterday confirmed that it has entered negotiations with Maynard, Mass.-based Digital to manage all of its voice and data communications needs.  Kodak, based in Rochester, N.Y., said IBM also had bid for the business.  IBM is based in Armonk, N.Y.  The loss is a setback to IBM, which pointed to the Kodak contract as an example of its success in systems integration.  That's an emerging business in which computer makers or consultants provide turnkey communications and computing services to major corporations.  A Kodak spokesman declined to disclose the potential value of the contract, which is still in negotiation.  He said that American Telephone & Telegraph, MCI Communications Corp., Rochester Telephone Corp. and IBM itself would likely be Digital's subcontractors on the project.  "When we decided to look outside the company for critical data-processing and communications services, we wanted to get the best vendor for that service," said Paul Allen, the spokesman.  "That's why we went with IBM for data center management . . . and now Digital for voice and data telecommunications."  This year is the 75th anniversary of the Federal Reserve System, and some members of Congress think it's time to take a fresh look at the nation's central bank.  After 75 years there may be a few things that are worth reexamining.  The regional Federal Reserve Bank setup, for instance, may be out of date.  In earlier years it may have seemed reasonable to give Richmond, Va., a bank and allow Los Angeles only a branch of the San Francisco bank, but times have changed.  Maybe the whole regional system is an anachronism; the Fed, after all, is a national central bank.  Some of the would-be reformers, however, want to restore an arrangement we once had -- or, at least, part of it.  In the beginning, the treasury secretary and the comptroller of the currency were both ex officio members of the Federal Reserve Board.  But in 1935, when Congress was trying to find someone or something to blame for the Great Depression, it decided to drop both the secretary and the comptroller from the board.  Carter Glass, a former treasury secretary who was then back in Congress, probably influenced the decision.  He said that when he was on the board he felt that he had a great deal of power and, somehow, he didn't think that was a good thing.  Times have changed.  Rep. Byron Dorgan (D., N.D.) has introduced a bill in Congress, co-sponsored by Rep. Lee Hamilton (D., Ind.), that would put the treasury secretary back on the board.  There is doubt that the change would accomplish much but at least Congress, as in 1935, would be doing something.  So far no one has suggested putting the comptroller back on the board.  Nicholas Brady, the incumbent treasury secretary, is of course aware of the proposal, and he doesn't like it much.  Mr. Dorgen has changed tactics, dropping the seat-for-the-secretary idea.  That may have pleased the secretary, but H. Erich Heinemann, chief economist of the investment firm of Ladenburg, Thalmann & Co., suggests that Mr. Brady may figure he already has all the power he needs.  Like most treasury secretaries, Mr. Brady takes a keen interest in monetary matters, of course.  He was, in fact, taking an especially keen interest in board matters even before he went to the treasury.  After the October 1987 market crash, Mr. Brady as a private citizen headed a presidential commission that tried to decide what went wrong and what should be done about it.  One of the commission's recommendations was that a single agency, probably the Federal Reserve, should coordinate regulation of all financial markets.  This recommendation might have encouraged a turf-hungry bureaucrat to try to expand his power, but so far Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan hasn't made a pitch for the job.  The Fed has plenty of responsibilities in times of market turmoil and in 1987 and again in 1989 it appears to have handled them well.  Mr. Brady has said he thought government agencies in the latest market drop were better prepared to coordinate their actions, but he has left no doubt that he still likes the ideas the commission advanced nearly two years ago.  In recent weeks, moreover, Mr. Brady has joined other administration officials in trying to urge the Fed toward lower interest rates.  The urging admittedly has been gentle.  In an interview with the Washington Post in early October, the secretary said the Fed may be slightly more interested in curbing inflation than the administration is, while the administration may put slightly more emphasis on spurring economic growth.  At least some economists, of course, would argue that inflation deserves a lot of emphasis.  Earlier this month the St. Louis Fed held a conference to assess the system's first 75 years.  Allan Meltzer, a Carnegie-Mellon University economist, noted that the Fed's record included the longest, most sustained, peacetime inflation in our history, dating from either 1966 or 1967 to 1989.  The inflation-growth argument is an old one, but Mr. Brady, on the board or off, is surely trying to influence Fed policy.  Equally importantly, the treasury secretary has spearheaded the administration effort to bring the U.S. dollar down by shopping avidly for West German marks and Japanese yen.  The treasury can do something on its own, but to have any hope of success it needs help from the Fed.  The central bank has been helping, but apparently not especially eagerly.  The Fed has been intervening in foreign currency markets, all right, but through August, at least, it appeared to be "sterilizing" the intervention.  In other words, it was offsetting purchases of marks and yen by buying dollars in the domestic money market.  Now, sterilized intervention may have some effect.  When traders see the Fed is in the exchange market it may make them tread a little carefully, for fear of what the central bank may do.  But it's generally accepted that sterilized intervention has little or no lasting impact on currency values.  After August the Fed may have stopped sterilizing, but it's hard to see much impact on the dollar.  The dollar is still highly volatile.  The Fed has let interest rates slip slightly, but whether the main reason was dollar intervention, the gloomy reports on manufacturing employment, or the Friday 13 market drop, only Mr. Greenspan and his associates know.  Earlier this year, Martin Feldstein, president of the National Bureau of Economic Research, argued forcefully that a government that wants steady, stable exchange rates might try some steady stable economic policies.  Trying to manage exchange rates to some desired level, he said, "would mean diverting monetary and fiscal policies from their customary roles and thereby risking excessive inflation and unemployment and inadequate capital formation."  The more we think about it, the more we suspect Mr. Brady does indeed have enough power where he already is.  This has been a week of stunning events behind what was once called the Iron Curtain and interesting shifts in official American policy toward Moscow.  It has also been a week when inside-the-beltway Washington has had a high old time gnawing over ex-President Reagan's multimillion-dollar junket in Japan.  The latter may seem oddly irrelevant, if not downright trivial, given the big picture and the way we have handled it in the nation's capital has done nothing to dispel that impression.  In fact, however, Mr. Reagan's casual debasement of the office he so recently held raises issues about which Americans can actually do something.  Our ability to influence the outcome of events in Eastern Europe and the Soviet Union is far more marginal.  Those events continue to move at a rate, and in a direction, which leave informed commentary -- let alone policy -- far in their wake.  Earlier this week, Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard A. Shevardnadze confessed that the U.S.S.R. ignored universal human values by invading Afghanistan and, to put it bluntly, "engaged in a violation of the ABM Treaty" by building its radar station at Krasnoyarsk.  Hungary is no longer a "Socialist Peoples" republic, the Communist Party no longer has automatic delegates in the U.S.S.R.'s Congress of Peoples Deputies and Egon Krenz was not backed unanimously by his fellow party functionaries when he took over as East Germany's new maximum leader.  All of that is just for starters, or so the hundreds of thousands of Eastern Europeans in the streets seem to hope and are certainly demanding.  Of like, though lesser, note, Secretary of State James Baker put the administration four-square behind perestroika and glasnost, and therefore behind Mikhail Gorbachev, in a pair of carefully reasoned speeches over the past week or so.  And, last but not least, President George Bush now views the changes in Eastern Europe as "absolutely extraordinary" and believes that Mr. Krenz "can't turn the clock back" in East Germany because the change is too inexorable," as he told the New York Times's R.W. Apple Jr. (In other words, after some highly visible dithering and public airing of differences, the administration has come down on the side of those who believe that what we are witnessing from Berlin to Siberia is a good thing to be welcomed, rather than a new thing to be feared or viewed with suspicion.)  All of this is what history will note, assuming that events don't make it seem a bad joke, when the record of this time is put down.  For journalists, however, who write what they fondly view as history's first draft, this has also been a week to give a lot of space and time to Ron and Nancy's sales appearance in Japan on behalf of a communications giant and its controversial founder.  It has been a well-paid transaction, this bartering away of the prestige of the republic's highest office.  The Japanese industrialist has coughed up at least $2 million, the Japanese government has put up just about as much, or so it is reported and at least one estimate puts the total tab at $7 million.  All of which has enabled those of us in Washington who enjoy wallowing in such things to go into high public dudgeon, as Mr. Apple and I did the other night on ABC's "Nightline."  Punching away, we raised what I still think were all the right issues and landed more than one hard blow, but at the end of the affair, there was just the tiniest nagging worry that we had been aiming at the wrong target.  As one of his defenders so aptly put it, President Reagan was simply doing what he had always done before his election (and some would say thereafter as well).  He was performing for pay, and why should anyone expect anything more?  Primarily because there's more to the matter than Ronald Reagan's personal values, or lack of them.  Selling the presidency for a mess of pottage is not so much a devaluation from the norm of public life today as it is a reflection of the disintegration of public standards.  The theme song for the 1980s has been, "Anything Goes," and it has been whistled with gusto from Wall Street to some of the highest peaks of televangelism.  There are those who say that this is nothing new, that America has always suffered from a bad case of schizophrenia when it comes to the dichotomy between what is professed and what is practiced.  There is evidence to support that view.  Eighty-three years ago, William James wrote to H.G. Wells: "The moral flabbiness born of the exclusive worship of the bitch goddess success . . . that, with the squalid cash interpretation put on the word success, is our national disease."  But if it was the national disease in 1906, it is today the national commonplace.  If there is no law against it, do it.  If the law leaves loopholes, use them.  If there is no moral prohibition that expressly forbids it, full speed ahead.  And if you are caught or if people complain, simply argue that "everyone does it" or "no one said I shouldn't " and brazen it out.  As a last recourse, when all else has failed and you are pinned, apologize for having disappointed those who trusted you but deny having actually done anything wrong. (See, for instance, Jim Bakker's remarks upon being sentenced to prison this Tuesday for defrauding the faithful.) Consider the troubling dissonance between Mr. Shevardnadze's speech of confession this week and the hang-tough defense of everyone concerned with the Iran-Contra affair.  The Soviet foreign minister publicly concedes that his government "violated norms of behavior" in Afghanistan and just plain lied about the radar station.  We have people in high place still lying through their teeth about Iran-Contra, and that apparently isn't going to change.  For that matter, those long ago identified as liars are still given respectful hearings in the press.  That is the key to the current "national disease."  No one seems willing to hold anyone in public life to a standard higher than the narrowest construction of the law.  The occasional media witch hunt about some politician's private peccadilloes notwithstanding, the general inclination is to offer a version of the old refrain, "Who am I to judge?"  Thus, no standards, no judgment and no values.  "You are mad because he's making so much money," say President Reagan's defenders.  No, we ought to be mad because he has demeaned the office we gave him, enlisting it in the service of private gain, just as we ought to be mad that public officials lie through their teeth, play disingenuous games about their activities or, to steal a phrase, make public service a private trough.  "I'm not going to be stampeded into overreacting to any of this, President Bush told Mr. Apple in this week's interview.  He was referring to the "absolutely extraordinary" events in Eastern Europe, and it is a defensible position.  But there is no defense at all for the ethos of the 1980s.  We didn't stampede into it, we slithered and slipped down the long slope, and now we have as its quintessential symbol a former president huckstering for a foreign poohbah.  Or perhaps that is a fitting symbol for the United States of 1989: Everything for sale; nothing of real value.  ---  Mr. Carter is a political commentator who heads a television production firm.  Cineplex Odeon Corp. directors said the company's chairman and chief executive, Garth Drabinsky, is considering bidding 780.6 million Canadian dollars (US$666 million) to acquire the company.  The board said Mr. Drabinsky and Vice Chairman Myron Gottlieb are negotiating financing before offering C$16.40 a share to acquire all of Cineplex's shares outstanding.  The directors added that the two executives haven't reached a final decision to proceed with a bid and that until an offer is made the board will continue seeking higher offers from other bidders.  The directors said if Messrs.  Drabinsky and Gottlieb mail an offer to shareholders by Nov. 22, it will reimburse them a maximum of C$8.5 million for expenses related to a bid.  "We consider that his bid is an acceptable bid," said Sandra Kolber, spokeswoman for the independent directors' committee appointed last May to solicit and review bids for the company in the wake of a dispute between Mr. Drabinsky and Cineplex's major shareholder, MCA Inc.  MCA and Cineplex's other major shareholder, Montreal-based financier Charles Bronfman and his associates, have agreed to tender their holdings to an offer by Mr. Drabinsky unless a higher offer is made by another bidder.  MCA holds half of Cineplex's equity and 33% of its voting rights through restricted voting shares, while Bronfman interests hold about 24% of the company's equity.  Ms. Kolber said the committee had received other bids.  She declined to identify other bidders but said Mr. Drabinsky's offer "is all cash, and it's for all of the company."  Several Cineplex analysts have speculated that outside bids received by the committee were either disappointingly low or for only part of the company.  "All this has really established is that MCA and the Bronfmans have agreed on a price at which they can be bought out," said Jeffery Logsdon, an analyst with Crowell, Weedon in Los Angeles.  "If a bid materializes at that price, shareholders will have every reason to be glad, but the question of financing still remains."  Last April, Mr. Drabinsky and a group of financial backers planned to acquire up to 30.2% of Cineplex for C$17.50 a share from Bronfman associates.  Mr. Drabinsky, who would have had the right to vote those shares for two years, said the purchase, subsequently rejected by regulators, was aimed at consolidating his control of the company.  MCA strongly opposed the Drabinsky group's move.  The directors didn't indicate the source of financing for Mr. Drabinsky's new proposal, but said MCA and the Bronfman associates agreed in principle to buy for $57 million and then lease back to Cineplex its 18-screen theater complex in Universal City, Calif., if Mr. Drabinsky succeeds in an offer.  "This is being done at the suggestion of {Mr.  Drabinsky} and to accommodate him, to facilitate his financing arrangements," Ms. Kolber said.  In addition, the directors said if a bid by Mr. Drabinsky is successful, Cineplex expects Rank Organisation PLC to acquire the 51% of Cineplex's Film House unit it doesn't own, and provide Mr. Drabinsky with additional loan financing.  Michael Gifford, Rank's chief executive, said the British theater chain's total involvement "wouldn't exceed $100 million" but declined to give a breakdown between the loan financing and the proposed Film House purchase.  Cineplex shareholders responded coolly to yesterday's announcement.  In trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Cineplex closed at $11, down 25 cents, with more than a million shares changing hands.  On the Toronto Stock Exchange, Cineplex closed at C$12.875, off 37.5 Canadian cents, well below the C$16.40 level.  "Where's the bid?" asked Pierre Panet-Raymond, an analyst and broker with Toronto securities dealer McDermid St. Lawrence Ltd. Mr. Panet-Raymond said he doesn't think Messrs.  Drabinsky and Gottlieb are "anywhere close" to arranging financing and that investors will need a solid offer before the stock begins to rise again.  Mr. Drabinsky couldn't be reached for comment.  Two West German chemical companies announced steps that apparently are designed to boost the chemical industry's standing among environmental groups and the general public.  Hoechst AG's Chairman Wolfgang Hilger said the company wants to have a substitute product to completely replace ozone-damaging chlorofluorocarbons by 1995.  In April, Hoechst, the largest producer of CFCs in West Germany, said it wanted to reduce production of the product by 50% by 1993.  Mr. Hilger said Hoechst will invest 50 million marks ($27.2 million) in a plant to make a substitute product it has developed that it says is unchlorinated.  The company hopes the new plant, likely to be built in Frankfurt, will be able to produce 10,000 tons a year.  This year, Hoechst will produce about 62,000 tons of CFCs in factories in Frankfurt, Spain and Brazil.  Of Hoechst's 40.9 billion marks in group sales in 1988, 200 million marks came from sales of CFCs.  Also, BASF AG, another large chemicals company, said it formed a separate division that will study the environmental impact of plastics and will investigate all possibilities of recycling plastics.  George L. Manzanec, 53 years old, senior vice president of Texas Eastern Corp., was elected a group vice president of this natural-gas-pipeline concern.  Mr. Manzanec, who succeeds retiring Richard C. Dixon, will be responsible for gas supply, regulatory affairs, and marketing and transportation and exchange for Panhandle Eastern Pipe Line Co., Trunkline Gas Co., Texas Eastern Transmission Corp. and Algonquin Gas Transmission Co.  All of the companies are units of Panhandle Eastern Corp., which acquired Texas Eastern Corp. earlier this year.  Adolph Coors Co. said its Coors Brewing Co. unit will test market a new line of bottled water in the West beginning early next year.  The move, which was expected, marks the first time since Prohibition that Coors has sold a non-alcoholic beverage, and marks the company's entry into a crowded, but fast-growing market that generated about $2.2 billion in sales last year.  Coors is hoping to become one of the first companies to distribute bottled water nationwide.  Perrier, sold by Perrier Group of America, a unit of Source Perrier S.A. of Paris, and Evian, sold by a U.S. unit BSN of France, are distributed to urban areas nationally, but are less available in rural communities.  Coors, with its large beer-distribution network, could penetrate more markets.  The company said the water will be called Coors Rocky Mountain Sparkling Water and will come from the same mountain spring as water used in Coors beer.  The company said it will sell the water plain and with lemon-lime and cherry flavors and will package it in 28-ounce bottles and 6.5 ounce bottles as part of six-packs.  The test markets, though not specified, will be in northern California, Arizona and Colorado, some of the hottest bottled-water markets.  Some of America's biggest trading partners gave a quick thumbs-down to a U.S. proposal to liberalize world trade and reduce farm-product subsidies.  In Geneva, where world trade talks are being held under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, or GATT, the European Community called the U.S. proposal "a step backward."  And Japan's minister of agriculture, forestry and fisheries told a committee of Japan's parliament that Washington's proposal was impractical and that Tokyo would continue to heavily subsidize its rice farmers.  The U.S., in a far-reaching plan submitted to the Geneva meeting Tuesday, proposed curbing price support subsidies within 10 years and eliminating export subsidies within five years.  U.S. officials said the plan was flexible, and was intended as a pragmatic approach for gradually removing trade-distorting subsidies.  But the EC reacted defiantly, arguing that the proposal's main aim is to destroy the Common Agricultural Policy, the EC's $28 billion-a-year price support program.  "The American proposal is not an adequate basis for negotiation," the EC said in a statement.  EC officials say they are irked that the U.S. has set a specific timetable and is insisting on the "elimination" of export subsides, not just reduction.  EC Agriculture Commissioner Ray MacSharry said the U.S. plan "calls into question" the agreement reached by world negotiators last April in Geneva seeking "substantial progressive reductions in agricultural support and protection."  U.S. Deputy Trade Representative Jules Katz replied that the proposal was entirely consistent with the April accord.  He said he was surprised by the EC's reaction, calling it "vehement, even frenetic."  The U.S. proposal also was criticized by food-importing developing countries, who said that the U.S. made no special allowances for poor nations.  While many experts argue that food-importing nations would eventually become self-sufficient in a free-market system, the poorest nations are likely to need help in the meantime.  Ambassador Katz said the U.S. was open to discussing particular problems of developing countries.  The U.S. administration said its plan would allow considerable flexibility in determining how and when the free-trade goals would be achieved.  The U.S. argues that its plan would ease the transition to freer agriculture trade by converting certain non-tariff barriers into tariffs that, together with existing tariffs, then would be phased out over 10 years.  But the EC is strongly opposed to converting agricultural supports into tariffs.  The new U.S. package also says countries could temporarily raise tariffs on certain products if they experience an unusually heavy volume of imports.  It would establish procedures to prevent countries from using health and sanitation rules to impede trade arbitrarily.  Seeking to allay European concerns, U.S. Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter said in Washington that the new U.S. plan wouldn't "put farmers out of business" but would encourage them to "grow what the markets desire instead of what the government wants."  The EC, with a population of 320 million, has 8.5 million farmers, while the U.S., with a population of about 245 million, has only two million farmers.  Japan's objections to the U.S. plan center around its desire to stay self-sufficient in rice, a staple food, even though foreign producers are far more efficient.  Bell Atlantic Corp. said it agreed definitively to acquire one of Control Data Corp.'s computer-maintenance businesses.  Terms of the accord weren't disclosed.  Control Data's third-party maintenance unit services products primarily made by Digital Equipment Corp. and International Business Machines Corp.  The unit has 6,000 customers and, according to one analyst, had 1988 revenue of about $85 million.  Under the agreement, which had been widely expected, Bell Atlantic would be buying Control Data's customer base and its approximately 100 U.S. maintenance facilities in about 33 cities.  However, Control Data would continue to provide maintenance services for customers of its Cyber product line.  The unit represents a small portion of Minneapolis-based Control Data's overall computer-servicing business, which last year posted sales of about $400 million.  Earlier this year, the company sold a similar unit in Europe for about $25 million.  Lawrence Perlman, Control Data's president and chief operating officer, said the maintenance business no longer fits into the company's "strategy to be a data solutions company."  Thomas Vassiliades, president of Bell Atlantic's customer services division, said the acquisition would give the company's Sorbus computer-maintenance unit added expertise in "the increasingly sophisticated workstation and high-end mainframe technologies."  Two recent decisions by federal courts cast judges in the odd role of telling authors how they should write history and biography.  These decisions deserve more attention than they have received from scholars, and from journalists as well.  Russell Miller's "Bare-Faced Messiah: The True Story of L. Ron Hubbard" is a biography of the founder of the Church of Scientology.  Mr. Hubbard, who died in 1986, bequeathed the copyrights on his writings to his church, which licensed them to New Era Publications, a Danish corporation.  In 1988 New Era sought a permanent injunction to restrain Henry Holt & Co. from publishing "Bare-Faced Messiah" on the ground that Mr. Miller's quotations from Mr. Hubbard infringed the copyrights.  The publisher argued in response that the "fair use" statute permits quotation "for purposes such as criticism, comment, news reporting, teaching, . . . scholarship, or research."  District Court Judge Pierre Leval denied the injunction on the ground that New Era had failed to make its claim within a reasonable time -- the doctrine lawyers call "laches."  As for the merits, Judge Leval said that Mr. Miller had written "a serious book of responsible historical criticism."  Verbatim quotation, the judge believed, was justified in order to prove points the author had asserted about Mr. Hubbard -- mendacity, bigotry, paranoia and other unlovely traits that could not be persuasively demonstrated without use of Mr. Hubbard's own words.  "The biographer/critic," Judge Leval wrote, "should not be required simply to express . . . conclusions without defending them by example."  In such circumstances, free-speech interests outweighed the interests of the copyright owner.  But Judge Leval felt constrained by an earlier decision of the Second Circuit Court forbidding a biographer of J.D. Salinger to quote from Mr. Salinger's personal letters.  He distinguished the two cases: In Salinger, Judge Leval noted, the quotations were for the purpose of enlivening the biography rather than of proving points about the subject.  Still the Salinger decision created a strong presumption against fair use of unpublished materials.  Judge Leval reluctantly concluded that a few of Mr. Miller's quotations from Mr. Hubbard's unpublished writings, because they were not necessary to prove historical points, failed the fair-use test and therefore infringed copyright.  But the proper remedy, Judge Leval said, lay in a suit for damages, not in an injunction.  The case went on appeal to the Second Circuit.  In a decision in April of this year, Judge Roger Miner, joined by Judge Frank Altimari, agreed on denying the injunction and did not doubt that "Bare-Faced Messiah" was a serious work but rejected Judge Leval's argument that the public interest in scholarship could outweigh the sanctity of copyright.  "We conclude," the two judges wrote, "that laches is the sole bar to the issuance of an injunction."  Had the suit been filed in time, they said, "Bare-Faced Messiah" would have been suppressed.  This was too much for James Oakes, the court's chief judge.  In a powerful separate opinion, Judge Oakes further distinguished the Salinger case by pointing out that a living person, like Mr. Salinger, had privacy rights that did not apply to a dead man, like Mr. Hubbard.  "I thought that Salinger might by being taken in another factual context come back to haunt us.  This case realizes that concern."  Decisions by the Second Circuit itself, Judge Oakes continued, had recognized that public interest in the subject matter and the indispensability in particular cases of verbatim quotations are vital components of fair use.  And the injunction Judges Miner and Altimari would so readily have granted had New Era sued in time?  Suppression of the book, Judge Oakes observed, would operate as a prior restraint and thus involve the First Amendment.  Moreover, and here Judge Oakes went to the heart of the question, "Responsible biographers and historians constantly use primary sources, letters, diaries, and memoranda.  Indeed, it would be irresponsible to ignore such sources of information."  Now, scholars in fulfilling their responsibility do not claim the right to invade every collection of papers that bears upon their topics of investigation.  And of course they agree that people can impose restrictions on the use of their papers, whether in their own possession or as donated or sold to libraries.  But in the "Bare-Faced Messiah" case the author found most of his material in court records or via the Freedom of Information Act.  And when responsible scholars gain legitimate access to unpublished materials, copyright should not be permitted to deny them use of quotations that help to establish historical points.  Judges Oakes and Leval understand the requirements of historical scholarship.  Judges Miner and Altimari do not appear to have a clue.  Yet at the moment they are the judges who are making the law.  As matters stand, the Salinger ruling, torn from context and broadly construed, is controlling.  If an author quotes "more than minimal amounts" of unpublished copyrighted materials, as the Salinger decision had it, "he deserves to be enjoined."  The courts have not defined "minimal amounts," but publishers, I understand, take it to mean about 50 words.  The "Bare-Faced Messiah" decision strikes a blow against the whole historical enterprise.  A second decision, handed down in August by the Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, is another blow against scholarship.  Janet Malcolm, a professional writer on psychiatric matters, wrote a series of articles for the New Yorker, later published in book form by Knopf under the title "In the Freud Archives."  The articles were largely based on interviews Ms. Malcolm had taped with Jeffrey Masson, a psychoanalyst who had served as projects director of the Freud Archives.  Mr. Masson then brought a libel suit against Ms. Malcolm, the New Yorker and Knopf.  As a public figure, Mr. Masson had to prove malice and, as proof of malice, Mr. Masson contended that defamatory quotations ascribed to him by Ms. Malcolm were in fact fabricated.  The quotes could not be found on the tapes, and the two judges who decided the case for Ms. Malcolm and her publishers conceded that, for the purpose of their decision, "we assume the quotations were deliberately altered."  For all historians and most journalists, this admission would have been sufficient to condemn the Malcolm articles.  But Judge Arthur Alarcon, joined by Judge Cynthia Holcomb Hall, took the astonishing position that it is perfectly OK to fabricate quotations so long as a judge finds that the fabrications do not alter substantive content or are rational interpretations of ambiguous remarks.  In his eloquent dissent, Judge Alex Kozinski observed that when a writer uses quotation marks in reporting what someone has said, the reader assumes that these are the speaker's precise words or at least his words purged of "uh" and "you know" and grammatical error.  While judges have an obligation under the First Amendment to safeguard freedom of the press, "the right to deliberately alter quotations is not, in my view, a concomitant of a free press."  Ms. Malcolm, for example, wrote that Mr. Masson described himself as "the greatest analyst who ever lived."  No such statement appears on the tapes.  The majority cited Mr. Masson's remark "It's me alone . . . against the rest of the analytic world" as warrant for the Malcolm fabrication.  But, as Judge Kozinski noted, the context shows that Mr. Masson's "me alone" remark referred not to his alleged pre-eminence in his profession but to the fact that his position on a particular issue was not shared by anyone else.  Ms. Malcolm had Mr. Masson describing himself as "an intellectual gigolo."  Again, no such statement appears on the tapes.  The majority decision contended that the phrase was a rational interpretation of Mr. Masson's description of himself as a "private asset but a public liability" to Anna Freud and that in any case it was not defamatory.  Judge Kozinski found the derivation entirely strained and writes that "for an academic to refer to himself as an intellectual gigolo is . . . a devastating admission of professional dishonesty."  These were only two of a series of fabrications that had, in Judge Kozinski's words, the cumulative effect of making Mr. Masson "appear more arrogant, less sensitive, shallower, more self-aggrandizing, and less in touch with reality than he appears from his own statements."  As Robert Coles wrote in a review of Ms. Malcolm's book, Mr. Masson emerges "as a grandiose egotist . . . and, in the end, a self-destructive fool.  But it is not Janet Malcolm who calls him such: his own words reveal this psychological profile."  We now know that the words were not always his own.  "There is one sacred rule of journalism," John Hersey has said.  "The writer must not invent."  Should the green light Judges Alarcon and Hall have given to the fabrication of quotations become standard practice, it will notably reduce the value of journalism for historians -- and for citizens.  As Judge Kozinski put it: "To invoke the right to deliberately distort what someone else has said is to assert the right to lie in print. . . .  Masson has lost his case, but the defendants, and the profession to which they belong, have lost far more."  The historical profession will survive these decisions.  Perhaps in time the Supreme Court will correct them.  But writing history is tough enough without judges gratuitously throwing obstacles in the scholar's path.  ---  Mr. Schlesinger is Albert Schweitzer professor of the humanities at the City University of New York and a winner of Pulitzer Prizes in history and biography.  Hale Milgrim, 41 years old, senior vice president, marketing at Elecktra Entertainment Inc., was named president of Capitol Records Inc., a unit of this entertainment concern.  Mr. Milgrim succeeds David Berman, who resigned last month.  Legal controversies in America have a way of assuming a symbolic significance far exceeding what is involved in the particular case.  They speak volumes about the state of our society at a given moment.  It has always been so.  In the 1920s, a young schoolteacher, John T. Scopes, volunteered to be a guinea pig in a test case sponsored by the American Civil Liberties Union to challenge a ban on the teaching of evolution imposed by the Tennessee Legislature.  The result was a world-famous trial exposing profound cultural conflicts in American life between the "smart set," whose spokesman was H.L. Mencken, and the religious fundamentalists, whom Mencken derided as benighted primitives.  Few now recall the actual outcome: Scopes was convicted and fined $100, and his conviction was reversed on appeal because the fine was excessive under Tennessee law.  So it was with the Hiss case a generation later, when Alger Hiss became a lightning rod for the anxieties of the Cold War and conflicting attitudes toward the New Deal he had served.  His trials aroused public passions out of all proportion to the rather banal secrets he allegedly had passed to Soviet intelligence.  And so it seems to be with the case of Elizabeth Morgan, the Washington, D.C., plastic surgeon jailed in a child custody case for refusing to reveal the whereabouts of her daughter.  Dr. Morgan has just emerged from the D.C. jail after more than two years' confinement for contempt of court, a heroine to her many supporters.  To the rest of us, the case is a puzzle.  It is what lawyers call "fact intensive."  It presents no great issue of legal principle, no overriding question of family law or the law of contempt.  Instead, it turns on the disputed and elusive facts of "who did what to whom."  It is difficult, if not impossible, for anyone who has not pored over the thousands of pages of court pleadings and transcripts to have a worthwhile opinion on the underlying merits of the controversy.  Certainly I do not.  So we must look elsewhere for an explanation of the unusual power this case has exerted over the minds of many, not just in Washington but elsewhere in the country and even the world.  I suggest that three themes have come together in the strange case of Dr. Morgan.  The first is that it represents an intense battle in what James Thurber used to caricature as "the war between the sexes."  But although Thurber did so gently and lightheartedly, many of Dr. Morgan's supporters have taken Thurber's memorable title "The Male Animal" quite literally.  The vehemence of the emotions aroused by the case testifies to its symbolic importance in the war that Thurber accepted as an eternal part of the human condition.  A second theme is the undercurrent of social class and race in the public reaction to the Morgan case.  Dr. Morgan is a highly educated white professional who attended some of the "best" schools.  As members of the Black Caucus in Congress asked during the debate on the legislation that freed Dr. Morgan, does anyone seriously believe that if she were an uneducated, black, working-class woman, Congress would have rushed to pass a private relief bill freeing her?  Or that the president would have hurried to sign the bill "out of compassion for her plight"?  To ask those questions is to answer them.  Finally, the case of Dr. Morgan gave Congress an opportunity to act with unaccustomed decisiveness and to engage in one of its favorite pastimes -- bashing the District of Columbia government.  The local government is discredited in the eyes of many residents for a variety of reasons, and congressmen read the same newspapers and watch the same TV newscasts as other people in the area do.  Bashing the D.C. government is risk-free for members of Congress, who do not have to answer to their own constituents for it.  Congress is paralyzed from acting on such great issues of the day as the federal budget deficit.  Yet a bill tailored to the interests of a single individual passed Congress with almost unimaginable speed, before the judicial process had run its course, and, indeed, while the Morgan case was awaiting a ruling by the appellate court.  The Morgan case thus tells us much more about the current state of sex, class, race and politics in our society than it does about the facts of Dr. Morgan's particular situation.  It may stand as a metaphor for how wide and deep the divisions in that society continue to be however we try to deny their existence.  ---  Mr. Rezneck is a lawyer in Washington, D.C.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration said it awarded General Dynamics Corp. a $64 million contract to launch the Combined Release and Radiation Effects Satellite in June 1990.  CRRES is a joint NASA-Air Force satellite to study the effects of space radiation on micro-electronic components.  NASA said General Dynamics will launch CRRES using an Atlas 1 rocket.  Ronald J. Taylor, 48, was named chairman of this insurance firm's reinsurance brokerage group and its major unit, G.L. Hodson & Son Inc. Robert G. Hodson, 65, retired as chairman but will remain a consultant.  Stephen A. Crane, 44, senior vice president and chief financial and planning officer of the parent, was named president and chief executive of the brokerage group and the unit, succeeding Mr. Taylor.  The appointments are effective Nov. 1.  Corroon said it will announce a successor to Mr. Crane at a later date.  An investment company said it offered to acquire Arby's Inc., the fast-food operator, for $205 million.  The proposal, however, was immediately rebuffed by Arby's parent, DWG Corp. "Arby's isn't for sale," said Renee Mottram, senior vice president at DWG.  The new suitor, Stevric Equity Ventures Inc., of Mineola, N.Y., characterized its proposal as the "first truly independent offer which does not pit one interest group against another within the Arby's franchisee community."  In September, DWG, a Miami Beach, Fla., holding company controlled by financeer Victor Posner, rejected an offer from a group of Arby's franchisees to acquire Arby's for $200 million.  Since then, a second group of franchisees has banded together to try to wrestle control of the unit from Mr. Posner.  Arby's is the marketing, franchising and service company for the 2,100 restaurants in the chain.  Stevric's principals, Richard and Steven Buckley, said they led the acquisition group that acquired the Nathan's Famous Inc. restaurant chain and subsequently served as the top officers of the company.  Richard Buckley said Stevric's acquisition of Arby's "would allow seasoned franchisers and food-service operators, with no conflicts of interest, to stabilize franchisee relations and properly refocus the company's energies toward growth."  General Motors Corp.'s big defense and automotive electronics unit, GM Hughes Electronics, said net income fell 22% in the third quarter, reflecting declining military spending and slumping GM vehicle production.  Meanwhile, net at GM's finance arm, General Motors Acceptance Corp., fell 3.1%.  By contrast, Electronic Data Systems Corp., GM's data processing subsidiary, boosted net 16%.  GM closed down $1.875 at $44.875 in New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday.  Earnings for GM common stock, reflecting the performance of GM's core automotive operations, will be disclosed this morning.  GM Class H, which represents a dividend interest in Hughes earnings, closed at $29, up 25 cents in Big Board composite trading.  GM Class E, which represents a dividend interest in EDS profit, fell 75 cents to $52.25 on the Big Board.  The earnings drop at GM Hughes Electronics is a sign of tough times at both the defense operations of Hughes Aircraft Co. and GM's North American automotive operations, which are a primary customer for the Delco Electronics Corp. side of the GM Hughes unit.  Profit at the unit fell to $110.6 million, or 37 cents a share, from $142.4 million, or 45 cents a share, largely because of a $24 million one-time charge associated with Hughes's previously announced plan to reduce employment by at least 6,000 people by year end.  Even excluding the charge, however, net fell 5%.  In addition, GM's North American vehicle production fell 8.4% from a year ago, which hurt Delco Electronic's earnings, a company spokesman said.  That decline was reflected in revenue for the GM Hughes unit, which edged down to $2.58 billion from $2.63 billion.  In the nine months, GM Hughes net fell 6.6% to $486.6 million, or $1.48 a share, from $521 million, or $1.58 a share.  Revenue rose 3.5% to $8.47 billion from $8.18 billion.  At GMAC, net dropped 3.1% to $234.5 million from $241.9 million.  The finance unit attributed the decline to higher borrowing costs compared with a year earlier.  GMAC said its automotive financing and leasing business rose 35% in the U.S., largely because of dealer and customer incentives used to boost sales.  GMAC profits are combined with earnings from the rest of GM's operations and attributed to the company's traditional common stock.  In the first nine months, GMAC's earnings fell 8% to $859.5 million from $930.2 million.  At EDS, third-quarter profit jumped 16% to a record $110.9 million, or 93 cents a share, from $95.9 million, or 79 cents a share.  Revenue rose 12% to $1.37 billion from $1.22 billion.  In the nine months, EDS earned $315.8 million, or $2.62 a share, up 13% from $280.7 million, or $2.30 a share.  Revenue rose 14% to $4.03 billion from $3.54 billion.  Revenue from non-GM accounts was 45% of EDS's total business in the latest nine months, compared with 40% a year earlier.  The company has said it wants to boost non-GM revenue to at least 50% of its total business by the end of 1990.  William C. Ballard Jr., 48 years old, was elected a director of this distilled beverages concern, expanding the board to 11 members.  Alvin W. Trivelpiece, director of Oak Ridge National Laboratory, Oak Ridge, Tenn., was elected a director of this optical-products concern.  Mr. Trivelpiece, 58 years old, succeeds William Bolger, who died in August.  In the bidding war for Public Service Co. of New Hampshire, United Illuminating Co. raised its proposed offer to one it valued at $2.29 billion from $2.19 billion, apparently topping all other bidders.  The bids remain subject to evaluation by the federal bankruptcy court supervising PS of New Hampshire's reorganization.  They are also indirectly subject to approval by the state of New Hampshire, where residents fear soaring rates to pay for the cost of reorganization.  Each of the four parties bidding for PS of New Hampshire proposes a complex financial package to satisfy creditors and shareholders and also proposes a formula to limit rate increases to satisfy the state.  The new round of bidding would seem to complicate the decision making for Judge James Yacos, the bankruptcy judge overseeing the case, because the company's stockholders, unsecured creditors and regulators each are currently backing different plans.  In addition, some of the proposals are so close, that non-financial issues such as timing may play a more important role.  The unsecured creditors agreed in principle to support New Haven, Conn.-based United Illuminating's new bid.  They previously had backed an internal reorganization plan proposed by PS of New Hampshire.  All of the bidders contemplate full payment including interest to secured creditors.  United Illuminating's plan, however, offers more for unsecured creditors.  Geoffrey Kalmus, counsel to the official creditors committee, said that under the United Illuminating plan, unsecured creditors would be paid in full credits and interest of about $855 million, accrued before PS of New Hampshire's Jan. 1988 filing for bankruptcy court protection.  In addition, they would receive some $200 million in payments for interest since then.  Mr. Kalmus said that by next July they would have accrued unpaid interest equal to $350 million.  Other plans generally wouldn't pay unsecured creditors' interest accrued since the filing.  Under United Illuminating's plan, a new holding company would be formed to own the two companies.  It would be 72%-owned by United Illuminating holders and 28%-owned by current holders of PS of New Hampshire preferred and common stock.  PS of New Hampshire preferred holders also would get certain debentures and preferred stock.  United Illuminating said the preferred holders total package would equal about 60% of their claims.  Common shareholders would end up owning about 6.4% of the combined company.  As previously reported, Northeast Utilities, Hartford, Conn., Monday filed a bid it valued at $2.25 billion.  That offer was endorsed by the shareholders committee.  The other bidders, New England Electric System, Westboro, Mass., and PS of New Hampshire, didn't change the value of their bids, although PS of New Hampshire changed its rate proposal.  New England Electric values its offer at $2 billion and PS of New Hampshire values its reorganization plan at $2.2 billion.  The bankruptcy judge has ruled that federal bankruptcy laws could be used to circumvent state regulation.  However, creditors and bidders alike concede that the state plays a major role because it could significantly delay final settlement of a plan it didn't like.  The state has endorsed the New England Electric plan, which promises to limit rate increases to 4.8% annually for seven years.  Northeast Utilities' plan proposes 5.5% annual increases.  PS of New Hampshire amended its plan to call for two years of 5.5% rate increases followed by five years of 4.5% increases.  Fuel cost adjustments could change the effective rate increases, however.  Previously it had proposed seven years of 5.5% increases.  United Illuminating also amended its rate plan.  The new offer assumes just five years of 5.5% rate increases, to be followed by state-approved increases under the usual hearing procedure.  Previously United Illuminating had also called for seven years of 5.5% increases.  The bids and rate proposals generally assume the Seabrook nuclear power plant, which is completed, will go into operation.  Most of the plans have reduced bids in case the plant fails to get a license from the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.  In New York Stock Exchange trading, PS of New Hampshire's 17 1/2 debenture due 2004 closed yesterday at $82.50, up $2.  The utility's stock closed at $4 a share, up 37.5 cents, in composite trading on the Big Board.  In a separate development, PS of New Hampshire gave 60 managers severance agreements that would pay one to three years' salary if their jobs were changed or they were dismissed in the wake of a takeover.  It said the maximum cost of the plan would be $9.7 million.  C. Hyde Tucker will become president and chief executive officer of Bell Atlantic International Inc., a unit of this telecommunications concern, effective Jan. 1.  Mr. Tucker, 56 years old, is currently vice president and chief operating officer of Bell Atlantic's C&P Telephone unit.  Mr. Tucker will succeed Salvatore J. Barbera, 64, who will hold the newly created position of chairman of the international unit until his retirement April 1.  Richard Breeden hadn't noticed that his new desk had just four telephone lines and one phone.  It was, after all, only his second full day as chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission.  But the lack of lines became painfully apparent.  As the stock market lurched into a 190-point free fall on Oct. 13, Mr. Breeden found himself scurrying around the sixth floor of the SEC -- from his desk, where the New York Stock Exchange was on an open line, to his assistant's office, where the Commodity Futures Trading Commission was connected, to a third room, where a computer monitored market moves.  With other anxious calls pouring in, he recalls, "I'd either have to disconnect the New York Stock Exchange or go out to the secretary's desk."  It won't happen again.  Now there are more lines connected to the chairman's office, and the market-monitoring computer has been moved next to his desk.  It's all part of a new "command center."  The changes in the office layout illustrate Mr. Breeden's stance as the nation's top securities regulator.  Like his predecessor, David Ruder, he was faced with a crisis in the stock markets soon after coming into office.  But unlike Mr. Ruder, who during the 1987 crash damaged himself by saying rather offhandedly that the markets might be closed, Mr. Breeden is turning the market drop to his own advantage, using it to further his agenda for the SEC.  In an interview and in congressional testimony, he repeatedly points to the recent 190-point plunge in the Dow Jones Industrial Average -- the second-largest ever -- as evidence of the need for Congress to give the SEC the ability to better monitor leveraged buy-out loan activity by brokerage firms and to track big trades in the market.  A veteran of another financial crisis, the savings-and-loan bailout, Mr. Breeden wants to have the SEC regulate securities issued by banks and S&Ls.  More broadly, he wants to "modernize" regulation by eliminating barriers between commercial and investment banking and by helping U.S. financial firms compete in the global market.  He believes the tax code encourages the use of debt instead of stock and may fuel leveraged buy-outs, an area the SEC doesn't regulate directly but one where it wields influence both on Wall Street and in Congress.  Also unlike Mr. Ruder, Mr. Breeden appears to be in a position to get somewhere with his agenda.  As a former White House aide who worked closely with Congress, he is savvy in the ways of Washington.  What's more, the coming months likely will offer him the opportunity to obtain his own majority on the five-member commission, enabling him to avoid the dissension that frustrated his predecessor.  But Mr. Breeden, a 39-year-old securities lawyer, has skirted some of the heftier issues facing the financial markets.  For instance, he hasn't stated a clear position on high-risk, high-yield junk bonds, an area of growing concern as turmoil in the junk market spills over into stocks.  He may be waiting to see the results of several pending SEC studies of junk market liquidity and disclosure rules.  He also has kept a close wrap on the names of people under consideration for the crucial post of enforcement director at the commission, a job vacant since the summer.  Mr. Breeden's selection will be scrutinized as an important signal about the strength of his commitment to continuing the SEC's high-profile pursuit of insider trading and market manipulation on Wall Street.  Congress seems likely to let the new chairman have his way for a while.  Members of the Senate Banking Committee know Mr. Breeden from working on the thrift-bailout bill, and the relationship generally remains warm.  Indeed, during Mr. Breeden's confirmation hearing last month, senators asked him to introduce his children three separate times -- more often than they asked about his qualifications for the job.  These days, Mr. Breeden is winning praise in Washington and on Wall Street for his behind-the-scenes role in monitoring the Friday-the-13th market plunge and the following Monday's harrowing morning session.  As a regulator charged with restoring investor confidence, Mr. Breeden avoided making market-jarring comments and worked to gather information critical to Wall Street and to other government agencies.  Not everyone has jumped on the Breeden bandwagon, however.  Some in Washington contend that it's too soon to tell whether Mr. Breeden will help or hinder the SEC.  "I don't think this was a real test," says one congressional aide.  "It was a fairly stressful weekend, but my sense is if you hadn't had Richard Breeden there, it wouldn't have made much of a difference."  For some at the SEC, an agency that covets its independence, Mr. Breeden may be too much of a Washington insider.  They note that he has adorned his office with five photos of George Bush, one of them featuring the First Dog, Millie.  They worry that Mr. Breeden also will roll over when told to do so by the White House.  But Mr. Breeden already has shown an eagerness to run the SEC his way.  During the Monday market rebound, a New York exchange spokesman told Cable News Network viewers that the industrial average had turned down 70 points.  Stunned, Mr. Breeden turned to his market-monitoring computer, which by then was next to his desk.  It showed the DJIA up 30 points.  SEC staffers soon determined that a widely watched stock-market service, Quotron, had miscalculated the industrial average.  Mr. Breeden instructed SEC staffers to inform the network that it was airing the wrong number.  "It was the plunge that didn't happen," he says.  Mr. Breeden also is trying to use a far more catastrophic event -- the California earthquake -- to move another rule change past Congress.  That disaster closed the Pacific Stock Exchange's stock options-trading operation, forcing those options to be switched to other exchanges temporarily.  Though obscure to most investors, the question of whether to list options on more than one exchange has aroused much interest in Congress, mainly because regional exchanges fear the change could bankrupt them.  Congressmen raised the issue yesterday at a hearing.  Mr. Breeden, not missing a chance to press his agenda, cited the earthquake.  That event, he contended, simply shows the "vulnerability" of having listings on only one exchange.  In a corner of the cavernous, new Nippon Convention Center sits Mazda Motor Corp.'s advanced-technology display.  The highlight: a "fragrance control system."  With the touch of a button, drivers can choose from lavender, jasmine, mint or perfume scents, all blown in through the car's air-conditioning system.  The soft, wafting aromas will "improve ride comfort," the display attests, and a proud employee says Mazda hopes to move the system out of the lab and into its cars in a year or two.  Welcome to the 28th Tokyo Motor Show.  Here you can find Mitsubishi Motors Corp. displaying a "live fish transporter," a truck akin to an aquarium on wheels, and Nissan Motor Co. with its "keyless" Boga, whose doors unlock upon recognizing the owner's fingerprints.  Suzuki Motor Co.'s Escudome sport vehicle features a pop-out rear tent and invites drivers to go "back to the nature."  But this biennial event, the world's largest display of cars and trucks, has its serious side, including the first major exhibitions of future engines and vehicle-suspension systems.  It's also the prime showcase for a country whose world dominance in the industry is increasingly acknowledged, and therein lies the draw.  Even the biggest auto shows in the U.S. are largely regional affairs, but the Tokyo show is international.  Virtually every automotive analyst in New York showed up.  Detroit-to-Tokyo flights were booked solid this week as Motor City executives, including Ford Motor Co. Chairman Donald E. Petersen and Chrysler Corp. Vice Chairman Gerald Greenwald, flocked to see the future.  Even the Soviet Union came, for the first time in 24 years, to show off its Lada Niva sedan and its futuristic dark-blue "Kompakt" model.  Here's a firsthand look at what the Japanese hosts sported, and what the foreign visitors saw.  New Technology  The hottest displays were items that insulate passengers from bumps, potholes and other rigors of the road.  These "active suspension systems" electronically sense road conditions and adjust a car's ride.  Existing suspension systems try to absorb bounces, but active suspension provides power to counter the jolts.  Nissan, in a 34-page tract, modestly compares its "hydraulic active suspension" to a cheetah, and equates the various parts to the animal's heart, brain, nerves and blood vessels.  Toyota Motor Corp. grandly touted its system in a car that splits in half to reveal the suspension's inner workings.  Nissan says it will introduce its first system next month on the Infiniti Q45 luxury sedan, and Toyota's Celica coupe will go on sale with the suspension device next spring.  But drivers in the U.S. must wait: The Japanese, for now, are keeping active suspension for domestic use only.  And Detroit's Big Three auto makers say their systems are still under development.  In the engine department, several companies displayed experimental models that within a decade could provide power equal to today's engines and yet take up only half the space, allowing for shorter hoods.  In the so-called two-stroke engines, which are expected to get sharply higher gas mileage, each piston goes up and down only once to provide power.  By contrast, the pistons in conventional four-stroke engines must move up and down twice in each power cycle.  The two-stroke engine displays by Toyota and Fuji Heavy Industries, the maker of Subaru cars, drew plenty of interest from U.S. auto executives, who are rushing to develop two-stroke engines.  Honda Motor Co. shows a more conventional five-cylinder engine in the new Accord Inspire model, which made its debut just this month -- in Japan only.  Honda says the five-cylinder engine provides a compromise between the fuel-economy of a four-cylinder, and the power of a V-6.  It is rumored to be bound for a new model in the luxury Acura line in the U.S., but Honda officials wouldn't comment.  Odd Cars, Funny Names  There's plenty of whimsy here, but it isn't always clear whether it's intentional.  The show's symbol is a woman riding on a snail, not your usual metaphor for speed and agility.  But the sponsors have an explanation: "Through the character associated with a snail," they say, "important values such as harmony with nature and aspirations for the future are sought."  Japanese auto makers are known for coming up with funny names, but this year the practice seems to have reached a new high -- or low.  Honda has a tiny motorcycle called the Monkey, and a slightly larger cousin, the Gorilla.  Mitsubishi has a futuristic delivery truck called the Guppy.  Mazda has the Bongo truck and, under its Autozam nameplate, a "microvan" called the Scrum.  Its buglike Carol minicar is "designed with softness, gentleness and warmheartedness."  But the court jester appears to be Japan's smallest car maker, Daihatsu Motor Co.  One of its futuristic concepts is the bubblelike Sneaker, which seats just one person in front and could hold a small child and bag of groceries in the rear.  Daihatsu also has the Fellow 90, the Leeza Spider and the Hijet Dumbo.  The jokes aren't just on the Japanese, though.  Regie Nationale des Usines Renault, the French auto maker, has a concept car called the Megane.  The name is supposed to connote feminine grandeur, but in Japanese it means "eyeglasses."  Foreign Presence  Foreign auto makers are taking the Tokyo Motor Show more seriously than ever.  AB Volvo invites passers-by to play "the role of the test dummy" by hopping in a car that simulates a crash to show just how its seat-belt tightener works.  Hyundai Motor Co. of South Korea has its first-ever exhibit in Tokyo.  General Motors Corp. is sponsoring its first independent display in 10 years, and it includes a boxy Buick station wagon with wood-grain side panels.  Ford and Chrysler also have exhibits, although theirs are tucked in a separate room with the less-popular automotive parts section.  "We've got to get out of the Detroit mentality and be part of the world mentality," declares Charles M. Jordan, GM's vice president for design, in explaining his pilgrimage to the Tokyo Show.  Even so, traditional American cockiness isn't terribly endangered.  Ford officials, for example, crowed about their first-ever Tokyo Grand Prix racing victory.  True, Ford was declared the winner Sunday, but only after the Honda driver who crossed the finish line first was disqualified because it hit another car and skid momentarily out of bounds.  Mr. Jordan of GM, meanwhile, still criticizes Japanese styling.  "It's hard for the Japanese," he says, "to get a feeling in a car, to get a passion in a car, to get emotion in a car."  Regarding your Sept. 28 Politics & Policy column on the party differences over cutting capital gains or expanding IRAs: Why not compromise now and save the public from the coming infantile congressional political rhetoric that seems to go hand in hand with the process?  The Republicans maintain that a 30% capital-gains exclusion will raise revenue in the short term and spur economic investment, while the Democrats maintain that an increase in the top income-tax rate and expanded IRAs will raise revenue and spur savings.  This is a classic example of the old saying, "The whole is greater than the sum of its parts."  It's ridiculous for a family with taxable income of $50,000 to pay the same 28% incremental tax rate as a family with taxable income of $250,000.  The 33% bracket should apply to all income over the applicable level, not just the 5% rate adjustment amount.  It's equally ridiculous not to provide a capital investment or retirement-savings tax incentive.  Jeffrey T. Schmidlin  Cincinnati  PWA Corp. said it plans to sell by spring 1992 all 15 passenger planes it acquired earlier this year in its 248 million Canadian dollar (US$211.6 million) purchase of Wardair Inc.  PWA, which recently merged Wardair's operations with those of PWA-owned Canadian Airlines International Ltd., Canada's second-biggest airline, said the proposed sale is part of a revised five-year plan aimed at streamlining its fleet and shedding debt.  PWA wouldn't estimate the value of Wardair's aircraft, which include 12 Airbus A310-300s and three Boeing 747-100s.  But James Ireland, a Miami-based technical analyst with Avmark Inc., an aircraft evaluation firm, estimated the total "half-life" value of the 15 planes at about $650 million or more.  Mr. Ireland said 11 DC10-30 aircraft that PWA also said it plans to sell, beginning in 1992, have a current half-life value of about $34 million each, or a total $374 million, raising aggregate potential proceeds from the aircraft sale to about $1.02 billion.  Mr. Ireland said current demand for used aircraft is strong, partly because surging orders for new aircraft have lengthened waiting lists.  He predicted that PWA would have little difficulty attracting prospective buyers.  Under its revised fleet plan, PWA said it will also increase its existing fleet of eight Boeing 767-300ER aircraft to 18 by 1994, and add four more Boeing 747-400s by 1994 to the two units that it previously planned to add by next year.  PWA said two of the Boeing 767-300ER aircraft scheduled for delivery in 1990 would be leased out for two to five years.  PWA didn't disclose the expected net cost of the fleet overhaul, but a Toronto-based analyst estimated it at about $450 million (US), excluding replacement costs for the 11 DC10-30 aircraft that PWA plans to sell, and purchase costs for as many as 17 Airbus 320-200 aircraft that PWA previously ordered.  "I don't see this as a debt reduction exercise.  It's focused on streamlining" PWA's fleet in a bid to cut training and aircraft servicing costs, the analyst said.  PWA's long-term debt and capital lease obligations rose to C$1.24 billion at the end of the second quarter, nearly double the year-earlier figure, reflecting debt absorbed under the Wardair purchase.  PWA said it also expects to announce by Tuesday whether it will take delivery of all 17 Airbus 320-200 aircraft it previously ordered.  The first five leased units were to be delivered in 1991.  This British banking and financial-services group's investment-banking arm, Barclays de Zoete Wedd Group, announced the following appointments at its merchant-banking subsidiary Barclays de Zoete Wedd Ltd. John Padovan, 51 years old, was named a deputy chairman.  Mr. Padovan is currently a director at Barclays de Zoete Wedd Ltd. Graham Pimlott, 40, was named to the new post of chief executive officer of the merchant-banking corporate-finance division.  Callum McCarthy, 45, was named to the new post of deputy head of the corporate-finance division and a managing director.  Mr. Pimlott and Mr. McCarthy join Barclay's from Kleinwort Benson Ltd. where they served as directors.  The recent bids for United and American Airlines have led Congress to move with supersonic speed to protect incumbent airline managements.  The House is scheduled to vote today on an anti-airline-takeover bill that would block, for up to 50 days, any bid for 15% or more of a U.S. airline, even a straight cash purchase.  Transportation Secretary Sam Skinner, who earlier fueled the anti-takeover fires with his quasi-xenophobic attacks on foreign investment in U.S. carriers, now says the bill would further disturb the jittery capital markets.  Texas Rep. Steve Bartlett, who has 40,000 American Airlines workers in his district, says the bill is "good politics, but bad law."  It is ironic that at a time when America's partial airline deregulation is being emulated by governments from New Zealand to Ethiopia, so many in Congress favor an incumbent-protection program for airlines that would be more appropriate for the Soviet airline, Aeroflot.  Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan told Congress that the Fed can wipe out inflation without causing a recession, but he said doing so will inflict some short-term pain and will require reducing the federal deficit sharply.  Mr. Greenspan said he and other Fed governors endorse a bill by Rep. Stephen Neal (D., N.C.) that would require the Fed to pursue policies aimed at eliminating inflation within five years.  "Such a deadline is attainable, but it would have costs," Mr. Greenspan told Rep. Neal's monetary policy subcommittee.  The Fed chief opposed a bill-introduced by Reps.  Lee Hamilton (D., Ind.) and Byron Dorgan (D., N.D.) -- that, among other things, would require the Fed to disclose all monetary policy moves immediately and increase outside scrutiny of the Fed.  In responding to questions, Mr. Greenspan played down reports of tension between the Fed and the Treasury over exchange-rate policy.  "What seem to be interpreted as great conflicts are relatively minor issues of tactics," he said.  He didn't elaborate.  But the Fed isn't enthusiastic about Treasury efforts to bring down the value of the dollar through intervention in foreign-exchange markets, and the Treasury is frustrated at the Fed's reluctance to cut interest rates to pull down the dollar's value.  Mr. Greenspan said the inflation rate, currently about 4 1/2%, "could be brought down to levels which are close to zero without putting the economy into a recession, but I do suspect that there might be some modest loss of economic output."  In other words, economic growth would be lower and unemployment would be higher for a few years.  But Mr. Greenspan, who has repeatedly said the Fed's goal is to reduce inflation, added that "whatever losses are incurred in the pursuing of price stability would surely be more than made up in increased output thereafter."  He warned that Fed efforts to conquer inflation would fail -- and could produce "a major financial crunch" -- unless they are accompanied by a significant reduction in the federal deficit, which causes the government to borrow heavily.  Rep. Neal's bill originally called on the Fed to reduce the inflation rate by one percentage point a year for five years and to maintain a zero inflation rate thereafter.  He altered the wording to win Mr. Greenspan's endorsement.  Even so, his bill is given little chance of passage.  Reps.  Hamilton and Dorgan also have altered their bill, dropping a proposal to add the Treasury secretary to the 12-member Fed committee that makes monetary policy.  Instead, the bill simply calls for twice-a-year meetings between the committee and top administration officials.  Even that met with Mr. Greenspan's disapproval because it might subject the Fed "to a more intensely political perspective" and "could risk bending monetary policy away from long-term strategic goals."  While each of the Hamilton-Dorgan proposals represents only a small step, together they would erode the Fed's independence, Mr. Greenspan said.  Mr. Greenspan also said that although he favors cutting capital-gains taxes as sound economic policy, he would oppose such a move if it would undo the political compromise embodied in the Tax Reform Act of 1986 and result in higher marginal income tax rates.  Sears, Roebuck & Co. signed a contract with Bob Vila, the former host of the popular public television program "This Old House," to star in a half-hour home improvement show sponsored by the giant retailer.  The do-it-yourself show, slated to start airing by June 1990, marks Sears's entry into the burgeoning market of home repair television programs and could bolster sales of its home improvement products.  In recent months, sales of home improvement items have sagged, along with sales of other big ticket durable goods.  The show also signals Mr. Vila's return as a television celebrity.  Earlier this year, public television station WGBH in Boston fired Mr. Vila after a sponsor protested some of his numerous commercial endorsements.  With Mr. Vila as host, "This Old House" became one of the Public Broadcasting Service's top 10 programs, airing weekly on about 300 of the network's stations and seen by an average of 12 million viewers.  But Home Depot Inc., an Atlanta-based home center chain, objected when Mr. Vila started doing commercial endorsements for Rickel Home Centers, a New Jersey building supply company that competes with Home Depot in some markets.  "I'm ecstatic about the change," said Mr. Vila, whose new syndicated program is called "Home Again with Bob Vila."  In an interview, Mr. Vila criticized his old show, which is continuing with a new host.  "Public TV is in fantasy land," he said.  "Last season, we did a story that involved spending $700,000 in converting a two-family house into a bed and breakfast."  In the new show, he said, "we're going to spend $60,000 building a start-up house" for a young couple.  While Sears wouldn't comment on the brouhaha over Mr. Vila's commercial endorsements, it appears to be building a fence around Mr. Vila's affections.  His contract makes him "exclusive" spokesman for Sears's home improvement marketing campaigns.  Ogilvy & Mather in Chicago, a unit of WPP Group PLC, will handle the advertising account and syndication.  The only other endorsement permitted by the contract involves a series of Time-Life home improvement and repair books.  His other agreements to promote products have expired.  Little matter for Mr. Vila, who complains that "public TV never paid me more than $40,000 a year."  He said his compensation under the Sears contract is "a multimillion dollar deal."  Eugene A. Miller, 52 years old, was elected a director of this electric utility company, filling a vacancy.  He is president and chief executive officer of Comerica Inc. in Detroit.  The White House has decided to push for changes in pesticide law that are designed to speed the removal of harmful chemicals from the nation's food supply.  The proposed changes, which are scheduled to be announced today, would apply to pesticides and other substances found on fresh and processed foods, according to federal officials.  Environmental groups have been calling for faster action on dangerous pesticides and may welcome part of the proposal.  But they are already objecting to, among other things, a plan to give more weight to cost-benefit considerations in evaluating pesticides."It's a tremendous disappointment," said Janet Hathaway, an attorney with the Natural Resources Defense Council.  "Allowing the EPA to condone continued use of a chemical whenever the benefits outweigh the risks is absolutely anathema to the environmental community."  The Bush administration plans to announce a series of principles and to work with congressional leaders in writing specific legislative proposals that embody them.  The principles would give the Environmental Protection Agency increased authority and flexibility in regulating pesticides, with the aim of enabling the agency to move more quickly.  There already are proposals pending in Congress to overhaul pesticide law.  Moves to accelerate the removal of dangerous pesticides gained new impetus during this year's Alar scare, when the EPA was harshly criticized for failing to yank the possible carcinogen, a growth regulator used to make apples redder and crunchier.  The agency has since acted to remove Alar from the nation's grocery shelves by May 31, 1991, and the apple industry has said that growers already have stopped using the chemical.  In addition, the principles attempt to eliminate the so-called Delaney Paradox.  Under the Delaney clause, which applies to processed food, a chemical is banned if it causes cancer in laboratory animals.  Under other laws applying to pesticide use, however, that same chemical could be allowed to be used on fresh food if it fell within the EPA's tolerance level.  Among other changes, the White House wants to:  -- Give the EPA more flexibility to declare a pesticide an imminent hazard and pull it from the marketplace.  -- Speed up the process for removing a pesticide that isn't an imminent hazard.  -- Bar states from setting more stringent tolerance levels for a pesticide once the federal government has set a standard.  -- Give the EPA added discretion to set "negligible risk" levels for pesticide residues in processed food.  Chemicals that exceed these risk levels would be barred, but those that fall below these levels would be allowed.  -- Allow the EPA to permit the continued use of pesticides that exceed its negligible risk standard if the benefits of doing so outweigh the cost.  Financial markets took a midweek break from their recent wild gyrations with stock prices falling modestly, bond prices posting tiny gains and the dollar almost unchanged.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average lost 5.94 points to 2653.28 in moderate trading.  Long-term Treasury bonds rose slightly despite the arrival on the market of $4.52 billion in 30-year bonds offered by the Resolution Funding Corp. as part of the government's bailout of the savings and loan industry.  The dollar was barely changed against the West German mark and up marginally against the Japanese yen.  Yesterday's sluggish action was in marked contrast to the rearing and plunging of stock prices Tuesday after the proposed buy-out of UAL Corp. once again collapsed.  Traders said the stock market's lurching moves have prompted many investors to head for the sidelines until it regains some semblance of stability.  Although bond prices weren't as volatile on Tuesday trading as stock prices, traders nevertheless said action also was much slower yesterday in the Treasury market.  Bond investors paid close attention to comments by Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan, who was testifying before a congressional hearing, but weren't able to extract many clues about the future course of the Fed's monetary policy.  Many analysts are expecting the Fed to lower interest rates at least once more before the end of the year.  Investors now are awaiting today's release of the preliminary estimate of third-quarter gross national product.  Economists predict the report will show economic growth of about 2.5% in the third quarter, which would have little effect on financial markets.  But an unexpected deviation either way could roil bond and currency markets.  In major market activity:  Stock prices slipped lower in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 155.7 million shares.  But advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners 784 to 700.  Bond prices inched higher.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue rose less than an eighth of a point, or less than $1.25 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The yield on the issue stood at 7.88%.  The dollar was virtually unchanged.  In late New York trading the U.S. currency was quoted at 1.8353 marks and 141.52 yen, compared with 1.8355 marks and 141.45 yen Tuesday.  A few years ago, I was on a panel of journalists that discussed the "image" of intercollegiate athletics for an audience of campus information directors and others.  We scribblers quickly concurred that not only was the bad rep of big-time college sports richly earned, but also that it could be corrected.  Competition could be maintained -- and stadiums probably would remain full -- if schedules were reduced and the games returned to the students, we said.  Comments from the audience reflected widespread, if wistful, agreement with those conclusions.  As the session broke up, I was approached by a man who identified himself as the alumni director of a Big Ten university.  "I'd love to see sports cut back, and so would a lot of my counterparts at other schools, but everybody's afraid to make the first move," he confided.  "It's like the U.S. and the Russians: Nobody wants to disarm first."  And so our institutions of higher learning lurch from scandal to scandal on gridiron and basketball court, while the casualties mount.  Three new books make the point that one large price of the glittery college-sports show can be the integrity of the schools that stage it.  They are: "A Payroll to Meet: A Story of Greed, Corruption and Football at SMU" (Macmillan, 221 pages, $18.95) by David Whitford; "Big Red Confidential: Inside Nebraska Football" (Contemporary, 231 pages, $17.95) by Armen Keteyian; and "Never Too Young to Die: The Death of Len Bias" (Pantheon, 252 pages, $18.95) by Lewis Cole.  The pick of the group is "Payroll"; it should be required reading for every college president.  It chronicles how, over a period of a dozen years, Southern Methodist University bought its way to football respectability in the Southwest Conference, only to find itself trapped and strangled by the athlete-payoff system it created.  The school was the first, in 1987, to receive the NCAA's "death penalty" -- two years without football -- for repeated rules violations.  Given current headlines about the University of Florida, it may not be the last.  The man who brought the bribe to the Dallas school was Ron Meyer, a flashy sort who came in 1975 to rescue a woebegone program, Mr. Whitford writes.  Mr. Meyer's personal style was illustrated by his pinning a $100 bill to a high-school bulletin board on which other coaches tacked their cards.  One recruiter working with Mr. Meyer was so generous with $10 and $20 bills that prospects sang "Here Comes Santa Claus" when he approached.  Paying players at SMU was no casual operation.  It involved the athletics director, two different football coaching staffs, and school trustees and governors -- just about everybody, it seemed, but Donald Shields, the university's president.  There's a memorable passage in which Mr. Shields, having finally learned of the practice, expresses his outrage to Bill Clements, then a university governor (and now the governor of Texas]) and oil man Edwin Cox, chairman of the board of trustees.  "You stay out of it," author Whitford quotes Mr. Clements as saying.  "Go run the university."  Which was about what Mr. Shields did, and quietly, until he resigned a few years later, pleading ill health, when the stuff hit the fan.  Mr. Whitford drew on voluminous news media coverage of the SMU scandal, and on a university internal investigation.  Mr. Keteyian had to do most of his own digging on University of Nebraska football, which is, to date, high and dry as far as the NCAA is concerned.  Unfortunately, he gets low grades as an investigative reporter, relying heavily on what Chicago's late mayor, Richard J. Daley, called "insinuendo."  Discrepancies go unexplained in "Confidential" (one ex-player claims he received $4,000 to $5,000 for his season football tickets while others said theirs brought only a few hundred dollars), and when Mr. Keteyian can't nail down something, like who really owned a car driven by Husker tailback Doug Dubose, he simply reprints his notes.  There are gratuitous references to supposed romantic liaisons between Husker players and a low-level female university employee.  A serious charge -- that star flanker Irving Fryar "threw" the 1984 Orange Bowl game by intentionally dropping a pass in the end zone -- is included, even though the Nebraska assistant coach quoted denied making it.  Still, the book produces more smoke than a smoldering sofa, along with a few flames, especially concerning the use of steroids.  Dean Steinkuhler, a spectacularly bulked-up former lineman, confesses that he used 'em, and says other Huskers did too.  It's a mystery how this could have escaped the notice of Nebraska coaches.  Probably, it didn't.  "Never Too Young" is a different sort of work, focusing on the 1986 death from cocaine ingestion of Bias, a University of Maryland basketball star ticketed for sure pro stardom.  While the university was no more to blame for that than for the similar fate of any other student, it must bear responsibility for its conduct in the aftermath.  Bias's coach, Lefty Driesell, ordered the room in which Bias died to be cleaned before the police could arrive (the order wasn't carried out), and the school's athletics director issued false information about the academic standing of Bias and other players.  Those, of course, were the responses of people with something to hide.  One wonders how other college athletic officials would behave under the same circumstances.  Tomorrow's "On Sports" column will look at another aspect of the college sports mess.  Mercedes-Benz of North America Inc., a unit of Daimler-Benz AG, paid Massachusetts $9.1 million in taxes, bringing to an end a 10-month-long corporate tax chase.  Officials at the Department of Revenue had dogged the foreign car maker for taxes owed on business transactions and were proceeding to settle the dispute in court.  But "the check arrived in the mail," said Stephen Kidder, Massachusetts Commissioner of Revenue.  Mercedes-Benz, which had said it didn't owe taxes to Massachusetts partly because it sells its cars at a dock in Baltimore and not in Massachusetts, didn't explain its change of heart.  Last month, Mercedes-Benz executives approached state revenue officials complaining about bad press, the commissioner said.  The dispute was the subject of a Wall Street Journal article in August.  The amount covers taxes, interest and penalties owed from 1966, when the state began collecting corporate taxes, to 1985.  Mercedes-Benz also agreed to pay taxes owed for the years 1986 through 1988, Mr. Kidder added.  Under Massachusetts tax laws, corporations must pay 9.5% of estimated profits resulting from business transactions in the state if the company conducts a variety of non-sales activities, including warranties, customer complaints and relations with independent dealerships.  National Convenience Stores Inc., trying to shake the doldrums in the convenience-store business, said it will rearrange the merchandise in all of its stores in the next 18 months to cater better to the neighborhoods around its stores.  As part of the plan, the Houston-based company's 1,100 Stop 'N Go stores will be refocused to target black, Hispanic, upscale or core middle-class customers.  Stores in upper-income neighborhoods, for instance, will carry high-priced wines, publications such as Vanity Fair, gourmet pasta sauces, oat bran cereals and Weight Watchers and Pritikin products.  Stores in Hispanic areas will stock an assortment of Spanish-language magazines, Mexican cooking items and candies.  Stores in the company's core middle-class market will get more frozen and quick-to-prepare foods and a greater selection of bottled water.  V.H. Van Horn, National Convenience president and chief executive officer, said the move reflects the company's realization that the industry's poor performance stems from its failure to give customers what they want -- rather than from increasing competition from gasoline stations and 24-hour grocery stores.  "Convenience store merchandise has not kept pace with current trends in consumer preferences," he said in a speech at the company's annual shareholders meeting.  Analysts and competitors said the move reflects a growing need by the stores to expand their customer base beyond the traditional blue-collar worker who pops into a convenience store for a sandwich, cigarettes, soda or beer.  "There are an increasing number of people out there who are time-poor," said Chris Vroom, retail analyst with Alex.  Brown & Sons of Baltimore.  "Those are primarily white-collar workers, a customer segment that has historically proved elusive for convenience stores."  National Convenience's move is likely to be echoed by other chains, though analysts note that Southland Corp., owner of 7-Eleven stores, and Circle K Corp. are too debt-heavy to roll out such an extensive effort.  Still, Southland said that its franchisees have been targeting their merchandise to their customers for years, and that the company has begun to follow suit.  For instance, Southland has expanded its bottled water selection in some stores and added fresh sandwiches in some outlets.  Several months ago, it also added black health and beauty aids displays to many stores, a spokeswoman said.  "We certainly see an increasing trend toward that," she added.  National Convenience said it has tested its new merchandise mix in 100 stores, with favorable results.  Analysts said the company's effort will be helped by its decision last year to put point-of-sale scanners in 200 stores, allowing National Convenience to quickly track items that are selling and those that aren't.  To promote its new strategy, National Convenience said it plans to spend about $12 million on advertising for the year ending June 30, up from about $10 million in fiscal 1989.  Labor Secretary Elizabeth Dole named a mediator to help resolve the lengthy labor dispute between the United Mine Workers and Pittston Co.  W.J. Usery Jr., labor secretary during the Ford administration, was named to mediate talks to settle the six-month strike by the UMW.  Previous talks between Pittston, of Greenwich, Conn., and the union have been sporadic and unsuccessful.  The union called the strike in April after Pittston refused to sign the UMW's national labor pact.  Pittston seeks changes in health and pension benefits, among other things.  No schedule for formal talks was set, but meetings are expected to begin soon.  One day after Delmed Inc. made top management changes and disclosed the end of an important business tie, its stock didn't trade and the company forecast a "significant" drop next year in sales of its core product.  That disclosure came, a Delmed spokeswoman said, after the American Stock Exchange alerted the company that trading wouldn't resume in its stock until additional information about developments was provided.  In addition to the forecast, the company also said it is examining potential cost cuts and reductions in overhead.  The spokeswoman said the exchange would resume trading of Delmed stock today.  Delmed, which makes and sells peritoneal dialysis products used in treating kidney disease, on Tuesday announced the resignations of Robert S. Ehrlich, chairman, president and chief executive officer, and of Leslie I. Shapiro, chief operating officer and chief financial officer.  They were succeeded by executives of Fresenius USA Inc. and its parent, Fresenius AG, which owns about 45% of Delmed.  At the same time, the New Brunswick, N.J., company said negotiations about pricing and volumes of product had collapsed between it and its exclusive distributor in the U.S., National Medical Care Inc. Following that announcement Tuesday, however, company officials were unavailable to elaborate.  Yesterday, the spokeswoman said sales of Delmed products through the exclusive arrangement with National Medical accounted for 87% of Delmed's 1988 sales of $21.1 million.  The current distribution arrangement ends in March 1990, although Delmed said it will continue to provide some supplies of the peritoneal dialysis products to National Medical, the spokeswoman said.  Nonetheless, "Delmed currently expects that 1990 sales . . . will be significantly below their 1989 level," the company said in a statement.  Delmed said yesterday that Fresenius USA would begin distributing the product and that the company is investigating other possible distribution channels.  In any case, supplies to patients won't be interrupted, the company added.  Fresenius, a West German pharmaceutical concern, has been discussing a transaction in which it would buy Delmed stock for cash to bring its beneficial ownership to between 70% and 80%.  The transaction also would combine Fresenius USA and Delmed.  But the plan now is being "reformulated," Delmed said, declining to provide most of the new terms of the combination.  Said the spokeswoman: "The whole structure has changed.  The value of the company has changed."  Delmed did say that the proposal still would infuse cash into Delmed but less than the $10 million originally expected.  Delmed also would receive the North American rights to certain Fresenius AG products.  Another option for Delmed, the company said, is that it could sell its plant in Ogden, Utah.  It added that no discussions about such a sale are under way.  Brooks Armored Car Service Inc. never wanted to get into money laundering.  But July 5, a thunderstorm in Wilmington, Del., caused Shellpot Creek to rise 15 feet, pouring 1.3 million gallons of water into basement vaults.  The water destroyed about $75 million in currency and caked $4 million of coins with mud, rendering them dangerous to counting machines.  The $75 million in paper money, although moldy, mildewy and smelly, was exchanged through the Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia without incident.  But Brooks was unable to reach a coin-cleaning agreement with the government.  "We kind of got caught between bureaucracies," says President William F. Brooks Jr.  The U.S. Mint wouldn't take the coin because it wasn't mutilated, and the Federal Reserve Bank accepts only clean coins, he says.  The Philadelphia Fed says it is merely an "agent" for coins, responsible only for storage and distribution.  "We issue paper money; we destroy paper money," says Jane Hinkle, a Philadelphia Fed spokeswoman.  "The coin is their problem."  A Mint official says the agency offered to clean the coins for its "bare-bones" cost of $17,000 plus certain other expenses.  But Brooks declined, figuring that transporting the mucked up money to Washington would cost the company thousands more.  So Brooks gave the dirty work to Coin Wrap Inc., which came up with an unusual solution.  For eight hours a day for the past two weeks, in aggregates of as much as 27,000 pounds (equaling $20,000 in pennies), Coin Wrap has been pouring money into a cement-mixing truck.  A giant heater, working like a blowtorch, causes the mud to crust and burns off any wrappers.  After clanging around for an hour or so, the shiny, hot money pours out of the cement chute, where a giant vacuum sucks away the dried mud and burnt wrappers.  After cooling, the coins are then rewrapped.  Brooks expects to pay Coin Wrap a total of about $20,000 -- a cost that insurance won't cover.  And while the job is half done, Brooks is still bitter.  In fact, there's only one person involved who's happy, and that's Floyd String, president of Coin Wrap and conceiver of the cement-truck solution.  Not only did his company find $20,000 worth of work, but when the approach was suggested, Mr. String says, Brooks officials "didn't laugh at me or anything."  "Parenthood," this summer's successful and amusing movie about parents and children, apparently was only the beginning.  It seems that every day a new movie opens featuring a child coping with a mother's death, or adoption, or aging parents, or pregnancy.  And why not?  Some of our best and most idiosyncratic film makers -- from Truffaut to Fellini to Woody Allen -- have taken a cue from Chekhov: When it comes to compelling drama, there's no place like home.  Yet too many people working in Hollywood today seem to suffer from the delusion that the drama played out in every home will be interesting to people who live somewhere else.  This is not the case.  Some diaries simply aren't worth snooping in.  Yet there will be people who will sob at "Immediate Family," a limply constructed and offensive movie about adoption.  These are the sensitive souls who can empathize with and even enjoy hearing about other people's troubles, no matter how haltingly or predictably the sad tale is told.  Written by Barbara Benedek, co-author of "The Big Chill," "Immediate Family" takes the position that only rich people living in nice houses should have children.  The film makers have couched this offensive idea in pretty packaging.  Everyone is very nice and good-looking -- the adoptive parents (Glenn Close and James Woods) and the teen-age couple who decide to give up their baby for adoption (Mary Stuart Masterson and Kevin Dillon).  Linda and Michael (Ms.  Close and Mr. Woods), who seem to be pushing 40, live in a large and tastefully decorated home in suburban Seattle.  All of their friends have children and they can't, so now they want a child more than anything -- perhaps even more than Michael wanted his fancy convertible or his deluxe stereo equipment.  The idea of a child-as-required-yuppie-possession must be motivating them, since the wealthy offspring of their friends are shown to be rude brats, in therapy by age five.  Having exhausted all modern aids to fertility, Linda and Michael decide to adopt.  The actors wear pained expressions to indicate their genuine longing for a little one -- or maybe they're not-so-subtly commenting on the inadequacy of the script, and Jonathan Kaplan's ("The Accused") dull direction.  Or maybe they are disgusted by the literal-minded musical score; when a character arrives at a major decision her thoughts are revealed by the sound of "I Can See Clearly Now."  The adoption agency insists on introducing the adopting parents to the birth mother, so Linda and Michael pay for pregnant Lucy's (Ms.  Masterson) bus ticket from Ohio. (Why in these movies is the unwed pregnant woman always from Ohio?  I ask this not necessarily as a native Ohioan.) Lucy, of course, is pretty and smart, though uneducated.  Everyone falls in love with everyone else.  There is some pain, when Lucy has the baby and "didn't know she would feel like this" and wants to keep the baby.  But in the end, everything turns out for the best, in the film makers' warped view.  Like lawyers in the hostile takeover field, the baby goes where the money is.  At the other end of the life cycle is "Dad," Gary David Goldberg's adaptation of the William Wharton novel.  This picture is about a middle-aged son who makes sure that his delayed bond with his father will last by waiting to cement it until just before the old man dies.  The glib emotional style Mr. Goldberg has perfected on television's "Family Ties" doesn't benefit from magnification.  His characters practically scamper through a vast range of human emotions, like travelers doing 10 cities in eight days.  They pause only to register little whimpers of distress and sighs of satisfaction, like tourists cataloging the sights they've seen from the window of a bus.  Not even Jack Lemmon's expert doddering makes this trip worth taking.  So it's entirely possible that "Look Who's Talking" isn't as entertaining as it seems in comparison to the turgid other films opening now.  But by comparison, this fluffy comedy seems like a gem.  It starts with conception, taking the sperm's point of view, then progresses to the baby's point of view.  Bruce Willis's best attribute as an actor is his coy, lazy voice, and that's all you get of him here, speaking for the baby.  Finally, there is one family movie that quite eloquently explores the depth of human emotion -- only its stars are bears.  For the second time, in a movie called "The Bear," French director Jean-Jacques Annaud demonstrates just how powerful pictures can be. ("Quest for Fire" was the first time.) To be sure, one wonders what kind of man is this, who feels compelled to try to understand the most primitive longing and instinct in a way that requires the most sophisticated appreciation of visual storytelling.  Supposedly, he proposed the movie to his producer, Claude Berri, in four lines: "An orphan bear cub.  A big solitary bear.  Two hunters in the forest.  The animals' point of view."  But then, even a great many words couldn't summarize the extraordinary pull of this movie about an orphaned bear who adopts a parent.  ---  Video Tip: One of the best movies about the child-parent thing in recent years was "Raising Arizona," the 1987 Coen brothers' comedy that definitely was not about the folks next door.  Westinghouse Electric Corp., capitalizing on a major restructuring program, expects operating margins of more than 10% and double-digit per-share earnings growth next year, top officers told securities analysts here.  John C. Marous, chairman and chief executive officer, also said the company expects sales from continuing businesses to rise 8.5% annually through the next three years.  In 1988, the company earned $822.8 million, or $5.66 a share, on sales of $12.49 billion.  Since 1983, Westinghouse has shed 70 businesses that it didn't expect to produce 10% operating margins while acquiring 55 businesses.  In the past 20 months alone, Paul E. Lego, president and chief operating officer, said the divestiture of $300 million of slow-growth, low-profit businesses has been more than offset by $600 million in profitable acquisitions.  Westinghouse expects to meet its corporate goals despite a softening in the economy.  Even if the gross national product is either flat or in the growth range of 2% to 2.5%, "we can handle that," Mr. Marous said.  GNP is the total value of the nation's output of goods and services.  A bright spot is the company's power-generation business, which is experiencing a surge of growth for the first time in years.  Mr. Marous said the business will achieve higher sales this year than the company's target goal of 8.5%.  While Westinghouse hasn't had a nuclear power plant order from a U.S. utility in about a decade, excess capacity is beginning to shrink.  Mr. Lego said the company foresees the need for a major boost in new-generation capability throughout the 1990s.  Westinghouse also is well positioned to sell steam turbine and gas turbine plants to independent power producers.  The company's ability to respond to energy needs world-wide will be enhanced through a recently announced venture with Mitsubishi Heavy Industries, Mr. Lego said.  He said the independent power segment could grow to provide as much as 50% of near-term generation capacity, adding: "We expect to supply a significant share of this market."  Westinghouse also expects its international sales to soon grow to 25% of total corporate sales from 20% last year.  The company is negotiating with the Soviets to build a Thermo King truck-refrigeration plant that would produce about 10,000 units annually.  Mr. Marous said Westinghouse would own 70% of the facility.  The deal, which will involve an initial $20 million investment, was struck with a handshake, he added.  Company officials also said that any gain from the sale of Westinghouse's 55% stake in its transmission and distribution venture with the Swiss firm of Asea Brown Boveri will be offset by a restructuring charge in the fourth quarter.  The executives didn't disclose the size of the expected gain.  Capital expenditure in 1990 will rise slightly, Mr. Marous said, from an estimated $470 million this year.  SHORT INTEREST in International Mobile Machines Corp. fell to 3,102,935 shares in the month ended Oct. 13 from 3,420,936 in September.  Because of an error by the National Association of Securities Dealers, the listing appeared incorrectly in the main table and several highlight tables in yesterday's edition.  (See: "Short Interest in OTC Stocks Posts 6% Jump --- Rise During Latest Period Is Sharpest Since April; Oct. 13 Drop Isn't Factor" -- WSJ Oct. 25, 1989)  A proposed conflict-of-interest policy for federally funded biomedical researchers may thwart many high-technology new ventures, say financiers, researchers and university administrators.  The National Institutes of Health policy would require researchers to cut financial ties with health-care businesses -- or lose their government money.  Among other concerns, the agency says researchers with business ties are more likely to falsify findings in order to tout new drugs.  As ties between academia and venture capital have blossomed in recent years, governmental fear of abuse has risen.  But the guidelines could "make it impossible to commercialize research," says Kenneth Smith, associate provost and vice president for research at Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  The NIH is asking grant recipients and others for comments on the proposed guidelines until Dec. 15.  After that, it will make a final decision on the policy.  The guidelines could foil future arrangements similar to the deal behind Lithox Inc., a Salem, Mass., start-up, says Robert Daly, a managing partner of TA Associates, a venture-capital firm.  With $2.3 million, he and other investors launched Lithox last year to market a gallstone cure being developed by researchers of the University of California at San Diego.  The researchers, who are being financed by the Lithox funds, will receive a royalty, or percentage of sales, if their research yields a commercial product.  But because the University of California, like many other universities, shares its royalties with researchers, it may disqualify itself from federal funds under the proposed guidelines, Mr. Daly says.  The high-tech industry is full of the kind of arrangement that the new guidelines would affect.  For instance, Commonwealth BioVentures Inc., a venture-capital concern, last month invested $600,000 to launch Amira Inc., a Worcester, Mass., concern that will produce pharmaceuticals.  Scientists Rima Kaddurah-Daouk and Paul Schimmel conducted the initial research at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  While Ms. Kaddurah-Daouk left MIT to head Amira, Prof.  Schimmel will continue to work at MIT, serve on Amira's board and own a small equity stake in the company.  The Amira transaction is typical of the way venture-capital firms are approaching the task of commercializing biotechnology research.  While universities develop the basic research, "venture capitalists are the ones best positioned to finance its commercialization," says Gloria W. Doubleday of Commonwealth.  "This is the best way to transfer technology straight off the campuses of universities."  But the new guidelines could prevent scientists like Prof.  Schimmel from being involved with start-ups such as Amira, venture capitalists point out.  And if that happens, the entire process of transferring technology to the marketplace could be harmed, they say.  The stakes in the controversy are large.  Last year, venture capitalists spent an estimated $600 million to finance start-up companies in medical and biotechnology businesses, according to the National Venture Capital Association, a trade group.  Many of the deals involved transactions in which scientific institutions or researchers agreed to commercialize their work in return for an equity stake or royalties.  In many of these deals, "venture capitalists had the inside track," says Lawrence Bock of Avalon Ventures, La Jolla, Calif.  Investors were willing to gamble on new technologies because "we had exclusive rights to those technologies," he adds.  But under the proposed guidelines, all federally funded research will have to be reported publicly so that anyone can capitalize on the work.  "Without the exclusivity, most venture capitalists won't have the incentive to invest in such deals," Mr. Bock says.  Last year, for example, Avalon and others invested $14 million in Athena Neurosciences Inc., South San Francisco, Calif., to license and develop technology for delivery of drugs to the brain.  But before Athena was able to get an exclusive license to the technology, the Federal Register published most of the details, "giving all of the company's potential competitors a chance to exploit it," Mr. Bock says.  Athena eventually acquired exclusive rights to the technology and currently is developing it.  But, says Mr. Bock, "It was a close call."  The proposed guidelines could also delay commercialization -- and force small companies to waste scarce capital, entrepreneurs say.  If start-ups can't have early access to research being conducted at institutions, "we have to replicate it ourselves or do without the research," says Ruth Emyanitoff, manager of business development at Applied bioTechnology Inc., a Cambridge, Mass., concern.  Duplicating research is both costly and time-consuming for a start-up, Ms. Emyanitoff says.  For its part, NIH insists that its guidelines "should not stifle research creativity or technology transfer from the research laboratory to commercial use."  Universities such as Harvard and MIT should be able to develop a way to act as brokers for the individual scientists, says Katherine Bick, who oversees the huge NIH grants program as its deputy director for extramural research.  NIH staff members believe the guidelines are essential to prevent the escalation of problems that have already begun to surface in scientific ventures.  Not long ago, scientists holding stock in Spectra Pharmaceutical Services Inc. were accused of falsifying research to boost the stock.  Many officials are also concerned about companies getting a "free ride" on government-sponsored research.  A congressional subcommitee has been investigating the potential abuse from researchers holding stock in companies exploiting their research.  Among other provisions, the NIH guidelines would prohibit researchers and members of their immediate families from holding stock in any company that is affected by the outcome of their research.  Ms. Bick, the NIH administrator, says the business and scientific community is overreacting to what the agency merely meant to be "ideas for discussion."  The predictions of doom are "premature," she says.  But when agencies like the NIH circulate guidelines, they've often already formulated policy, veteran scientists say.  Indeed, institutions already are taking note.  On Sept. 14, Harvard began circulating a conflict-of-interest policy statement that, in effect, would follow the NIH guidelines faithfully.  The University of California at San Francisco is also circulating a memo among its scientific faculty that will restrict contact with the world of business.  In many other institutions, scientists are shunning contacts with venture investors until the NIH policy is settled.  Says Mr. Daly, the venture capitalist: "It doesn't matter whether they call it guidelines or policy.  The damage is already done."  Friday, Oct. 27, 9 p.m.-midnight EDT, on PBS (PBS air dates and times vary, so check local listings): "Show Boat."  New Jersey's Paper Mill Playhouse produced this faithful revival of America's most influential musical, written by Jerome Kern and Oscar Hammerstein and first produced on Broadway in 1927.  Worth watching, although the music has lasted better than the plot or the humor.  Saturday, Oct. 28, 8-10 p.m. EDT, on HBO (repeated Oct. 31, Nov. 5, 8, 14, 16 and 20): "Perfect Witness."  Aidan Quinn, Brian Dennehy and Stockard Channing are excellent in this gripping tale of a reluctant witness in an organized crime prosecution.  It's set in New York, but it resonates with the terrible dynamics of the Latin American drug wars.  Sunday, Oct. 29, 8-11 p.m. EST, on ABC: "The Final Days."  No doubt there is something to irk everyone in this AT&T-sponsored dramatization of Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein's book about Watergate.  Personally, I'm irked by its combination of ponderousness and timidity, which adds up to an utter lack of drama.  Sunday, Oct. 29, 10-11 p.m. EST, on Showtime (repeated Nov. 2, 6, 11 and 15): "The Strange Case of Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde."  Fans of Anthony Andrews ("Brideshead Revisited") will relish watching him play the title role(s) in the 19th-century Robert Louis Stevenson pre-Freudian drama of schizoid horror.  Monday, Oct. 30, 10-11 p.m. EST, on PBS: "Journey Into Sleep."  I promise you will stay awake through this intriguing documentary about the science of sleep.  Wednesday, Nov. 1, 9-10:30 p.m. EST, on PBS: "Thomas Hart Benton."  Critical opinion is divided about the success of Benton's populist defiance of modernist art.  But no one could disagree that Ken Burns has made a fascinating film about this famous American painter.  Thursday, Nov. 2, 9-10 p.m. EST, on A&E (repeated at 1 a.m. and on Nov. 5): "Third and Oak: The Pool Hall."  A one-acter by the Pulitzer Prize-winning playwright Marsha Norman is the first presentation in a new series called "American Playwrights Theater," sponsored by General Motors.  James Earl Jones and Mario Van Peebles carry out a bitter intergenerational dialogue between two black men.  Thursdays, Nov. 2-23, 10-11 p.m. EST, on PBS: "Taiwan: The Other China."  Judy Woodruff hosts this handsome four-part series about the history, economy, culture and politics of the island home of Chinese democracy and capitalism.  Friday, Nov. 3, 9-11 p.m. EST, on PBS: "Our Town."  Along with "Show Boat," "Great Performances" kicks off its new season with this Lincoln Center production of Thornton Wilder's best known play, in which the role of the small-town Stage Manager is given a hip twist by performance artist Spalding Gray.  Saturday, Nov. 4, 1:30-6 p.m. EST, on NBC: Breeder's Cup Day.  Polished hooves, fancy turf, fat purses -- the horse race of the year.  Sunday, Nov. 5, 10:30 a.m.-1:30 p.m. EST, on ABC: New York City Marathon.  Shiny Nikes, cracked cement, media glory -- the foot race of the year.  Sunday, Nov. 5, 8-9 p.m. EST, on TNT: "Gary Cooper: American Life, American Legend."  I've seen a great many moviestar film portraits, and this one is outstanding.  Sundays, Nov. 5-12, 9-10:30 p.m. EST, on PBS: "Glory Enough for All."  Can "Masterpiece Theatre" make a compelling human story out of the discovery of insulin?  This earthy, amusing film answers with a resounding "yes."  Sunday and Monday, Nov. 5 and 6, 9-11 p.m. EST, on NBC: "Cross of Fire."  The Ku Klux Klan was revived in the 1920s as a national organization aimed at Catholics and Jews as well as blacks.  One reason for its downfall was the murder trial of D.C. Stephenson, an Indiana leader whose reckless career is depicted in this film starring Mel Harris ("thirtysomething") and John Heard.  Tuesday, Nov. 7, 8-9 p.m. EST, on PBS: "Hurricane]" Has the San Francisco earthquake caused you to forget Hugo?  You'll remember when you see the stunning footage taken from inside a hurricane's eye, in this edition of "NOVA."  Merksamer Jewelers Inc., a fast-growing jewelry store chain, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law protection from creditors, apparently to speed a management buy-out of the chain.  The filing, made yesterday in U.S. Bankruptcy Court here, follows an agreement by L.J. Hooker Corp., Merksamer's owner, to sell the chain to management for an undisclosed price.  GE Capital Corp., a financial services subsidiary of General Electric Co., is providing Merksamer management with $15 million in financing.  L.J. Hooker, based in Atlanta, filed for Chapter 11 protection in August and has also announced its intention to sell its B. Altman & Co. department store chain.  L.J. Hooker is owned by Hooker Corp., Sydney, Australia, which itself is currently being managed by a court-appointed provisional liquidator.  L.J. Hooker's planned sale of Merksamer is subject to approval by Judge Tina Brozman of U.S. Bankruptcy Court.  Rumors to the effect that the Merksamer chain would file for Chapter 11 arose last week in the jewelry industry.  At that time, Sam Merksamer, president of the chain, angrily denied that his company was about to file.  Mr. Merksamer is leading the buy-out.  According to executives close to the situation, Merksamer filed for Chapter 11 to speed the sale of the chain.  One executive said an accord signed by the unsecured creditors of L.J. Hooker Corp. had frozen in place all of L.J. Hooker's assets.  The Merksamer bankruptcy-law filing appears to supersede that agreement.  "By filing for Chapter 11, the Merksamer chain will only need approval from a bankruptcy judge for the sale, not the hundreds of unsecured creditors," said this executive.  "The cash from the sale will go to L.J. Hooker, but the company itself will belong to Sam Merksamer."  Mr. Merksamer and Sanford Sigoloff, chief executive of L.J. Hooker, were unavailable for comment.  In a statement, Mr. Merksamer described the filing as a "legal technicality," but also said that "our inability to obtain trade credit, combined with a need to ensure that our stores were properly stocked for the Christmas season, necessitated our filing Chapter 11."  The jewelry chain, which is based in Sacramento, Calif., had revenue of $62 million and operating profit of $2.5 million for the year ended June 30.  For all of this year's explosive run-up in stock prices, Renaissance Investment Management Inc.'s computer sat on the sidelines.  Now it's on the fence.  Renaissance, a Cincinnati-based money manager, began buying stocks again this week with half of the $1.8 billion that it oversees for clients, according to people familiar with the firm's revised strategy.  It was the first time since January that Renaissance has thought stocks are worth owning.  Renaissance declined to confirm the move, but its stock purchases were thought to have begun Tuesday, timed to coincide with the maturity this week of Treasury bills owned by the firm.  The other half of its portfolio is expected to remain invested in Treasury bills for the time being.  Wall Street executives said they believed that Renaissance's $900 million buy program was carried out by PaineWebber Inc.  As reported, PaineWebber bought shares Tuesday as part of a customer strategy shift, although the broker's client was said then to have been Japanese.  Yesterday, PaineWebber declined comment.  When it owns stocks, Renaissance's portfolio typically is composed of about 60 large-capitalization issues; to make buy or sell moves, the firm solicits Wall Street brokerage houses a day or so in advance, looking for the best package price to carry out the trades.  The broker winning the business doesn't charge commissions, but instead profits by buying or selling for less than the overall package price.  That puts the broker at risk if it's trying to buy stock in a rising market.  In Tuesday's gyrating session, the Dow Jones Industrial Average fell by 80 points early in the day, but finished with less than a four-point loss.  Renaissance's last portfolio shift, carried out by Goldman, Sachs & Co., was a highly publicized decision last January to sell its entire stock portfolio and buy Treasury bills.  The sell signal, which sent a bearish chill through the stock market, came when Renaissance's computer found that stocks were overpriced compared with bonds and Treasury bills.  At the time, the Dow Jones Industrial Average stood at about 2200.  The Dow average now stands more than 20% higher, while Renaissance's portfolio of Treasurys produced a return of about 6% through the first three quarters of the year.  The computer's miscalculation has been painful for Renaissance.  Almost any money manager holding stocks has turned in better results, while Renaissance has played it safe with Treasury bills.  So why does Renaissance's computer like stocks with the Dow at 2653.28, where it closed yesterday, when it didn't with the Dow at 2200?  "With the decline in stock prices and continued low or stable interest rates, stocks are representing a better value all the time," Renaissance President Frank W. Terrizzi said yesterday.  Three-month T-bill yields have fallen to 7.8% from about 9% at the start of the year.  Stock prices, meanwhile, are about 140 points lower than the peak of 2791.41 reached on the Dow industrial average Oct. 9.  Are those declines enough to signal a partial return to stocks?  Mr. Terrizzi won't say specifically, explaining that if there was such a move, it would take about three days to complete the loose ends of the transaction.  During that time, a buyer with the clout of a Renaissance could end up driving up the price of stocks it was trying to buy if it tipped its hand.  But everything is relative to Mr. Terrizzi, so stocks in his view can become more attractive in comparison with bonds or T-bills, even if shares are more expensive than when they were sold in January.  "Our {computer} model has a certain trigger point," he said.  When the computer says switch, Renaissance switches.  The firm has made 17 previous shifts from one type of asset to another in its 10-year history.  Almost all have involved at least half and often the firm's entire portfolio, as the computer searches for the most undervalued investment category, following a money-management style called tactical asset allocation.  Competing asset-allocation firms march to their own computer models, so some have been partly or fully invested in stocks this year while Renaissance has sat on the sidelines.  As a result, competitors say Renaissance has been looking for any opportunity to return to the stock market, rather than risk losing business by continuing to remain fully invested in Treasury bills.  Mr. Terrizzi confirms some clients have left Renaissance, but no major ones, and the firm has added new accounts.  David Evans, who last week resigned as president and chief executive of Qintex Entertainment Inc. "for personal reasons" just as the company filed for bankruptcy-law protection, has been temporarily reappointed to both positions, the company said.  Qintex Entertainment also said Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer Jonathan Lloyd, 37 years old, would join the nine-member board.  He succeeds Roger Kimmel, who resigned last week saying his participation in evaluating the company's role in buying MGM/UA Communications Co. was no longer necessary.  Mr. Evans will stay until a successor is found, but not later than the end of the year, the company said.  It was the 49-year-old Mr. Evans who had moved into the offices of MGM/UA and run the company during Qintex Australia Ltd.'s aborted bid for the movie company.  After MGM/UA terminated the $1.5 billion merger because of a dispute over a $50 million letter of credit, Qintex Entertainment -- which is 43%-owned by Qintex Australia -- found itself facing problems of its own.  And the relationship between Qintex Entertainment and the Australian company appears to be quickly deteriorating.  On Oct. 19, Qintex Entertainment was about to default on a $5.9 million payment owed to MCA Inc. in connection with the distribution of a television program.  Qintex Entertainment was depending on Qintex Australia to arrange financing.  But early on Oct. 19, the second of two hectic days of board meetings, Mr. Evans said he believed Qintex Australia wouldn't be forthcoming.  He recommended that the company file for protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code before the MCA deadline, according to a source familiar with the sessions.  But a majority of the board, which includes three members from the Australian company, overrode him.  Mr. Evans resigned.  Later in the day, according to the source, the board reversed itself, decided to file for bankruptcy protection, and asked Mr. Evans to stay on.  Mr. Evans told the board he needed the weekend to think about it.  Mr. Evans couldn't be reached yesterday for comment.  Last Monday, Qintex Australia announced a restructuring plan and said it would sell off assets.  Last week the company indicated it would cut back on the working capital it would supply to Qintex Entertainment.  Separately, a Qintex Entertainment shareholder filed suit in federal court in Los Angeles charging Qintex Australia with misleading shareholders about Qintex Entertainment's financial position.  Qintex Australia said it hadn't seen the suit and couldn't comment.  The Sept. 25 "Tracking Travel" column advises readers to "Charge With Caution When Traveling Abroad" because credit-card companies charge 1% to convert foreign-currency expenditures into dollars.  In fact, this is the best bargain available to someone traveling abroad.  In contrast to the 1% conversion fee charged by Visa, foreign-currency dealers routinely charge 7% or more to convert U.S. dollars into foreign currency.  On top of this, the traveler who converts his dollars into foreign currency before the trip starts will lose interest from the day of conversion.  At the end of the trip, any unspent foreign exchange will have to be converted back into dollars, with another commission due.  The card holder will pay the modest 1% fee only on the amounts actually needed.  Typically, he will be billed only several weeks after the expenditure, and then has another couple of weeks before he has to pay the bill.  In the meantime, the money can continue to earn interest for the card holder -- often more than 1% during that "float" period alone.  Daniel Brigham  Visa U.S.A. Inc.  San Francisco  MGM Grand Inc. has agreed to pay $93 million and nearly 1.8 million common shares to buy 117 acres of land along the Las Vegas, Nev., Strip as a site for its planned movie-studio and theme-park resort.  Of the total purchase price, $50 million cash and $30 million in stock (nearly 1.8 million shares) would be paid to buy the existing 700-room Marina Hotel & Casino from Southwest Securities, a Nevada limited partnership.  The remaining properties to be acquired are the Tropicana Country Club & Golf Course, a facility jointly owned by Ramada Inc., of Phoenix, Ariz., and the Jaffe family, and a small parcel owned by MGM Grand director James D. Aljian.  The purchase price was disclosed in a preliminary prospectus issued in connection with MGM Grand's planned offering of six million common shares.  The luxury airline and casino company, 98.6%-owned by investor Kirk Kerkorian and his Tracinda Corp., earlier this month announced its agreements to acquire the properties, but didn't disclose the purchase price.  The proposed stock offering and issuance of nearly 1.8 million common shares in connection with the land purchase will bring MGM Grand's total shares outstanding to 28.7 million, of which 72% will be owned by Mr. Kerkorian and Tracinda, according to the prospectus.  In over-the-counter trading, MGM Grand was bid at $17.50 a share.  Proceeds from the offering are expected to be used for remodeling the company's Desert Inn resort in Las Vegas, refurbishing certain aircraft of the MGM Grand Air unit, and to acquire the property for the new resort.  The company said it estimates the Desert Inn remodeling will cost about $32 million, and the refurbishment of the three DC-8-62 aircraft, made by McDonnell Douglas Corp., will cost around $24.5 million.  MGM Grand said the latest stock offering won't cover the $600 million or more cost of building the proposed resort and theme park, and added it will need to seek additional financing, either through bank borrowings or debt and equity offerings, at a later date.  Construction is set to begin in early 1991.  The resort will include the MGM Grand Hotel, a multi-spired, castle-like facility that will include 5,000 rooms and 85,000 square feet of casino space.  The facility will be marketed toward families, and room rates will be between $35 and $55 a night, MGM Grand said.  The prospectus didn't include many details about the studio and theme park, although conceptual drawings, released this month, show that it may feature several "themed" areas similar to those found at parks built by Walt Disney Co.  Investors poured $2.8 billion more into money-market mutual funds in the latest week despite further declines in yields.  Assets of the 400 taxable funds tracked by IBC/Donoghue's Money Fund Report jumped to $351.2 billion in the week ended Tuesday, the Holliston, Mass.-based newsletter said.  Assets soared $4.5 billion in the previous week.  Meanwhile, the average yield on taxable funds dropped nearly a tenth of a percentage point, the largest drop since midsummer.  The average seven-day compound yield, which assumes that dividends are reinvested and that current rates continue for a year, fell to 8.47%, its lowest since late last year, from 8.55% the week before, according to Donoghue's.  "Lower yields are just reflecting lower short-term interest rates," said Brenda Malizia Negus, editor of Money Fund Report.  Money funds invest in such things as short-term Treasury securities, commercial paper and certificates of deposit, all of which have been posting lower interest rates since last spring.  Individual investors can still get better yields on money funds than on many other short-term instruments.  The yield on six-month Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction, for example, was just 7.77%.  The average yield on six-month CDs of $50,000 or less at major banks was 7.96% in the week ended Tuesday, according to Banxquote Money Markets, a New York information service.  One way that money fund managers boost yields in a declining rate environment is by extending the maturities of their investments, so they can earn the current higher rates for a longer period.  The average maturity of the taxable funds that Donoghue's follows increased by two days in the latest week to 40 days, its longest since August.  "They're anticipating further declines in rates and they're going to get them, slowly," said Walter Frank, chief economist for the Donoghue Organization, publisher of Money Fund Report.  Average maturity was as short as 29 days at the start of this year, when short-term interest rates were moving steadily upward.  The average seven-day compound yield of the funds reached 9.62% in late April.  The highest-yielding funds are still above 9%.  The top-performing fund in the latest week was Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar, with a seven-day compound yield of 9.45%.  The fund invests heavily in dollar-denominated money-market securities overseas.  It is currently waiving management fees, which contributes to the higher yield.  The average seven-day simple yield of the 400 funds fell to 8.14% from 8.21%, Donoghue's reported.  The average 30-day simple yield slid to 8.22% from 8.26%, and the average 30-day compound yield fell to 8.56% from 8.60%.  Many small investors are facing a double whammy this year: They got hurt by investing in the highly risky junk bond market, and the pain is worse because they did it with borrowed money.  These people invested in "leveraged" junk bond mutual funds, the publicly traded funds that make a habit of taking out loans to buy extra junk.  It's a good strategy in a rising market, where a 25% leveraged portfolio in effect allows investors to have 125% of their money working for them.  The strategy boosts current yield by putting more bonds into the portfolio.  Trouble is, junk bond prices have been weak for months.  Thus, the leverage has amplified the funds' portfolio losses.  And shares of leveraged junk funds this year have been clobbered even harder than the junk bonds they hold.  "That's really where the leverage hurt," says Thomas Herzfeld, a Miami-based investment manager who specializes in closed-end funds.  "Share prices performed even worse than the funds' asset values because fear has taken hold" in the junk market, he says.  Leverage is never a problem for the traditional "open end" mutual funds, which aren't publicly traded and aren't allowed to use leverage at all.  Leverage is used only by some of the closed-end funds.  The usual maneuver is to borrow against the portfolio value or issue preferred stock, using the proceeds to buy additional bonds.  The fallout for investors lately has been painful.  Consider the New America High Income Fund.  With a leveraged position of about 45%, the fund's share price has plunged 28.5% so far this year.  That's worse than the price drop sustained by the bonds in its portfolio, whose total return (bond-price changes plus interest) has amounted to a negative 6.08%.  Such problems may not be over.  Leveraged funds in particular "are still extremely vulnerable, because we're still at the beginning of problems in the junk market," says George Foot, a managing partner at Newgate Management Associates in Northampton, Mass.  Many investors are unaware their funds have borrowed to speculate in such a risky market.  "If someone actually sat down and thought about what they were being sold," says Gerald Perritt, editor of the Mutual Fund Letter in Chicago, they might shy away.  In a typical leverage strategy, a fund tries to capture the spread between what it costs to borrow and the higher return on the bonds it buys with the borrowed money.  If the market surges, holders can make that much more profit; the leverage effectively acts as an interest-free margin account for investors.  But when the market moves against the fund, investors lose more than other junk holders because the market decline is magnified by the amount the fund is leveraged.  Fund managers, for their part, defend their use of leverage.  Carl Ericson, who runs the Colonial Intermediate High Income Fund, says the fund's 25% leverage has jacked up its interest income.  "As long as I am borrowing at 9.9% and each {bond} yields over that, it enhances the yield," he maintains.  Mr. Ericson says he tries to offset the leverage by diversifying the fund's portfolio.  Yet some funds have pulled in their horns.  New America High Income Fund recently said that it plans to reduce its leverage position by buying back $5 million in preferred stock and notes from investors.  The fund made a similar move earlier this year.  "We are trying to increase our flexibility," says Ellen E. Terry, a vice president at Ostrander Capital Management, the fund's investment adviser.  She declined to elaborate and wouldn't disclose the fund's recent purchases, sales or cash position.  Ms. Terry did say the fund's recent performance "illustrates what happens in a leveraged product" when the market doesn't cooperate.  "When the market turns around," she says, "it will give a nice picture" of how leverage can help performance.  Several leveraged funds don't want to cut the amount they borrow because it would slash the income they pay shareholders, fund officials said.  But a few funds have taken other defensive steps.  Some have raised their cash positions to record levels.  High cash positions help buffer a fund when the market falls.  Prospect Street High Income Portfolio, for instance, now holds about 15% in cash and equivalents, nearly quintuple the amount it held earlier this year, says John Frabotta, portfolio co-manager.  He says the fund, which is 40% leveraged, has maintained a "substantial cushion" between its borrowing costs and the yields of the portfolio's bonds.  "I don't want to be in a position to have to sell," Mr. Frabotta says.  Other funds have recently sold weak junk bonds to raise cash.  At the 50%-leveraged Zenith Income Fund, portfolio manager John Bianchi recently dumped Mesa Petroleum, Wickes and Horsehead Industries, among others, to raise his cash position to a record 15%.  "That's a problem because cash isn't earning us very much money," Mr. Bianchi says.  He concedes: "This is the most difficult market that I've been involved in."  Because of the recent junk-market turmoil, the fund is considering investing in other issues instead, including mortgage-backed bonds.  "We're looking at the leverage factor every day," says Robert Moore, president of Bernstein-Macaulay Inc., a Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. unit and the fund's adviser.  "At some point, if we are unable to cover our leveraged cost -- and at the moment we're right on it -- we're going to have to make a move."  ---  @ Leverage Slams Some Junk-Fund Shares  @ PERFORMANCE*  @ ------------------------  @ TOTAL FUNDS  @ LEVERAGE RETURN** SHARE PRICE  @ New America High Inc. -- Ostrander Cap Mgt.  @ 45% - 6.08% -28.53%  @ Prospect St. High Inc. -- Prospect St. Inv.  @ 40% -11.44 -23.28  @ CIM High Yield Secs. -- Chancellor Trust  @ 4% - 4.25 -15.95  @ High Income Adv.  Tr. -- InterCapital  @ None - 9.94 -15.95  @ High Income Adv.  Tr.  II -- InterCapital  @ None - 6.00 -10.68  @ Colonial Int.  Hi Inc. -- Colonial Mgt.  @ 25% + 0.87 - 5.14  @ CIGNA High Income Shs. -- CIGNA Investments  @ 25% - 1.10 + 3.15  @ Zenith Income Fund -- Bernstein-Macaulay  @ 50% - 7.05 - 0.66  @ Merrill Lynch High-Yield index  @ + 4.80  @ *Year to date, through Oct. 20  @ **Price change, plus interest income  @ Source: Thomas J. Herzfeld Advisors Inc.  One of the more bizarre garden stories since Eden has been unfolding for four years now, in the private paper-and-crayon fantasies of artist Jennifer Bartlett.  And if she and the Battery Park City Authority have their way, her horticulturally inept plan will soon go public as a real garden "artwork" in the downtown complex.  South Gardens, as the Bartlett scheme is called, will occupy the last 3.5 acres of open space at the southwest tip of Manhattan.  It could cost taxpayers $15 million to install and BPC residents $1 million a year to maintain.  Created by an artist who flaunts her ignorance of plants and gardens, South Gardens, as now planned, will die from congestive garden design.  Ms. Bartlett's previous work, which earned her an international reputation in the non-horticultural art world, often took gardens as its nominal subject.  Mayhap this metaphorical connection made the BPC Fine Arts Committee think she had a literal green thumb. (Ms.  Bartlett would not discuss her garden for this article.)  Last year she boasted to HG magazine: "I'd never looked at a garden in my life."  And she proved no shirking violet in her initial statement to the BPCA, a New York State public benefit corporation: "The only thing I was interested in doing was a very complicated garden, which would cost an enormous amount of money and be very expensive to maintain."  Undeterred, the BPCA hired Ms. Bartlett and another confessed garden ignoramus, the architect Alexander Cooper, who claimed he had never visited, much less built, a garden, and said of the project, "I don't view this as a landscape.  I view this as a building."  The third principal in the South Gardens adventure did have garden experience.  The firm of Bruce Kelly/David Varnell Landscape Architects had created Central Park's Strawberry Fields and Shakespeare Garden.  The BPCA called its team a "stunning" collaboration.  After four years, though, the South Gardens design is 100% uncollaborated Jennifer Bartlett.  She has done little more than recycle her standard motifs -- trees, water, landscape fragments, rudimentary square houses, circles, triangles, rectangles -- and fit them into a grid, as if she were making one of her gridded two-dimensional works for a gallery wall.  But for South Gardens, the grid was to be a 3-D network of masonry or hedge walls with real plants inside them.  In a letter to the BPCA, kelly/varnell called this "arbitrary and amateurish."  The landscape architects were expelled from the garden in July.  All the while, Ms. Bartlett had been busy at her assignment, serene in her sense of self-tilth.  As she put it in a 1987 lecture at the Harvard Graduate School of Design: "I have designed a garden, not knowing the difference between a rhododendron and a tulip."  Moreover, she proclaimed that "landscape architects have been going wrong for the last 20 years" in the design of open space.  And she further stunned her listeners by revealing her secret garden design method: Commissioning a friend to spend "five or six thousand dollars . . . on books that I ultimately cut up."  After that, the layout had been easy.  "I've always relied heavily on the grid and found it never to fail."  Ms. Bartlett told her audience that she absolutely did not believe in compromise or in giving in to the client "because I don't think you can do watered-down versions of things." (This was never a problem with South Gardens, because the client had long since given in to Ms. Bartlett's every whim.)  Last year the public was afforded a preview of Ms. Bartlett's creation in a tablemodel version, at a BPC exhibition.  The labels were breathy: "Within its sheltering walls is a microcosm of a thousand years in garden design . . . a rose garden, herb garden, serpentine garden, flower fields, an apple orchard . . . organized in a patchwork of 50-by-50-foot squares to form `rooms' . . . here and there are simple architectural forms, a whimsical jet of water, a conceit of topiary or tartan plaid, and chairs of every sort to drag around. . . .  At the core of it all is a love for plants."  Plant lovers who studied the maquette were alarmed.  They looked at the miniature and saw a giant folly.  Ms. Bartlett's little rooms left little room for plants or people.  Kelly/Varnell had put South Gardens' carrying capacity at four people per room, or about 100 humans overall.  This mincemeat of tiny gridlocked squares was inspired by the artist's own digs: "My loft was 50 by 100 feet, so 50 feet by 50 feet seemed like a good garden room."  Inside the grid were 24 of these plant cells jammed full of clutter.  One she made into a topiary rec room, replete with plants shaped into a Barcalounger, TV, piano and chairs.  In another, she requisitioned topiary MX missile cones -- costing $10,000 each -- in heights up to 20 feet.  Another she stuffed with eight "rectilinear hedges" for a topiary geometry lesson in the right-angling of plants.  In the herbal lounge she specified a "plaid knot garden" decor.  She ordered the foyer done in a different plaid planting, and made the landscape architects study a book on tartans.  In one garden roomette she implanted a 43-foot square glass cube meant to show off a plaid tile floor conceit, a "zinc sink," a "huge fishbowl with carp" and a "birdcage with cockatoos."  Next door she put a smaller plaid-floored glass house, where, she suggested, a flat of strawberries might be displayed in the dead of winter.  In another compartment called the Linden Bosque, 62 linden trees were to be crowded together at killing intervals of 10 or 16 feet. (Lindens need about 36 feet.)  One thing about the Bartlett plan was never in doubt: It would demand the full-time skills of a battalion of topiary barbers, rosarians, orchardists and arborists.  Ms. Bartlett blithely suggested calling upon "semi-skilled garden club workers for maintenance."  Furthermore, she had insisted on paths so narrow (five to eight feet) and hedge corners so square that standard maintenance equipment -- trucks or cherry pickers -- couldn't maneuver.  Then, to make these gardenettes quite literally rooms, Ms. Bartlett had thrown up windowless walls (brick, lattice, hedge) eight to 10 feet tall, casting her interiors into day-long Stygian shade.  It was hard to see how photosynthesis would ever happen in South Gardens without decking the walls in a Christmas-like array of Gro-Lites.  Finally, flouting the BPCA's wishes to continue the popular two-mile riverside Esplanade, prized for its expansive views of New York Harbor, the Statue of Liberty and Ellis Island, Ms. Bartlett threw up yet another wall, this time concrete, this time 10 1/2 feet tall.  She ran it the length of the South Gardens riverfront, blotting out the city's great natural water features, the harbor and the river. (Within her garden, she has decreed a waterfall, a rill, ponds and other costly, trivial waterworks beside the Hudson.)  While the model was still on view, Manhattan Community Board 1 passed a resolution against South Gardens.  The Parks Council wrote the BPCA that this "too `private' . . . exclusive," complex and expensive "enclosed garden . . . belongs in almost any location but the waterfront."  Lynden B. Miller, the noted public garden designer who restored Central Park's Conservatory Garden, recalls her reaction to the South Gardens model in light of the public garden she was designing for 42nd Street's Bryant Park: "Bryant Park, as designed in 1933, failed as a public space, because it made people feel trapped.  By removing the hedges and some walls, the Bryant Park Restoration is opening it up.  It seems to me the BPCA plan has the potential of making South Gardens a horticultural jail for people and plants."  The three urban horticulture experts with Cornell Cooperative Extension weighed in with a letter to the BPCA that began: "We feel that the garden is horticulturally doomed."  They then addressed the decidedly "questionable safety of . . . a complex garden of endless hiding places.  The 8 ft. hedges which obstruct views in and out of small `rooms' insure . . . that this garden will be a potential breeding ground for crime." (At Harvard, Ms. Bartlett had declared: "There are going to be problems with safety . . .  I'm not going to address questions of safety]")  Despite the dire assessments of knowledgeable garden professionals, Ms. Bartlett's South Gardens design somehow continues on, seemingly impervious to reason, stalled only by bureaucratic lethargy and logistical complications.  BPCA President and CEO David Emil hopes to negotiate a seawall that could "be significantly more visually permeable."  And by substituting yet another landscape architect, Nicholas Quennell, he insists he can achieve that and other accommodations to gardening reality while still preserving the "artistic vision" of a "truly great artist."  After four years of no progress in this direction, it is doubtful any viable collaboration with Ms. Bartlett will suddenly now be possible. (Mr.  Quennell has said he plans to go with the grid, regardless.) There is still time, however, for Gov. Mario Cuomo or Fabian Palomino, chairman of the BPCA board, to prevent this topiary "Tilted Arc."  These statesmen might take counsel from William Robinson, author of "The English Flower Garden" -- the gardener's bible since 1883 -- who seems to have had a Jennifer Bartlett in mind when he wrote: "Unhappily, our gardeners for ages have suffered at the hands of the decorative artist when applying his `designs' to the garden. . . .  It is this adapting of absurd `knots' and patterns from old books to any surface where a flower garden has to be made that leads to bad and frivolous design -- wrong in plan and hopeless for the life of plants."  I read the exerpts of Wayne Angell's exchange with a Gosbank representative ("Put the Soviet Economy on Golden Rails," editorial page, Oct. 5) with great interest, since the gold standard is one of my areas of research.  Mr. Angell is incorrect when he states that the Soviet Union's large gold reserves would give it "great power to establish credibility."  During the latter part of the 19th century, Russia was on a gold standard and had gold reserves representing more than 100% of its outstanding currency, but no one outside Russia used rubles.  The Bank of England, on the other hand, had gold reserves that averaged about 30% of its outstanding currency, and Bank of England notes were accepted throughout the world.  The most likely reason for this disparity is that the Bank of England was a private bank with substantial earning assets, and the common-law rights of creditors to collect claims against the bank were well established in Britain.  By contrast, in 19th-century Russia an authoritarian government owned the bank and had the power to revoke payment whenever it chose, much as it would in today's Soviet Union.  The success of the British gold standard was due to independent private banking and common law, rather than the choice of gold for valuing the currency.  It is no coincidence that from 1844 to 1914, when the Bank of England was an independent private bank, the pound was never devalued and payment of gold for pound notes was never suspended, but with the subsequent nationalization of the Bank of England, the pound was devalued with increasing frequency and its use as an international medium of exchange declined.  The Soviet Union should keep these lessons in mind as it seeks to establish the ruble as an international currency.  One way to make the ruble into a major international currency would be to leave reserves of gold and earning assets in a Swiss bank with distributions based on Swiss laws.  Unless the laws determining the noteholder's rights to payment are independent of the issuer of those notes, however, a gold-based ruble would be as unsuccessful for the Soviets as it was for the czars.  Christopher R. Petruzzi  Professor of Taxation  California State University  Fullerton, Calif.  Wednesday, October 25, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 3/4% high, 8 11/16% low, 8 3/4% near closing bid, 8 13/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.45% 30 to 44 days; 8.20% 45 to 67 days; 8.325% 68 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.50% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.55% 30 days; 8.45% 60 days; 8.40% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.09% one month; 8.09% two months; 8.06% three months; 8% six months; 7.94% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.53% one month; 8.45% three months; 8.27% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.47% 30 days; 8.30% 60 days; 8.27% 90 days; 8.08% 120 days; 7.98% 150 days; 7.90% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% one month; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% two months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% three months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% four months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/ 16% five months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 11/16% one month; 8 5/8% three months; 8 7/16% six months; 8 3/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 9%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 15%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, October 23, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.52% 13 weeks; 7.50% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.75%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 7.875%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.68%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.70%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.62%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Securities and Exchange Commission Chairman Richard Breeden told a congressional subcommittee that he would consider imposing "circuit breakers" to halt program trading at volatile times.  Mr. Breeden, in his first testimony to Congress since taking the SEC post, said the agency is studying the Friday the 13th market plunge, including how current circuit breakers affected the market that day and the following Monday.  After the study, the SEC would be willing to consider adding new circuit breakers or fine-tuning the current ones, he added.  Circuit breakers, designed to give the markets a breather in cases of sharp price movements, curb trading of futures or stocks at various trigger points.  At certain points during the Friday the 13th drop, circuit breakers kicked in on the futures market, slowing trading at times.  A circuit breaker that would have closed down the New York Stock Exchange wasn't tripped.  Rep. Edward Markey (D., Mass.), chairman of the House Telecommunications and Finance Subcommittee, is pushing the idea of a circuit breaker for computer-driven program trading in hopes that would curb "turmoil" in the marketplace.  He argued that program-trading by roughly 15 big institutions is pushing around the markets and scaring individual investors.  Mr. Breeden didn't reject the proposal.  After the SEC study of the drop is completed, he said, "I'm perfectly happy to work with this committee . . . in identifying whether we need other devices," such as a program-trading curb.  Mr. Breeden backed most of the provisions in a market-reform bill that the SEC brought to the subcommittee last year under then-chairman David Ruder.  The measure is expected to move through this Congress.  But the new chairman vehemently opposed a provision in the bill that would give the agency the right to close the markets at times of stress.  Mr. Breeden contended that uncertainty over when the SEC might act could worsen volatility in the markets.  He argued that the current circuit-breaker system allows investors to know "precisely when and where any trading interruptions will occur and how long they will last."  Mr. Breeden offered strong support for two other provisions in the bill.  One would force brokerage houses to provide the SEC detailed information about loans made by their holding companies.  Such loans often are used to finance leveraged buy-outs, and the agency is worried that a sharp market drop could create capital problems for the firms.  He also backed a rule to require large traders to report transactions on a systematic basis.  That information, he argued, is critical to reconstructing sharp market moves, such as the one nearly two weeks ago.  In a rare package sale of its real estate, K mart Corp., Troy, Mich., has sold 17 of its strip shopping centers to a limited partnership led by New York developer Philip Pilevsky, according to sources familiar with the transaction.  They estimate the value of the transaction at close to $100 million.  K mart officials and Mr. Pilevsky wouldn't comment on the sale.  K mart previously had announced it would report its third consecutive decline in quarterly earnings for the period ended yesterday, the same day the real estate deal was completed.  Analysts are estimating third-quarter earnings will drop between 13% and 20% to about 50 to 55 cents per share, compared with 63 cents per share in the year-ago quarter.  It is unclear what effect the sale of the shopping centers will have on earnings.  K mart developed the centers, which range in size from about 150,000 square feet to just over 250,000 square feet.  Most are anchored by a K mart store.  The retailer reportedly will lease its stores back from the developer, who plans to expand the small centers.  The centers comprise a total of about 1.6 million square feet of retail space.  They are spread around the country and include locations in California, Florida, Washington and Arizona.  Mr. Pilevsky, who heads Philips International Holding Corp., a New York-based real estate company, owns more than a dozen other shopping centers in which K mart is a tenant.  The company is active in office and residential development in New York.  However, nationally, Mr. Pilevsky controls through limited partnerships about 85 shopping centers with about 17 million square feet.  K mart runs 2,200 K mart stores, primarily in leased facilities.  The company typically sells the centers it develops, but has usually sold only one or several at a time.  Motorola is fighting back against junk mail.  So much of the stuff poured into its Austin, Texas, offices that its mail rooms there simply stopped delivering it.  Now, thousands of mailers, catalogs and sales pitches go straight into the trash.  "We just don't have the staff to {deliver} it, nor do we have the space or the time," says a spokesman for the Schaumburg, Ill., electronics company, which has 5,000 employees in the Austin area.  "It's the overload problem and the weight problem we have."  Motorola is in good company.  Businesses across the country are getting fed up with junk mail, and some are saying they just aren't going to take it anymore -- literally.  While no one has tracked how many company mail rooms throw out junk mail, direct-mail advertising firms say the number is growing.  General Motors earlier this year said it wouldn't deliver bulk mail or free magazines in its Flint, Mich., office, while Air Products & Chemicals, Allentown, Pa., says it screens junk mail and often throws out most of a given mass mailing.  Why the revolt?  Anybody with a mailbox can answer that: sheer, overwhelming, mind-numbing volume.  According to the Direct Marketing Association, total direct mail -- to both businesses and consumers -- jumped 50% to 65.4 billion pieces in 1988 from five years earlier.  Though direct mail to businesses isn't broken out separately, the association says it's growing even faster.  The deluge has spurred cost-conscious companies to action, with mail rooms throwing the stuff out rather than taking the time or money to deliver it.  The direct-mail industry, not surprisingly, is fuming at the injustice of it all.  After all, this is the industry that has a hard enough time getting any respect, that is the butt of so many jokes that television's "L.A.  Law" portrays direct-mail-mogul David as short, bald, intensely nerdy, and unremittingly boring.  The practice of businesses throwing out junk mail "is a commonly known problem, and it's increasing as companies attempt to put through budget cuts across the board," right down to the mail-room level, says Stephen Belth, a list consultant and chairman of the Direct Marketing Association's business-to-business council.  "But it's like biting the hand that feeds them, because every one of these companies uses direct marketing."  It's almost impossible to track the number of companies trashing junk mail, since the decision is usually made in the mail room -- not the board room.  And the practice often varies from location to location even within a company.  But industry executives say businesses seem especially inclined to dump mailers sent to titles rather than to individual names.  Motorola's Austin operation was one of the first to lose patience, deciding a few years ago to junk any bulk mail that wasn't addressed to an individual.  Magazines aren't delivered at all, even if an individual's name is listed; employees who want their magazines have to pick them up from the mail room or the company library -- and are told to change the subscriptions to their home addresses.  At Air Products, meanwhile, the mailroom staff opens junk mail and often throws it away -- even if addressed to an individual.  "If they get 50 packets of something, they open one, see what it says, throw 48 away and send two to people or departments they think are appropriate," a spokesman says.  Direct marketers were especially alarmed when General Motors -- one of the country's largest companies and a big direct-mail user itself -- entered the junk-mail battle.  As of March 1, its Flint office, with about 2,500 employees, stopped delivering bulk mail and non-subscription magazines.  Employees were told that if they really wanted the publications, they would have to have them sent home instead.  The reason: overload, especially of non-subscription magazines.  Direct-mail executives see GM's stand as an ominous sign -- even if the junk-mail kings did bring it on themselves.  "Why anyone would want to close themselves off {from direct mail}, a priori, doesn't make any sense," says Michael Bronner of Bronner Slosberg Associates, a Boston directmail firm.  "It smacks of big brotherism.  They're going to decide what their employees can or cannot read."  The practice is, however, legal in most cases.  Jack Ellis, a U.S. postal inspector in New York, says the Postal Service's only job is to deliver the mail to the mail room; once it gets there, a company can do with it what it wishes.  The junk-mail titans, ever optimistic, are looking for ways around the problem.  So far, they say, it hasn't had any noticeable effect on response rates.  And before it does, they're trying to cut back on the clutter that created the situation in the first place.  Among other things, the industry is trying to come up with standardized business lists that cut down on duplications.  "We're going to have to mail a lot less and a lot smarter," says Jack Miller, president of Quill Corp., a Lincolnshire, Ill., business-to-business mail-order company.  But then again, mailing less and smarter won't be much help if the mail ends up in the garbage anyway.  ---  New Hyundai Campaign  Hyundai Motor America, fighting quality complaints, declining sales and management turmoil, yesterday unveiled its 1990 ad strategy, tagged "We're Making More Sense Than Ever."  The ad campaign, created by Saatchi & Saatchi's Backer Spielvogel Bates agency, is an extension of the auto company's "Cars That Make Sense" campaign, which emphasized affordability.  TV ads plugging the company's new V-6 Sonata and its souped-up Excel subcompact will begin appearing Monday.  One spot shows a Sonata next to a rival midsized car, and an announcer says, "Listen to what they're saying about the Hyundai Sonata."  As the announcer reads favorable quotes about the model from Motor Trend and Road & Track magazines, the other car, which is white, slowly turns green.  "No wonder the competition's green with envy," the announcer says.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   ACQUISITION: EWDB, formed by the merger of Eurocom and Della Femina McNamee WCRS, said it agreed to buy Vizeversa, an agency in Barcelona.  Terms weren't disclosed.  HOLIDAY ADS: Seagram will run two interactive ads in December magazines promoting its Chivas Regal and Crown Royal brands.  The Chivas ad illustrates -- via a series of pullouts -- the wild reactions from the pool man, gardener and others if not given Chivas for Christmas.  The three-page Crown Royal ad features a black-and-white shot of a boring holiday party -- and a set of colorful stickers with which readers can dress it up.  Both ads were designed by Omnicom's DDB Needham agency.  Senate Democrats who favor cutting the capital-gains tax aren't ready to line up behind the leading Senate proposal.  Their reluctance to support the proposal is another blow to the capital-gains cut, which has had a roller-coaster existence since the beginning of the year, when it was considered dead and then suddenly revived and was passed by the House.  Nevertheless, Oregon Sen. Bob Packwood, the ranking GOP member on the tax-writing Senate Finance Committee, last night introduced his plan as an amendment to a pending measure authorizing U.S. aid for Poland and Hungary.  Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell (D., Maine) was confident he had enough votes to block the maneuver on procedural grounds, perhaps as soon as today.  Mr. Packwood all but conceded defeat, telling Mr. Mitchell: "I sense at this stage you may have the votes."  The two lawmakers sparred in a highly personal fashion, violating usual Senate decorum.  Their tone was good-natured, with Mr. Packwood saying he intended to offer the proposal again and again on future legislation and Sen. Mitchell saying he intended to use procedural means to block it again and again.  Although the proposal, authored by Mr. Packwood and Sen. William Roth (R., Del.), appears to have general backing by Republicans, their votes aren't sufficient to pass it.  And Democrats, who are under increasing pressure from their leaders to reject the gains-tax cut, are finding reasons to say no, at least for now.  A major reason is that they believe the Packwood-Roth plan would lose buckets of revenue over the long run.  The Packwood-Roth proposal would reduce the tax depending on how long an asset was held.  It also would create a new individual retirement account that would shield from taxation the appreciation on investments made for a wide variety of purposes, including retirement, medical expenses, first-home purchases and tuition.  "A number of us are not going to touch capital gains, IRAs or anything else unless it contributes to deficit-reduction," said Sen. Charles Robb (D., Va.), who is one of the 10 to 20 Democrats who the Bush administration believes might favor giving preferential treatment to capital gains.  President Bush has been hearing this kind of opposition first hand during meetings over the past two days with Democratic senators at the White House.  And at a luncheon meeting Tuesday of Democratic senators, there was outspoken opposition to cutting the capital-gains tax this year, according to participants.  The trend is making advocates of the tax cut less optimistic about success.  "There is a one-out-of-three shot of getting it this year," said Sen. David Boren of Oklahoma, a leading Democratic proponent of cutting the capital-gains tax.  He called the battle "uphill."  Other Democrats who favor a capital-gains cut are even more pessimistic.  "There will be no capital-gains bill this year," said Sen. Dale Bumpers (D., Ark.).  "I'm probably not going to vote for any capital-gains proposal.  The IRA portion (of the Packwood-Roth plan) is irresponsible."  Another significant factor in the capitalgains debate is the extent to which it has become a purely political battle between President Bush and Senate Majority Leader Mitchell.  Mr. Mitchell has made clear to his wavering colleagues that the issue is important to him personally.  Today, Sen. Mitchell and other leading Democrats plan to turn up the heat again by holding a news conference to bash the proposal.  Estimates requested by Sen. Mitchell from the Congressional Joint Taxation Committee show that the richest 100 taxpayers got an average benefit from the capital-gains differential of $13 million each in 1985, the last year for which figures are available.  White House officials acknowledged yesterday that Democrats still are reluctant to publicly express support for the Packwood-Roth capital gains proposal because they are loath to buck Sen. Mitchell.  As a result, the officials said they are open to making a variety of deals with Senate Democrats to win their support for a capital-gains tax cut.  Democrats asked in this week for discussions with President Bush have suggested ways of "tinkering" with the Packwood-Roth proposal, suggesting an interest in looking for a modified version they can back, one official said.  In addition, White House aides think that there are numerous other important measures Democrats badly wanted passed -- such as the scaling back of a controversial catastrophic health-care plan for the elderly -- that might provide the president leverage in cutting deals with Democrats.  A capital-gains tax cut might be paired with such measures to help ensure passage.  Other possibilities include a child-care initiative and an increase in the minimum wage.  If they can't secure immediate passage of a capital-gains plan, administration officials also aren't ruling out making a deal with Congress to put off a vote until a firm date in the future, even next year.  But the officials insist that such a deal on a future vote would have to apply to both the House and the Senate.  ---  Gerald F. Seib contributed to this article.  BACK TO CHINA  Japanese immigration authorities said they found 658 more Chinese among Vietnamese boat people, bringing the number of Chinese trying to enter Japan by posing as Vietnamese refugees this year to 1,642.  Japan plans to send the Chinese back home and is negotiating with the Chinese government, a Justice Ministry official said.  The Chinese were among 3,372 boat people supposedly from Vietnam who arrived in Japan this year, compared with 219 for all of 1988, the official said.  The 658 Chinese, who have been in a refugee-assistance center, were sent to immigration facilities yesterday pending deportation to China, the official said.  On Sept. 13, Japan began a policy of screening boat people, accepting only those deemed to be political refugees.  A THEFT IN FRANCE  Francoise Verne, 52-year-old former deputy director of France's mint, faces prison for her theft of some 67 rare coins from the mint's collections.  Second in command from 1979 to 1984, Mrs. Verne told a Paris court that the "great disorder" that reigned at the agency led her into temptation.  Before an inventory in 1984 that showed the "disappearance" of 944 coins valued at about 2.9 million French francs (about $465,000), there hadn't been any stock-taking since 1868.  Tony Lambert, Mrs. Verne's successor, says the mint's losses from the theft run into the hundreds of thousands of francs.  DESTROYING FOOD  El Salvador is destroying more than 1.6 million pounds of food that had rotted in government warehouses, government officials said.  The state Supply Regulator Institute is to burn rice, corn and beans that spoiled because of neglect and corruption in the previous Christian Democrat government, a statement from the information service SISAL said.  During the past administration the foodstuffs were first bought by the institute, then sold at low prices to "unscrupulous businessmen" who resold them to the institute at inflated prices, the statement said.  NOT A PLEASURE CRUISE  A black-draped cruise liner sailed into Naples yesterday bringing 800 Libyans threatening vengeance if Italy refuses to pay compensation for more than 30 years of colonial rule.  Another 250 Libyans were already in Italy to stage a day of mourning for victims of Italy's colonial rule between 1911 and 1943, when Tripoli says Rome kidnapped 5,000 Libyans and deported them as forced labor.  Libya's revolutionary Committees have threatened attacks on Italians if Rome doesn't pay compensation.  But officials in Rome say the issue was legally resolved by a settlement between Italy and King Idris, deposed by Col. Muammar Gadhafi in 1969.  CANADIAN INDIANS SUE  Canadian Indians are taking five countries to court in a bid to stop low military flights over their homes, the Dutch Defense Ministry said.  Representatives of the Inuit and Cree peoples living in Quebec and Labrador in northeastern Canada told the ministry of the planned action at a meeting, a ministry spokesman said.  They also wanted to prevent a NATO training base being built in the region, he said.  The action, in the Canadian Federal Court, will be against Canada, the Netherlands, West Germany, Britain and the U.S., the ministry spokesman said.  CONTAMINATED MUSHROOMS  Japan suspended imports of French mushrooms after finding some contaminated by radiation, an official of the Ministry of Health and Welfare said.  Japan has been testing imported food from Europe since the April 1986 Chernobyl accident in the Soviet Union, the spokesman said.  Since then, the ministry has announced 50 bans on food imports from European countries, including Italy, Spain, Turkey, Greece and the Soviet Union.  FEAR IN VENICE  The Venice city council is battling plans to tap huge gas fields off the coast that it says will speed up the city's slow sinking into its lagoon.  AGIP, the state-owned energy giant, made the announcement about the gas field last month.  Located six miles northeast of Venice, the field contains 875 billion cubic feet of methane gas-one-tenth of Italy's reserves.  Alarmed councilors say the project could jeopardize costly efforts to stop, or slow down, the subsidence that makes Venice subject to regular and destructive flooding.  The council unanimously opposed the idea of AGIP pumping out the methane gas and swiftly appealed to the company and to Prime Minister Giulio Andreotti, who has yet to reply.  AGIP refused to reconsider and says drilling is due to start early next year.  "It's unlikely extracting the gas will cause subsidence," says a spokeswoman.  POSTSCRIPTS . . .  Thieves stole a 12th century fresco from an abandoned church in Camerino, Italy, by removing the entire wall on which the work had been painted, police said. . . .  West Germany's BMW commissioned the Nuremberg post office to test a prototype battery-powered car.  The vehicle has a top speed of 65 miles an hour and requires recharging from a standard wall socket every 100 miles.  Total Assets Protection Inc., rebounding from its earlier loss, expects to report earnings from operations of about $200,000 for the third quarter, J.C. Matlock, chairman, said.  Net income includes an extraordinary gain of about $100,000 from the reversal of bad debt and interest income.  Revenue was about $4.5 million.  In the 1988 third quarter, the company posted a net loss of $876,706, or 22 cents a share, on revenue of about $5.1 million.  Total Assets plans and designs computer centers, computer security systems and computer backup systems.  Regarding your Oct. 4 page-one article "Bad Blood" on the generic-drug battle: The Epilepsy Institute is not just a patient-advocacy organization.  It is primarily a certified outpatient treatment facility providing comprehensive services to people with epilepsy and their families.  The institute's advocacy efforts are based on the needs of the population it serves and represents.  In 1985, the Medical Tribune reported that a growing number of critics are challenging the FDA bioequivalence-therapeutic-equivalence equation.  "They contend it is based on an assumption that has not yet been proven in valid tests," the Tribune said.  In 1986, some institute patients were reporting breakthrough seizures when they were switched from a specific brand-name medication to a generic one or from one generic manufacturer of a specific product to another.  In addition, neurologists were beginning to report these observations as well.  Call it anecdotal if you will.  But no ethical physician would switch patients who were doing well on a specific medication from a specific manufacturer to prove a point.  We do not depend on pharmaceutical companies for our support.  The institute has governmental service contracts for the provision of direct patient services; collects patient fees; receives money through contributions from individuals, foundations and bequests.  The funds received from pharmaceutical firms are used to offset physician symposiums, and these symposiums do not stress any particular medication or manufacturer.  The Epilepsy Institute's reporting of breakthrough seizures stemmed from concerns about the people we treat and care about daily.  This perhaps was perceived as a "bold" stance, and thus suspicious.  But let us not confuse profits of big business masquerading as concerns for people's health care or for the cost.  For whom is the saving?  Surely not to people with epilepsy who depend on the same levels of medication in their bloodstream daily to maintain seizure control.  Reina Berner  Executive Director  Arnold M. Katz  President, Board of Directors The Epilepsy Institute New York  Parker Hannifin Corp. said it agreed to sell its three automotive parts divisions to a management-led investor group for $80 million.  The buy-out group is headed by Paul R. Lederer, president of Parker's automotive group, and includes several other executives of the three divisions.  The units are the Edelmann, Ideal and Plews divisions.  Net sales for the units for the fiscal year ended June 30 were $135.6 million.  Parker officials said the company is selling the units to focus on its other businesses.  A volcano will erupt next month on the fabled Strip: a 60-foot mountain spewing smoke and flame every five minutes.  The man-made inferno will tower over a man-made lagoon with more than four acres of pools, grottoes and waterfalls.  Visitors, whisked from the Strip on a moving walkway, will glide over a habitat for rare white tigers, which will star in performances by the famed illusionist team of Siegfried & Roy.  Nearby, six dolphins will frolic in a 1.5 million-gallon saltwater aquarium.  At the core of all this stands a hotel.  In the lobby behind its nine-story, orchid-strewn atrium, a 20,000-gallon aquarium will come alive with sharks, stingrays, angelfish, puffers and other creatures of the deep.  And oh, yes.  There's a casino, the financial heart of it all.  This is the Mirage, a $630 million island-fantasy hotel-casino now being completed for opening in November by Golden Nugget Inc.  It's the most stunning example of Las Vegas's concerted effort to transform itself into a world-famous vacation resort for families as well as gamblers.  Las Vegas has seen nothing quite like it before.  Not for 15 years has a big new hotel-casino opened here.  Now the Mirage and Circus Circus Enterprises Inc.'s $290 million Excalibur are going up.  The Excalibur, with a castlelike hotel, jousting tournaments and other Arthurian attractions, will be able to handle up to 30,000 visitors a day when it opens in 1990.  If MGM Grand Inc. proceeds with its plan for an amusement park -- a $700 million movieland resort with a working studio, casino and 5,000-room hotel that would become Las Vegas's biggest -- the investment in the three properties will total some $1.6 billion.  MGM Grand has agreed to buy a 117-acre site for the resort for $93 million in cash plus stock currently valued at nearly $30 million.  Smaller projects swell the figure to at least $2.5 billion.  Still other projects that have been announced but not yet started could put expenditures above $3 billion over the next few years.  Stephen A. Wynn, who owns 29.4% of Golden Nugget's shares, says the Mirage and other projects will help Las Vegas attract a whole new generation of visitors.  "If you create a wonderment, if you create something so exciting that the public dreams of being part of it, then they'll come," he says.  The projects already under construction will increase Las Vegas's supply of hotel rooms by 11,795, or nearly 20%, to 75,500.  By a rule of thumb of 1.5 new jobs for each new hotel room, Clark County will have nearly 18,000 new jobs.  The county at the end of 1988 had 307,000 jobs, 95,400 of them in the tourist industry.  Projects in the talking or blueprint stage would add a further 48,000 rooms.  Hotel-casino operators play down the possibility of a labor shortage.  After all, 40,000 newcomers a year are settling in the Las Vegas Valley.  But Nevada state labor economists think a shortage is probable.  Nobody yet seems to have calculated the total number of slot machines, crap tables or roulette wheels Las Vegas will add to the enormous store that Lady Luck already guards here, much less the ultimate impact of the growth on schools and municipal services.  "Traffic is certainly a concern, as is pollution, water and an adequate labor market," says Frank Sain, executive director of the Las Vegas Convention and Visitors Bureau.  City fathers have managed to push through projects that are crucial for tourist growth, such as the expansion of McCarran International Airport to accommodate the 44% of Las Vegas tourists who fly here.  This year, by one means of transport or another, more than 18 million people will visit the city.  The expansion will set off a marketing war among the big hotel-casinos.  Las Vegas promises, or threatens, to become a giant carnival, with rooms to be had for $45 a day or less, for visitors uninspired solely by gambling.  Amid a riot of jousting knights, circus clowns, gold-leaf centurions and creatures of the wild, lesser competitors will fall.  Caesars World Inc. plans to defend its august reputation by sinking $190 million into its opulent Caesars Palace, next door to the new Mirage, and adding a $100 million shopping area reminiscent of Rodeo Drive.  The Palace, with its marble fountains and toga parties for high rollers, is already well-known for its Caesarean theme.  The Flamingo Hilton, Imperial Palace, Frontier and others are pouring millions of dollars into facelifts, new room towers and casino floor space just to keep up.  Where's this huge amount of investment capital coming from?  Golden Nugget, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.'s first casino client, has borrowed on more than $600 million worth of mortgage notes, mostly sold to private investors by Drexel, to build the Mirage.  Other casino owners, Circus Circus among them, are financing their expansion with their own cash and revolving credit lines from local lenders such as First Interstate Bank of Nevada.  Will the investments pay off?  The growth of Las Vegas tourism in recent years persuades lenders that they will.  Casino revenues and hotel occupancy rates are high.  Last year, the tourists left $3 billion with the area's casinos, nearly 10% more than in 1987.  The people with a stake in Nevada's gambling industry believe that they have barely tapped the potentially huge family trade.  "If you build a better mousetrap, it will catch more mice," says Fred Benninger, chairman of MGM Grand.  Ellen Cokely, a tourist from Alton, Ill., seems inclined to agree.  "I'd love it if my daughter had something else to do here," says Ms. Cokely, watching seven-year-old Kristin on the water slide at the Strip's Wet `n' Wild water park.  "Two generations ago, Dad came to Las Vegas by himself for a little diversion," says Van Heffner, executive vice president of the Nevada Hotel and Motel Association.  "One generation ago, Mom joined Dad.  Now, in the `90s, we're headed toward a total resort environment."  Only a decade or so ago, casino managers balked at in-room TV sets and other fripperies that distracted from gambling.  Casinos today offer bowling alleys, water parks, golf courses, tennis courts, lush swimming pools and other diversions, and more such facilities are being designed.  Despite the new emphasis on the family trade, however, tourists in search of naughtier fun than gambling seem certain to find it, with Las Vegas call girls remaining on the scene.  A serious economic downturn, pessimists observe, could hurt the expansionists.  For now, however, the naysayers' voices are drowned by the roar of cement mixers and the clanging of construction cranes along the Strip.  This is no place for pedestrians, but at 7:30 on a recent morning, when construction choked traffic at the famous Four Corners intersection to one lane, a taxi passenger found it faster to abandon the cab and walk to her destination.  The ferocious competition probably will drive some poorly managed properties into bankruptcy or new ownership.  It has happened before.  The Dunes, the Aladdin and the Riviera were all acquired by the present owners from bankruptcy proceedings spawned by the last recession, in the early 1980s.  Yet that hasn't discouraged investors.  Some have bought big chunks of Strip property for what may turn into another wave of building.  Atlantic City casino owner Donald Trump is scouting the Las Vegas market with an eye toward building an appropriately spectacular place.  Even before the huge new projects began, the Strip's recent expansion squeezed smaller competitors.  Many blue-collar customers of downtown's no-frills gambling spots have been lured to the Strip or to Laughlin, Nev., a Colorado River town catering to snowbirds and the recreational-vehicle crowd.  Hotel expansion and an influx of more-discriminating tourists have hurt motels.  Since 1979, the number of motel rooms has fallen by 17,000.  Many people here expect a room-rate war as the new projects open.  "There's probably going to be some pressure on occupancy and room rates over the next year, but after that you should see the market return to 80%-plus occupancy and regular rates," says Paul Rubeli, casino executive at Ramada Inc., which runs the Tropicana.  Skeptics wonder whether mega-resorts such as the Mirage will be able to squeeze a profit from their cash flow.  The Mirage will cost at least $1 million a day to operate.  Mr. Wynn seems confident that it will produce a healthy profit, but some securities analysts doubt it.  Competitors and analysts say that among large existing properties Bally Manufacturing Corp.'s Bally Grand hotel-casino probably will be hardest hit among major properties.  Bally officials decline to discuss the situation.  Bally bought the former MGM Grand hotel-casino from Kirk Kerkorian four years ago.  Only now is it undergoing a badly needed facelift.  Its parking lot is inconvenient, the MGM lion's-head logo still appears in places, and customers still call it the Grand, rather than the Bally Grand.  It has a "great location, but they're going to have some real problems when everyone around them opens," says Daniel Lee, a Drexel analyst.  Older properties that still have a 1950s image are also vulnerable.  Any hotel-casino without a strong identity will get whacked by the new competition, says Glenn Schaeffer, senior vice president of Circus Circus.  "If you don't know what you are, bigger won't make you better," he says.  "But it'll sure make you poorer."  Circus Circus's flagship casino has become the envy of competitors for its ability to vacuum cash from the pockets of vacationing families.  The Circus Circus lures them with low room rates, inexpensive buffets and entertainment for children at no extra charge.  The company's Excalibur will also appeal to families, of course.  Its castle, Mr. Schaeffer says, will be "the most compelling piece of folk architecture ever built."  Some casino owners have resisted the temptation to add rooms.  Instead, they are spending to reinforce the identity that they believe attracts their customers.  "More rooms aren't the answer for us," says Caesars World chairman Henry Gluck.  While his company's hotel is building a retail complex in Beverly Hills style and redoing existing rooms, it has decreased the number of its rooms.  Some have been combined into suites for the high rollers.  Caesars has made a specialty of catering to high rollers from abroad, who are also being aggressively courted by the Mirage, the Las Vegas Hilton and others.  Other, smaller concerns are also pursuing market niches -- Hawaiian tourists, for example, or the local trade.  "There's still room for boutique properties," says James Barrett, president of MarCor Resorts Inc. Off the Strip, MarCor is building the Rio, a hotel-casino with a Brazilian theme and only 430 rooms -- all of them suites.  Despite the proliferation of tourist distractions, Las Vegans haven't forgot that gambling is still what the town is all about.  "The days when when the thrust of casinos was all high rollers, with no windows and clocks and lots of red and black decor, are gone," Mr. Sain of the visitors' bureau says.  "But 93% of tourists still come for gambling.  We can't lose sight of that."  NORTH SIDE SAVINGS BANK directors declared an initial dividend of 10 cents a share, payable Dec. 5 to stock of record Nov. 21.  The Floral Park, N.Y., thrift has a strong capital-to-assets ratio, said Vice President Michael D.N. Confer.  At Sept. 30, the thrift, which converted to a stock form of ownership from a mutual form in April 1986, had more than four million shares outstanding.  ARTICLE I, SECTION 7, CLAUSE 2: Every Bill which shall have passed the House of Representatives and the Senate, shall, before it becomes a Law, be presented to the President of the United States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his Objections to that House in which it shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections at large on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it.  If after such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree to pass the Bill, it shall be sent, together with the Objections, to the other House, by which it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that House, it shall become a Law. . . .   ARTICLE I, SECTION 7, CLAUSE 3: Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence of the Senate and House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of Adjournment) shall be presented to the President of the United States; and before the Same shall take Effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall be repassed by two thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according to the Rules and Limitations prescribed in the Case of a Bill.  President Bush told reporters a few months ago that he was looking for the right test case to see whether he already has the line-item veto.  Vice President Quayle and Budget Director Darman said recently they've joined the search.  On Tuesday, the subject came up again when Marlin Fitzwater explained the constitutional argument based on the provisions above to the White House press corps.  President Bush doesn't have any provision in mind, but line-item-veto bait will be like earthworms at midnight in the coming Continuing Resolution.  The harder question is whether anyone yet understands that Mr. Bush's fight for his constitutional prerogatives is about politics as much as it is about law.  We have been persuaded by the constitutional argument for the inherent line-item veto since 1987, when lawyer Stephen Glazier first made the case on this page.  The 1974 budget "reform," passed over President Nixon's veto, took away the presidential impoundment power, thereby introducing monstrous CRs and eviscerating the presidential veto.  Mr. Glazier discovered that the Founders had worried that Congress might take the President out of the loop.  Article I, Section 7, Clause 3 says that whether it's called an "order, resolution or vote" or anything else, Presidents must have the chance to veto.  Labeling an omnibus budget a "bill" can't deprive the President of his power to veto items.  Finding a test case shouldn't be hard, but there is something to be said for picking the best one possible.  The White House had the perfect case, but Congress blinked before it could go to court.  After the HUD and S&L stories broke, some Congressmen began to worry that their influence peddling at executive-branch and independent agencies might some day get them in trouble.  They worried about an Interior Department directive to log all communications with Members or their staffs.  Congress inserted the following into the Interior appropriation: "None of the funds available under this title may be used to prepare reports on contacts between employees of the Dept. of the Interior and Members and committees of Congress and their staff."  The White House warned that this would be an unconstitutional usurpation of its power.  When it threatened to use this provision as the test for a line-item veto, Congress caved.  The fear Congress has of any line-item-veto test led Members to add the single most contorted and ridiculous provision this year, "This section shall be effective only on Oct. 1, 1989."  This means Interior contacts cannot be logged only on one day -- a Sunday that had already passed.  If the White House is looking for another unconstitutional bill, Rep. John Dingell is trying again to raise the Fairness Doctrine from the dead.  President Reagan vetoed this as a First Amendment violation.  The "Fairness" Doctrine's enthusiasts are incumbents in the House who know the rules squelch lively discussions on broadcasts, deterring feisty challengers.  There are also other provisions requiring Congressmen to join treaty-negotiating teams and new restrictions on OMB.  Unconstitutional bills make good legal targets, but the line-item veto is better understood as a political opportunity than as mere fodder for lawyers.  Commenting on the budget mess this week, President Bush said: "The perception out there is that it's the fault of Congress.  And you can look to the leadership and ask them why that is the perception of the American people."  Exactly right.  Now's the time to make the political case that Presidents need the line-item weapon to restore discipline to the budget.  Congress is in no position to naysay Mr. Bush now that we're into Gramm-Rudman's sequestration.  Just this week, the House-Senate conference met -- 231 conferees, divided into 26 different subconferences.  Senator Daniel Inouye agreed to close some bases in Hawaii in exchange for such goodies as $11 million for a parking lot at Walter Reed Hospital.  Conference negotiator Rep. Bill Hefner pulled down $40 million in military bases for North Carolina and graciously allowed Senator James Sasser $70 million for bases in Tennessee.  President Bush should take the Constitution in one hand and a budget ax in the other and get to work.  He should chop out both unconstitutional provisions and budget pork.  Congress may have lost any sense of discipline, but that doesn't mean the country must learn to live forever with this mess.  President Bush has the power to change how Washington works, if only he will use it.  Troubled SCI Television Inc. proposed to restructure much of its $1.3 billion in debt to buy time to sell assets and pay its obligations.  The leveraged buy-out firm of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., which owns 46% of the common equity of SCI TV, indicated in the debt plan that it would reduce its equity stake to 15%, giving the rest of its stake to bondholders in the restructuring.  KKR also signaled to the company's creditors that Henry Kravis and other KKR directors of SCI TV would resign from the board once the restructuring is completed and forgo their voting rights.  Holders of SCI TV's $507 million of high-yield junk bonds are being asked to forgive a lot of debt in exchange for taking a 39% equity stake in SCI TV.  They immediately termed the proposal inadequate and said the restructuring would not solve the company's problems.  "I think the current plan is sufficiently flawed in a sufficient number of bondholders' eyes that substantial revisions will be required to get it done," says analyst Craig Davis of R.D. Smith & Co. here.  Investors interpreted the KKR move as a desire by the firm to wash its hands of SCI TV.  But a spokesman for KKR says that with only a 15% equity stake, it wouldn't be appropriate for KKR to keep board representation.  KKR already has made about $1 billion of gains from earlier transactions with SCI TV, thus it isn't significantly affected by the company's troubles.  SCI TV, which is controlled by Nashville, Tenn., entrepreneur George Gillett, owns six TV stations, including several CBS Inc. affiliates.  It is having trouble meeting its debt payments because of heavy borrowing in 1987 for a leveraged buy-out.  Through investment banker Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., SCI TV is offering to exchange three classes of junk bonds for packages of new bonds and equity that investors value at ranges from 20 cents to 70 cents on the dollar.  KKR would give up a 31% equity stake to bondholders, while Mr. Gillett would surrender an 8% stake.  While one big SCI TV investor thinks that's pretty generous, many junkholders had been hoping that KKR and Mr. Gillett would invest new money in SCI TV.  Those investors think SCI TV needs new equity to survive.  SCI TV's debt restructuring plan would defer payment of $153 million of bank debt.  It also would defer interest and principal on junk bonds that have fallen due; the grace period for paying the bill expires Nov. 16.  At the same time, investors estimate the restructuring would cut the company's annual cash interest bill from about $90 million to $85 million.  Yet to pay that interest bill, analysts say SCI TV will only produce about $80 million to $90 million of cash flow a year.  Office Market Weakens  In Overbuilt Northeast  THE NORTHEAST office market is feeling serious aftereffects of the giddy overbuilding of the 1980s.  Foreclosures and other signs of financial distress, most often associated with the real estate market in the Southwest, are surfacing in the suburban office market of the once thriving Northeast.  Some projects are now in the hands of lenders, including a 425,000-square-foot office facility in Little Falls, N.J.  The owners of a 32-acre hotel and office complex in King of Prussia, Pa., have advertised for new financing.  Rising office vacancy rates in Fairfield County, Conn., have builders and bankers scrambling to restructure loans.  And in suburban Boston, developers are bracing for cutbacks in the computer industry, a major user of office space.  Many troubled properties haven't been foreclosed on and are hard to identify, says Albert I. Berger, who heads the Secaucus, N.J., office of Helmsley-Spear Inc., a real estate brokerage.  Owners are voluntarily -- and quietly -- turning over properties to lenders through "deeds in lieu of foreclosure."  Often, developers stay on as property manager.  Real estate analyst Lloyd Lynford says the Northeast's distress is masked by relatively low vacancy rates.  But in today's overbuilt market, tenants have many choices and are negotiating low rents that squeeze building owners.  On average, Mr. Lynford says, it now takes three to 3 1/2 years to fill new office space, compared with 2 1/2 years in 1988.  Beverly Hills Comes  To Suburban Tokyo  WHY SHOULD the Japanese cross the Pacific to buy American real estate when they can simply recreate it at home?  Tokyu Development Corp. is spending $500 million to build American-style luxury homes in suburban Tokyo with rarely seen back yards, front yards, swimming pools and tennis courts.  The Japanese company hired Richardson Nagy Martin, a Newport Beach, Calif., architectural firm, to design what the Japanese press has dubbed "the Beverly Hills of Tokyo."  Instead of Japan's typical small homes clustered on narrow streets with no sidewalks, the new "One Hundred Hills" development will offer 65 houses on half-acre lots.  That's more than 10 times the usual housing site size.  Buyers with $6 million to spend can select from 11 designs, including a Mediterranean-inspired California style, a traditional Yankee look and designs inspired by Midwestern architect Frank Lloyd Wright.  There are spacious living rooms and baths, plus a master grandparents suite and a foyer for removing shoes to suit Japanese life styles.  Exteriors are faced with brick, wood or stone, but the homes are made of steel-reinforced concrete.  "We were disappointed we couldn't use wood," says architect Walter J. Richardson, "but the Japanese only want stronger materials."  At $1,000 per square foot, the Japanese want the feeling of indestructibility, he explains, not to mention protection from possible earthquake damage.  Housing Developers Try  Brand-Name Buildings  RESIDENTIAL builders, faced with a more competitive market, are turning to a traditional consumer marketing technique to establish brand-name identity.  "One of the difficulties people in real estate have is that each product is like starting a new company, or starting a new line in the fashion business," says L. Robert Lieb president of Mountain Development Corp. in West Paterson, N.J.  So he's using "river" in many project names.  "It'll never be like what Bristol-Myers does," he adds, "but it helps establish recognition with the public -- and with banks."  Weingarten-Siegel Group Inc. of Manalapan, N.J., has built Cross Creek Pointe, Allegro Pointe and other Pointes in New Jersey.  Caspi Development Corp of Armonk, N.Y., has developed two apartment buildings called Classic and plans a third.  Developer Steve Caspi says the same brand name indicates consistent quality, "regardless of location, design or amenities."  The leader in real estate brand names is developer Ara Hovnanian.  His entry-price condos are labeled Society Hill.  Beacon Hill is for "move-up" town houses, and Nob Hill, for single-family houses.  Because of standardized designs, Mr. Hovnanian says, "a buyer can visualize Society Hill regardless of where it is."  Quake Not Likely to Jolt  The Commercial Market  THE EARTHQUAKE in San Francisco has sent few tremors through the hearts of real estate investors.  "I think there's a disease called buyer's regret, and I'm sure it's running rampant at this moment, but it gets cured in a short period of time," says Kenneth Leventhal, co-managing partner of Kenneth Leventhal & Co,. a Los Angeles accounting firm specializing in real estate.  "If I were buying a building in San Francisco now the first thing I'd do is insist on a structural inspection, then I'd delay a little, stall a little."  But like other real estate professionals accustomed to California's quake risks, Mr. Leventhal anticipates little long-term change in the city's commercial real estate market.  Still, local builders are eager to tell the world that most of San Francisco doesn't look like the TV images of destruction.  Planners of the Urban Land Institute real estate conference this week hastily added a panel on the quake's effects.  "The message is we build'em right," says Peter Bedford, a California developer and officer at Urban Land Institute.  "There's seven million square feet of space that's doing great."  HEALTH CLUBS gear up for a graying clientele.  Although their ads picture curvy young people in skimpy outfits, club owners know the future lies with the lumpier over-40 set.  "It's a misconception that physical fitness is something for the young and middle-aged," says Michael Pacholik, sales manager of the LA Fitness club, Diamond Bar, Calif.  About 10% to 15% of members at Atlanta's Holiday Espre Center are elderly, says Gerald Williams, fitness consultant.  "Most want cardiovascular conditioning . . . the No. 1 way of reducing risk of heart disease."  The Association of Quality Clubs, which puts 1988 industry revenue at $5 billion, surveyed the health-conscious over-40 market and found that 43% exercise regularly.  Michael Hays, head of ProBody Fitness, notes an industry "wash" is in progress.  "Clubs need to be run like restaurants where every square foot makes a dollar," he says.  Older people help profits by filling in "downtime."  He adds: "The medical market and the fitness market parallel each other and are going to cross real soon."  People on fixed incomes get a break at Espre; over 55 wins a 45% discount at Anaheim Imperial Health Spa.  "HOT" TOPAZ sparks regulator, jeweler concern over import of irradiated stones.  A committee of gem dealers investigates the source of some "hot" blue topaz stones recently reported by a Hong Kong jewelry manufacturer.  In the U.S., radiation limits are set and monitored by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, which licenses reactors that process the topaz.  The agency is working on licensing importers but doesn't currently monitor imports.  Topaz, a translucent mineral that is often whitish when taken from the ground, can be turned blue by irradiation, which transforms it into a gemstone that looks like an aquamarine.  "The {stones} that were irradiated in the U.S. are safe," says John Hickey, chief of the NRC operations branch, Washington.  "We believe that the vast majority of imported material is safe.  But there is a small risk that some were imported with high radiation levels."  Mr. Hickey added that the stones found in Hong Kong are thought to carry double the U.S. radiation limit, although he noted that double or even triple the U.S. limit is "still in the range of safe levels."  Some jewelers have Geiger counters to measure topaz radiation.  CAPITAL TRAVELS to Europe as 1992 unification nears.  Boston's Advent International raises $230 million from U.S. pension funds and other institutions to invest in Europe.  Other venture capitalists are already there: MMG Patricof Group and its Alan Patricof Associates, New York; Burr, Egan, Deleage & Co., Boston; and San Francisco's Hambrecht & Quist have about $800 million to invest in European companies.  European venture capital funds total about $14 billion and are expected to continue growing 35% annually.  Continentals believe that the strongest growth area will be southern Europe.  Spain and Italy are most often mentioned as the future economic hot spots.  Favored ventures include media, telecommunications and retailing.  Most popular acquisition method: the leveraged buy-out.  Family-owned firms that need cash to grow are attractive, says John Turner of Matuschka Gruppe, Munich.  AN AIDS DIRECTORY from the American Foundation for AIDS Research rates and reviews educational materials.  "Learning AIDS" lists films, pamphlets, brochures, videos and other educational data.  The distributor is R.R. Bowker, New York.  SUSPECT "SALES" ads are challenged by the Better Business Bureau of Metropolitan New York.  The bureau found that only two of six New York furniture stores could prove their presale prices were higher.  DRACULA'S BUSY this time of year, but a visit to his Transylvania castle is part of a Chicago-based Unitours trip in the spring, presumably the count's off-season.  RADIO MALAISE draws the ear of the Federal Communications Commission.  AM radio, which has been losing listeners to FM channels since the 1970s, approaches the 1990s with a diminished voice.  But it may have a good listener in Washington.  The FCC plans to hear a day of testimony Nov. 16 on the plight of AM radio.  The commission believes that improving AM service would broaden listening selections and increase options for advertisers.  The issues are also thought to be important to the FCC's new chairman, Alfred Sikes, a former AM broadcaster in his native Missouri.  The FM radio band, considered technically superior because it can carry stereo broadcasts, has cornered the airwaves for delivering music.  AM stereo remains largely undeveloped because it lacks a uniform delivery system.  The National Association of Broadcasters in June adopted an agenda for revitalizing AM radio that includes, among other things, pursuing further FCC action on selecting an AM stereo standard and seeking a law requiring all stereo receivers to include AM stereo.  Listeners turned to radios run on batteries for news when the San Francisco earthquake and Hurricane Hugo cut power lines.  BRIEFS: A Modern Healthcare magazine article says 40% of surveyed executives admitted falling asleep during formal presentations. . . .  Lee Co., the jeans maker, celebrates its 100th anniversary with a hardcover yearbook featuring photos of its 10,000 employees.  Kemper Financial Services Inc., charging that program trading is ruining the stock market, cut off four big Wall Street firms from doing any of its stock-trading business.  The move is the biggest salvo yet in the renewed outcry against program trading, with Kemper putting its money -- the millions of dollars in commissions it generates each year -- where its mouth is.  The Kemper Corp. unit and other critics complain that program trading causes wild swings in stock prices, such as on Tuesday and on Oct. 13 and 16, and has increased chances for market crashes.  Over the past nine months, several firms, including discount broker Charles Schwab & Co. and Sears, Roebuck & Co.'s Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. unit, have attacked program trading as a major market evil.  Several big securities firms backed off from program trading a few months after the 1987 crash.  But most of them, led by Morgan Stanley & Co., moved back in earlier this year.  The most volatile form of program trading is index arbitrage -- the rapid-fire, computer-guided buying and selling of stocks offset with opposite trades in stock-index futures and options.  The object is to capture profits from fleeting price discrepancies between the futures and options and the stocks themselves.  Index arbitrage recently has accounted for about half of all program trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Last month, program trading accounted for 20.9 million shares a day, or a record 13.8% of the Big Board's average daily volume.  On Tuesday afternoon, Kemper told Bear, Stearns & Co., General Electric Co.'s Kidder, Peabody & Co. unit, Morgan Stanley and Oppenheimer & Co. that it will no longer do business with them because of their commitment to index arbitrage, officials inside and outside these firms confirmed.  Kemper officials declined to identify the firms but acknowledged a long-simmering dispute with four securities firms and said the list of brokers it won't do business with may be lengthened in the months ahead.  "We've been opposed to" index arbitrage "for a long time," said Stephen B. Timbers, chief investment officer at Kemper, which manages $56 billion, including $8 billion of stocks.  "Index arbitrage doesn't work, and it scares natural buyers" of stock.  While Mr. Timbers explained he's "not totally convinced index arbitrage changes the overall level of the stock market," he said that "on an intraday basis, it has major effects.  We've talked to proponents of index arbitrage and told them to cool it because they're ruining the market.  They said, `Too bad,' so we finally said we're not going to do business with them."  Kemper also blasted the Big Board for ignoring the interests of individual and institutional holders.  "The New York Stock Exchange has vested interests" in its big member securities firms "that cloud its objectivity," Mr. Timbers said.  "It has never been interested in what we think.  The Big Board also has a terrible communication problem with individual investors," he added.  Small investors perceive that "big operators" dominate the market, said Thomas O'Hara, chairman of the National Association of Investors and head of the exchange's Individual Investors Advisory Committee set up after the 1987 crash.  "The impression I've got is they'd love to do away with it {program trading}, but they {the exchange} can't do it," he said.  Big Board Chairman John J. Phelan said in a recent interview that he has no inclination to eliminate program trading.  He said the market's volatility disturbs him, but that all the exchange can do is "slow down the process" by using its circuit breakers and shock absorbers.  Mr. Timbers countered that "the mere fact they put in circuit breakers is an admission of their problems."  Morgan Stanley and Kidder Peabody, the two biggest program trading firms, staunchly defend their strategies.  "We continue to believe the position we've taken is reasonable," a Morgan Stanley official said.  "We would stop index arbitrage when the market is under stress, and we have recently," he said, citing Oct. 13 and earlier this week.  Michael Carpenter, president and chief executive officer at Kidder Peabody, said in a recent interview, "We don't think that index arbitrage has a negative impact on the market as a whole."  According to Lawrence Eckenfelder, a securities industry analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., "Kemper is the first firm to make a major statement with program trading."  He added that "having just one firm do this isn't going to mean a hill of beans.  But if this prompts others to consider the same thing, then it may become much more important."  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Blockbuster Entertainment Corp. -- $300 million (redemption amount) of zero-coupon convertible notes, also known as liquid yield option notes, due Nov. 1, 2004, priced at 308.32 to yield at maturity 8%.  The notes are zero-coupon securities and will not pay interest periodically.  The size of the offering was increased from the originally planned $250 million (redemption amount).  The notes are convertible into common stock of Blockbuster Entertainment at $22.26 a share, representing a 12% conversion premium over yesterday's closing price.  Rated Ba-3 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-B-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Merrill Lynch & Co. -- $200 million of 8.4% notes due Nov. 1, 2019, priced at 99.771 to yield 8.457%.  The issue, which is puttable back to the company Nov. 1, 1994, was priced at a spread of 70 basis points above the Treasury's five-year note.  Rated single-A-1 by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P, the noncallable issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Boise Cascade Corp. -- $150 million of 9.45% debentures due 2009, priced at 99.7.  ITT Financial Corp. -- $150 million of 8.35% subordinated notes due Nov. 1, 2004, priced at 99.85 to yield 8.387%.  The noncallable issue, which is puttable back to the company Nov. 1, 1994, was priced at a spread of 62.5 basis points above the Treasury's five-year note.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  ITT Financial is a subsidiary of ITT Corp. Arco Chemical Co. -- $100 million of 9.35% debentures due Nov. 1, 2019, priced at 98.518 to yield 9.50%.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Salomon Brothers Inc.  @ MUNICIPALS  Trinity River Authority, Texas -- $134.8 million of regional wastewater system improvement revenue bonds, Series 1989, due 1992-2000, 2009 and 2016, through a Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. group.  The bonds, insured and rated triple-a by Moody's and S&P, were priced to yield from 6.30% in 1992 to 7.25% in 2016.  There are $46,245,000 of 7% term bonds due 2009, priced at 97 7/8 to yield 7.20%, and $64.9 million of 7.1% term bonds due 2016, priced at 98 1/4 to yield 7.25%.  Serial bonds, which all carry 7% coupons, are priced to yield from 6.30% in 1992 to 7% in 2000.  Beverly Hills, Calif. -- $116,385,000 of refunding certificates of participation (civic center improvements project), due 1990-2004, 2007, 2016 and 2019, tentatively priced by a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.19% in 2016.  Serial certificates yield to 7.10% in 2004.  They are all priced at par.  There are $12,915,000 of 7% term certificates due 2007, priced to yield 7.15%.  The $58.9 million of 7% certificates due 2016 carry the issue's high yield, priced at 97 3/4 to yield 7.19%.  There are also $29 million of 6 3/4% certificates due 2019, priced to yield 7.10%.  The bonds are rated single-A-1 by Moody's and double-A-minus by S&P, according to the lead underwriter.  Michigan -- $80 million of first general obligation bonds (Series 1989 environmental protection program and recreation program), tentatively priced by a Shearson Lehman Hutton group to yield from 6% for current interest bonds due 1990 to 7.25% for convertible capital appreciation bonds.  Environmental protection program current interest bonds are due 1995-1999, 2005 and 2009.  They are tentatively priced to yield from 6.45% in 1995 to 7.10% in 2009.  The standard capital appreciation bonds in the issue, due 1998-2011, yield to maturity from 6.70% in 1998 to 7.10% in 2009-2011.  The convertible capital appreciation bonds all yield 7.25% to their respective conversion dates, when they become 7 1/4% current interest-bearing bonds until maturity.  Convertible capital appreciation bonds with a final stated maturity of Nov. 15, 2014, convert Nov. 15, 1999.  Convertible capital appreciation bonds with a final stated maturity of Nov. 15, 2019, convert Nov. 15, 2004.  Recreation program current interest bonds are due 1990-1995, and are priced to yield from 6% in 1990 to 6.45% in 1995.  All of the bonds are rated single-A-1 by Moody's and double-A by S&P.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $300 million of Remic securities in 10 classes through Goldman Sachs.  The issue is backed by Fannie Mae 9% securitiess.  The offering is Fannie Mae's Series 1989-88.  @ EUROBONDS  Fuji Heavy Industries Ltd. (Japan) -- $300 million of 8 3/4% bonds due Nov. 17, 1999, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 8.85% less full fees annually, via Daiwa Europe Ltd. Guarantee by Industrial Bank of Japan.  Fees 2.  European Investment Bank (agency) -- $150 million of 8 1/2% bonds due Nov. 22, 1999, priced at 99.75 to yield 8.54% at reoffered price, via lead manager JP Morgan Securities Ltd.  Nippon Meat Packers Inc. (Japan) -- $200 million of bonds due Nov. 9, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 3 7/8% coupon at par, via Yamaichi International Europe.  Each $5,000 bond carries a warrant exercisable Nov. 24, 1989, through Oct. 29, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Oct. 31.  GMAC Canada Ltd. (U.S. parent) -- 150 million Canadian dollars of floating-rate notes due November 1996, via Banque Paribas Capital Markets Ltd. Coupon, paid monthly, is one-month Canadian bankers acceptance rate.  Guarantee by General Motors Acceptance Corp. Call at par after two years and thereafter at par every six months.  Swedish Export Credit Corp. -- #100 million of 12% bonds due June 15, 1994, priced at 101 5/8 to yield 12.39% annually less full fees, via Samuel Montagu & Co. Fees 1 7/8.  Skopbank (Finland) -- 10 billion yen of 5 3/4% bonds due Nov. 20, 1992, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 5 3/4% less full fees, via IBJ International.  Fees 1 3/8.  Hokkaido Takushoku Bank (Japan) -- 300 million Swiss francs of notes and bonds due March 31, 1994, with fixed 0.375% coupon at par via Swiss Bank Corp. Put option March 31, 1992, at 107 3/4 to yield a fixed 3.52%.  The issue is in two parts: 200 million Swiss francs of privately placed notes, 100 million Swiss francs of publicly listed bonds.  Indentical conditions for the two parts.  Other terms to be fixed Nov. 1.  @ OTHER  Kingdom of Morocco -- $208 million (redemption amount) of zero-coupon government trust certificates, with maturities stretching from May 15, 1990, to Nov. 15, 1999, priced at yields ranging from 8.23% to 8.43%.  All the issues were priced at a spread of 37 basis points above the Treasury strips with similar maturities.  Proceeds from the offering are about $160.4 million.  Rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by BT Securities, a subsidiary of Bankers Trust New York Corp.  At a time when Jon Levy should be planning the biggest spring season in his dress company's 17 years, his work day is studded with intense moments of concern about one of his biggest customers, Campeau Corp.  "The dress business has always been a gamble, but it's never been like this," says Mr. Levy, president of St. Gillian Group Ltd., which has become a hot name thanks to a campaign of sexy TV commercials.  Every day, Mr. Levy checks orders from Campeau department store chains, trying to guess if he will be paid.  "I'm now monitoring every major account."  Campeau, owner of such retailers as Bloomingdale's, Bon Marche, and Jordan Marsh, sidestepped financial collapse last month after an emergency $250 million loan from Olympia & York Developments Ltd., a Canadian developer and a major shareholder in Campeau.  The need for the loan surprised many analysts and bond holders who had been told at the company's annual meeting in July that there weren't any major problems ahead.  The risk of doing business with Campeau's Federated and Allied department store chains is about to increase greatly, not only for Mr. Levy but for hundreds of other small apparel makers, button suppliers, trucking firms and fabric houses.  Next week, the country's top designers and manufacturers will begin showing fashions for spring 1990, the second most important selling season of the year.  And as the applause dies down in showrooms along Seventh Avenue and Broadway, stylishly clad Campeau buyers will begin writing orders.  Orders from Campeau retailers used to be cause for celebration.  This is no longer true because of Campeau's massive debt load.  "It's all anybody wants to talk about," says Richard Posner, executive vice president for Credit Exchange Inc., a leading credit service.  "People wonder what's going to happen next."  Many manufacturers are worried about being paid for merchandise already shipped to Campeau stores.  But those dollars at risk pale in comparison to the investment required to make and ship spring goods to Campeau stores.  "The few million dollars I could lose today is nothing against what I could lose on the spring line," says Mr. Levy, who estimates that Campeau stores will sell $25 million worth of his clothes this year.  "I'm buying fabric right now for clothes which I may not be paid for until April or May.  What happens to me if Campeau collapses between now and then?"  Some credit concerns, such as Bernard Sands Credit Consultants Inc., have told clients not to ship anything to Federated or Allied stores on credit.  "This is especially true for spring merchandise," says Jim Rindos, credit manager at Bernard Sands.  "Campeau has too much debt."  Other credit houses, such as Credit Exchange and Solo Credit Service Corp., are suggesting that their clients study each order before shipping.  "Payments are good right now, but we aren't recommending any long-term lines of credit," says Richard Hastings, a retail credit analyst, referring to credit lines which make inventory purchases automatic.  "The Campeau situation is a little uncertain and very difficult to analyze."  Because of those concerns, some manufacturers say they will ask for letters of credit before shipping spring merchandise.  "We're being paid today, but we're worried about tomorrow and will want" letters of credit, says the sales director at one major dress maker who asked not to be identified.  Howard Bloom, president of the dress firm Chetta B Inc., says: "It's big time chaos today.  I'm going to ship and hope I get paid.  If I need to ask for money up front later, I will."  Carol Sanger, vice president, corporate communications at Campeau, says that all of the Federated and Allied chains are paying their bills in a timely manner.  "They continue to pay their bills and will do so," says Ms. Sanger.  "We're confident we'll be paying our bills for spring merchandise as well."  Typically, manufacturers are paid 10 days after the month in which they ship.  If goods are shipped to Bloomingdale's between Oct. 1 and Oct. 20, manufacturers expect to be paid by Nov. 10.  But manufacturers now buying fabric for spring season goods won't be paid until March, April or even May.  Some in the market question whether Campeau will be in a position to pay bills at that time.  "Everybody is worried about the possibility of cancellations," says Kurt Barnard, publisher of Barnard's Retail Marketing Report.  "The buyers who work for the various Campeau chains may lose their jobs.  The stores they work for may be sold.  What that will mean for manufacturers is anybody's guess."  Campeau's financial situation is complicated by an estimated $1.23 billion in debt due next spring.  This includes a working capital facility for Allied Stores of $350 million that matures March 15, 1990, and an $800 million bridge loan due April 30, 1990.  The company has stated in recently filed financial documents that it anticipates refinancing its March 1990 payments.  In recent months, numerous retailers have filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection, including Bonwit Teller, B. Altman & Co., and Miller & Rhoads Inc.  Those filings, plus the expected sale of a number of financially healthy chains, such as Saks Fifth Avenue, Marshall Field's and Bloomingdale's, have added to the anxiety.  "Right now, Federated owes us a considerable amount of money," says Morris Marmalstein, president of David Warren Enterprises, a major dress manufacturer.  "We expect they will be current with their debts by the end of the week, but we are considering asking them for letters of credit before we take more orders."  Mr. Marmalstein adds that his company is now holding some goods in anticipation of being paid in full.  "It's become a day-by-day business," he says.  "Business has never been this tough before.  Not only does your product have to be excellent, but you also have to be able to collect."  Other manufacturers are equally cautious.  Bud Konheim, president of Nicole Miller Inc., says his company is now shipping only to the flagship stores of the Federated and Allied chains.  This limits his financial exposure, he says.  "The branches are just warmed over, empty halls," says Mr. Konheim.  "Why should I be part of that problem?  I've got limited production, and I can't give it to underperformers."  Campeau's Ms. Sanger disputes Mr. Konheim's comments.  "Many of the branches are very lucrative," she says.  "That's just nonsense."  As for Mr. Levy at St. Gillian, he says he will maintain his credit lines with the various Campeau stores unless they miss a payment.  "If they slip for 10 cents for 10 minutes, I'll stop," he says.  Bethlehem Steel Corp., hammered by higher costs and lower shipments to key automotive and service-center customers, posted a 54% drop in third-quarter profit.  Separately, two more of the nation's top steelmakers -- Armco Inc. and National Intergroup Inc. -- reported lower operating earnings in their steel businesses, marking what is generally believed to be the end of a two-year boom in the industry.  Wall Street analysts expect the disappointing trend to continue into the fourth quarter and through at least the first two quarters of 1990, when the industry will increasingly see the effect of price erosion in major product lines, such as rolled sheet used for cars, appliances and construction.  "It doesn't bode well for coming quarters," said John Jacobson, who follows the steel industry for AUS Consultants.  In fact, he thinks several steelmakers will report actual losses through the third quarter of 1990.  Bethlehem, the nation's second largest steelmaker, earned $46.9 million, or 54 cents a share.  The figures include $15 million in costs related to a blast furnace outage and $8 million in losses from unauthorized work outages at the company's coal operations.  In the year-ago period, Bethlehem earned $101.4 million, or $1.27 a share, including a $3.8 million gain from early retirement of debt.  Third-quarter sales dropped 11% to $1.27 billion from $1.43 billion a year ago.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Bethlehem shares rose 50 cents to $17.375.  Of all the major steelmakers, Bethlehem would seem to be the most vulnerable to a slowdown.  It hasn't diversified beyond steel, nor has it linked up with a joint venture partner to share costs and risks.  However, in spite of the difficult industrywide environment of high cost and low volume, Bethlehem "had pretty good earnings numbers," said Michelle Galanter Applebaum, an analyst with Salomon Brothers Inc. Ms. Applebaum had estimated third-quarter earnings of 55 cents a shhha55 cents a share,   ents a share, but  ssa share, but said the losses for the unusual items were larger than expected.  Still, Bethlehem's core basic steel operations experienced a steep drop in operating profit to $58.6 million from $186.4 million a year ago, when the industry enjoyed strong demand and pricing.  The company said its shipments declined as a result of a reduction in inventories by service centers, a lackluster automotive market and increasing competitive pressures in the construction market.  At the same time, production costs, compared with a year ago, were boosted by higher raw material and employment costs, which resulted from the company's new labor pact effective June 1.  "We anticipate that steel market conditions will exhibit a further moderate decline in the fourth quarter as the automotive sector remains weak and customers continue to adjust inventories," said Bethlehem Chairman Walter F. Williams.  He noted, however, that the company's order entry has increased from the low levels of the early summer, following the end of labor negotiations.   steel business, said third-quarter net income dropped 8% to $33 million, or 35 cents a share, from $36 million, or 39 cents a share in the year-ago quarter.  Sales dropped to $441.1 million from $820.4 million, because the company no longer consolidates its Eastern Steel division, which is now a joint venture with Kawasaki Steel Corp.  Along with reduced volume, analysts said the nation's fifth largest steelmaker was hurt by holding higher-cost inventory when raw material costs of such key products as nickel dropped.  Operating profit dropped 46% in its specialty flat-rolled steel segment.  Moreover, the company said higher sales and shipments to service centers from its Armco Steel Co. joint venture failed to offset weakness in the automotive market, higher production costs and a poorer product mix.  Armco shares closed unchanged at $10.625 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  National Intergroup, which owns 50% of the nation's sixth largest steelmaker -- National Steel Corp. -- posted net income for the fiscal second-quarter of $8.6 million, or 33 cents a share, compared with a net loss of $50.3 million.  Sales increased in the quarter ended Sept. 30 to $747.8 million from $623.5 million a year ago.  The latest period includes gains of $9.1 million from early retirement of debt and tax loss carry-forward.  Last year's results were hurt by $41.3 million in restructuring charges.  National Intergroup stock closed at $15, unchanged in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  The company noted that its Fox-Meyer Drug Co., Ben Franklin Stores Inc. and Permian Corp. operations showed improvements as a result of restructuring moves.  However, its equity in the net income of National Steel declined to $6.3 million from $10.9 million as a result of softer demand and lost orders following prolonged labor talks and a threatened strike.  National Intergroup is negotiating for the sale of its 50% interest in National Steel to concentrate more fully on drug distribution operations.  International Business Machines Corp. said it agreed to let Motorola Inc. participate in a semiconductor research project as part of its effort to bolster the U.S. semiconductor industry.  IBM, which made the announcement at the dedication of a research center here, said it invited many other companies to participate as well, including some from Europe.  Jack Kuehler, IBM's president, said IBM is also considering letting other companies participate in additional semiconductor work but declined to be more specific.  IBM, which said a year ago it was inviting companies to participate in some semiconductor work, has become far more open about its technology as it has tried to rally U.S. industry to head off the Japanese, who now dominate the market for dynamic random access memory chips.  While IBM, Armonk, N.Y., makes the bulk of the DRAMs it uses, it doesn't make the equipment needed to produce those chips.  And IBM worries that the Japanese will take over that equipment market, too, unless U.S. semiconductor companies produce enough memory chips here to keep U.S. equipment makers healthy.  Failure of U.S. equipment makers, IBM fears, would leave it dependent on many of the Japanese companies that compete with it in other parts of the market.  IBM also said it expects to benefit from the expertise that Motorola and other companies can bring to bear on the difficult problems involved in semiconductor manufacturing.  IBM already participates in one industrywide effort to improve semiconductor-manufacturing techniques.  IBM said it expects industrywide efforts to become prevalent because semiconductor manufacturing has become so expensive.  A state-of-the-art plant cost $40 million in the mid-1970s but costs $500 million today because the technology is so complex.  And IBM said it expects the costs to continue climbing.  IBM, which said Motorola is paying just a nominal fee to cover the 21-month agreement, acknowledged some companies had turned down its invitation to join in.  But it said that was mainly because the project may not bear fruit until the mid-1990s.  IBM said it thought more companies would become interested as the project progresses.  The project involving Motorola concerns a technique, called X-ray lithography, that figures to be crucial to future generations of memory chips.  Currently, chips are produced by shining light through a mask to produce an image on the chip, much as a camera produces an image on film.  But details on chips must now be extraordinarily fine, and the wavelengths of even ultraviolet light are long enough so that the images they draw may be too blurry -- much as someone using a wide paintbrush could produce a broad line but would have trouble painting a thin one.  X-rays, by contrast, travel straighter and can be focused more tightly than light.  X-rays have problems, too.  They can make the masks brittle and can pass through material they're not supposed to.  But, assuming those problems can be overcome, they should allow for memory chips that could approach one billion bits of information -- 250 times as much as is contained in the four-megabit chips that are just reaching the market and a million times what was possible in the mid-1970s.  Allied-Signal Aerospace Co. received a $65 million contract to outfit Continental Airlines' 393 planes with the Bendix/King Traffic Alert and Collision Avoidance System.  The airborne system operates independent of ground-based radar systems, informing pilots of nearby aircraft, Allied-Signal said.  The system also provides course-correction advisories.  Allied-Signal is a unit of Allied-Signal Inc., a manufacturer with interests in aerospace, automotive products and engineered materials.  Continental Airlines is a unit of Texas Air Corp., Houston.  In a stunning shift in direction, Provigo Inc. said it will sell all its non-food operations to concentrate solely on its retail and wholesale grocery business.  The non-food operations accounted for about 27% of Provigo's 7.38 billion Canadian dollars (US$6.3 billion) in sales in the latest fiscal year.  In a related move, Pierre Lortie, chairman and chief executive, resigned.  Mr. Lortie joined Provigo in 1985 and spearheaded the company's drive to grow outside its traditional food business.  He couldn't be reached for comment.  Bertin Nadeau, newly appointed chairman and interim chief executive of Provigo, wouldn't say if Mr. Lortie was asked to leave.  "Mr.  Lortie felt less pertinent," Mr. Nadeau said, given the decision to dump Provigo's non-food operations.  "At this stage it was felt I was perhaps more pertinent as chief executive."  Mr. Nadeau also is chairman and chief executive of Unigesco Inc., Provigo's controlling shareholder.  At a news conference, Mr. Nadeau said the sale of the three non-food businesses, which account for nearly half the company's C$900 million in assets, should be completed in a "matter of months."  The three units are a nationwide pharmaceutical and health-products distributor, a small sporting-goods chain, and a combination catalog showroom and toy-store chain.  Investors and analysts applauded the news.  Provigo was the most active industrial stock on the Montreal Exchange, where it closed at C$9.75 (US$8.32), up 75 Canadian cents.  "I think it's a pretty positive development," said Ross Cowan, a financial analyst with Levesque Beaubien Geoffrion Inc., of the decision to concentrate on groceries.  Mr. Lortie's departure, while sudden, was seen as inevitable in light of the shift in strategy.  "The non-food operations were largely Mr. Lortie's creation {and} his strategy didn't work," said Steven Holt, a financial analyst with Midland Doherty Ltd.  Provigo's profit record over the past two years tarnished the company's and Mr. Lortie's reputations.  For the six months ended Aug. 12, Provigo posted net income of C$6.5 million, or eight Canadian cents a share, compared with C$18.1 million, or 21 Canadian cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales were C$4.2 billion compared with C$3.7 billion.  Last month, Canadian Bond Rating Service downgraded Provigo's commercial paper and debentures because of its lackluster performance.  Analysts are skeptical Provigo will be able to sell the non-food businesses as a group for at least book value, and are expecting write-downs.  Mr. Nadeau said he couldn't yet say if the sale prices would match book values.  He said all three non-food operations are profitable.  Mr. Nadeau said discussions are under way with potential purchasers of each of the units.  He declined to confirm or deny reports that Provigo executive Henri Roy is trying to put together a management buy-out of the catalogue showroom unit.  Mr. Roy couldn't be reached.  Yvon Bussieres was named senior executive vice president and chief operating officer of Provigo, a new position.  Mr. Bussieres was president and chief operating officer of Provigo's Quebec retail and wholesale grocery unit.  Mr. Nadeau said he intends to remain Provigo's chief executive only until the non-food businesses are sold, after a which a new chief executive will be named.  Comments by Federal Reserve Board Chairman Alan Greenspan lent some support to the dollar, but the U.S. unit ended yesterday lower against most major currencies.  Foreign-exchange dealers noted that the impact of the chairman's remarks was slight and warned that the currency remains sensitive to developments on Wall Street.  Traders said that Mr. Greenspan, whose statements are ordinarily cautious, was especially careful to avoid any jarring proclamations, with fears about equities still unnerving financial markets.  Testifying before a panel of the House Banking Committee, Mr. Greenspan said the short-term value of the dollar on foreign-exchange markets isn't the primary policy focus of the central bank.  "Our essential focus is on domestic policy," Mr. Greenspan said, referring to the goals of price stability and a stable economy.  In perhaps his most telling remark, Mr. Greenspan termed the current U.S. inflation rate of around 4.5% as "much too high to be ignored."  He added, however, that inflation could be brought down "close to zero" without throwing the economy into a recession.  Analysts viewed the chairman's comments as an indication that the central bank is disinclined to ease monetary policy further in the near future.  The dollar climbed immediately higher on news of Mr. Greenspan's testimony, settling lower in later trade as dealers squared positions ahead of today's preliminary report on third-quarter U.S. gross national product.  In late New York trading yesterday, the dollar was quoted at 1.8353 marks, down from 1.8355 marks Tuesday, and at 141.52 yen, up from 141.45 yen late Tuesday.  Sterling was quoted at $1.6145, up from $1.6055 late Tuesday.  In Tokyo Thursday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 141.60 yen, up from Wednesday's Tokyo close of 141.55 yen.  Many traders forecast a continuation of the market's recent bearish trend and predict the U.S. currency will remain stuck in its relatively narrow ranges in the near term and then shift lower.  But according to Doug Madison, a corporate trader with Bank of America in Los Angeles, a large number of short positions must first be corrected, spurring a temporary upswing, before the unit can turn lower.  He predicts a downward move in dollar-mark trade and a less dramatic slip in dollar-yen, noting that there continues to be a large pool of Japanese investor interest in U.S. securities, which could provide a solid base for the dollar at around 140 yen.  Market participants hope today's GNP report will offer more substantial evidence on U.S. economic growth, although analysts are quick to point out that the figures may overstate the economy's vigor.  "The `r' word is looming again," says one dealer, referring to persistent concern among some market analysts that the U.S. economy is heading toward a major slowdown if not a recession.  Some dealers note that while the third-quarter figures may appear relatively bullish -- the market consensus calls for a 2.5% annual growth rate, unchanged from the second-quarter rate -- it would take a significantly stronger figure to alter market perceptions that the economy is softening.  Some analysts reckon that the next quarter's figures will present a more accurate picture of the U.S. economy, showing a marked slowdown in a number of sectors, including housing starts and equities.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $369.10 an ounce, down $1.10.  Estimated volume was a light 1.7 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Thursday, gold was quoted at $368.24 an ounce.  Lawrence Insurance Group Inc. said it acquired United Republic Reinsurance Co., a Houston property and casualty reinsurance company, from United Savings Association of Texas for $28 million.  Lawrence Insurance also sold 3.2 million of its shares for $7.125 each to its parent, Lawrence Group Inc. Lawrence Insurance, based in Albany, N.Y., plans to use the $22.5 million in proceeds to help finance the acquisition of United Republic.  By acquiring the shares, Lawrence Group increased its stake in Lawrence Insurance to 93.2% from 91.2%.  Lawrence Insurance underwrites mostly primary insurance, a company spokesman said.  A reinsurance company effectively insures insurance companies that wish to spread the risk of a particular policy.  Lawrence Group also owns Lawrence Agency Corp., Schenectady, N.Y., an insurance agency and brokerage.  Levi Strauss Associates Inc., the closely held owner of Levi Strauss & Co., said its fiscal third-quarter earnings jumped to $128.6 million from $31.3 million a year earlier, aided by a $69.8 million gain from the sale of stock in a Japanese subsidiary.  The apparel holding company had sales in the quarter ended Aug. 27 of $1 billion, up 12% from $908.8 million a year ago.  The company said its quarterly results are now being publicly filed as the result of the formation earlier this year of employee stock investment plans.  Wall Street would like UAL Corp.'s board to change its mind about keeping the company independent.  But what happens next in the continuing takeover drama may depend more on the company's two most powerful and fractious unions: the pilots and machinists.  Some people familiar with the situation believe that the collapse of the previous $6.79 billion buy-out, if anything, may have strengthened the hands of these two labor groups.  As a result, both may now have virtual veto power over any UAL transaction.  One reason: banks -- likely to react to any new UAL deal with even more caution than the first time around -- probably will insist on labor harmony before they agree to put up cash for any new bid or even a less-ambitious recapitalization plan.  "United pilots have shown on a number of occasions they are willing and able to strike," said an executive at Fuji Bank, one of UAL's large lenders.  "If you have both {labor} groups on strike, you've got no revenue and that's a very scary thing for a bank to be looking at."  Just this past week, a leading Japanese bank asked for a meeting with the machinists' union leaders to determine where the union would stand if another bid or recapitalization became possible.  Another reason: Emboldened by their success in helping to scuttle the previous transaction, the machinists are likely to be more aggressive if a second buy-out attempt occurs.  The two unions already had significant leverage simply because their employer has yet to settle with either on new contracts.  That gives them both the threat of a strike and the ability to resist any wage concessions that may be necessary to make a transaction work.  Thus, even investors who are pushing for the board to do a recapitalization that would pay shareholders a special dividend and possibly grant employees an ownership stake acknowledge that the unions are key.  "There's less likelihood of creating and completing a transaction without the unions' cooperation and wage concessions," said Richard Nye, of Baker, Nye Investments, a New York takeover stock-trader.  Mr. Nye thinks the UAL board should be ousted if it doesn't move soon to increase shareholder value.  Both the pilots and machinists have made it clear that they intend to block any transaction they don't like.  "The pilots will be involved in any transaction that takes place around here," pilot union chairman Frederick C. Dubinsky declared yesterday.  But whether the pilots can team up with their longtime adversaries, the machinists, is another question.  The pilots' Mr. Dubinsky says his union would like majority ownership for employees.  At the very least, the pilots want some form of control over the airline, perhaps through super-majority voting rights.  On the other hand, the machinists have always opposed majority ownership in principle, saying they don't think employees should be owners.  Still, in recent days, machinists' union leaders have shown some new flexibility.  "We may be able to reach a tradeoff where we can accommodate {the pilot union's} concerns and ours," said Brian M. Freeman, the machinists' financial adviser.  Mr. Freeman said machinists' union advisers plan to meet this week to try to draw up a blueprint for some form of recapitalization that could include a special dividend for shareholders, an employee stake and, perhaps, an equity investment by a friendly investor.  If a compromise can't be reached, the pilots maintain they can do a transaction without the support of the machinists.  But at this point, that may just be wishful thinking.  The machinists lobbied heavily against the original bid from UAL pilots and management for the company.  Their opposition helped scare off some Japanese banks.  The pilots' insistence on majority ownership also may make the idea of a recapitalization difficult to achieve.  "Who wants to be a public shareholder investing in a company controlled by the pilots' union?" asks Candace Browning, an analyst at Wertheim Schroeder & Co.  "Who would the board be working for -- the public shareholders or the pilots?" she adds.  Ms. Browning says she believes a recapitalization involving employee ownership would succeed only if the pilots relent on their demand for control.  She also notes that even if the pilots accept a minority stake now, they still could come back at a later time and try to take control.  Another possibility is for the pilots' to team up with an outside investor who might try to force the ouster of the board through the solicitation of consents.  In that way, the pilots may be able to force the board to approve a recapitalization that gives employees a majority stake, or to consider the labor-management group's latest proposal.  The group didn't make a formal offer, but instead told UAL's advisers before the most-recent board meeting that it was working on a bid valued at between $225 and $240 a share.  But again, they may need the help of the machinists.  "I think the dynamics of this situation are that something's got to happen," said one official familiar with the situation.  The board and UAL's management, he says, "can't go back" to business as usual.  "The pilots won't let them."  Delta Air Lines earnings soared 33% to a record in the fiscal first quarter, bucking the industry trend toward declining profits.  The Atlanta-based airline, the third largest in the U.S., attributed the increase to higher passenger traffic, new international routes and reduced service by rival Eastern Airlines, which is in bankruptcy proceedings in the wake of a strike that began last spring.  For the quarter ended Sept. 30, Delta posted net income of $133.1 million, or $2.53 a share, up from $100 million, or $2.03 a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 15% to $2.17 billion from $1.89 billion.  During the quarter, Delta issued 2.5 million shares of common stock to Swissair, and repurchased 1.1 million shares for use in a company employee stock ownership plan.  "The key to Delta's record earnings continued to be excellent passenger revenue growth," said Thomas Roeck, chief financial officer.  Passenger traffic jumped 14% in the quarter, while profit per passenger grew 2%.  Delta has benefited more than other carriers from the weakness of Eastern Airlines, which shares the Atlanta hub.  Although Eastern is back to about 80% of its pre-strike schedule now, the Texas Air Corp. subsidiary was only beginning to get back on its feet during the quarter.  Separately, America West Airlines, Phoenix, Ariz., reported third-quarter profit jumped 45% to $5.8 million, or 28 cents a share, from $4 million, or 24 cents a share, a year earlier.  The latest results include a $2.6 million one-time payment from a "foreign entity."  America West wouldn't identify the entity, but said the payment was for the foreign company's use of certain tax benefits in connection with America West plane purchases.  Year-earlier results included an extraordinary gain of $1.6 million from a buy-back of convertible subordinated debentures.  Revenue rose 21% to $243.4 million from $201.2 million.  For the nine months, America West posted earnings of $18.9 million, or 97 cents a share, compared with a loss of $9.7 million, or 74 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 27% to $715.1 million from $563.8 million.  PAPERS: Thomson Corp.'s Globe & Mail newspaper in November will begin transmitting an experimental edition to selected subscribers' facsimile machines.  The four-page news summary will be aimed at readers outside Canada or in Canadian locations where the national daily isn't available on the day of publication.  In the U.S., the Hartford Courant has a facsimile edition and some other newspapers are considering the idea.  WHO'S NEWS: Michael T. Carr, advertising director of Playboy magazine, was named publisher of National Lampoon and Heavy Metal magazines, succeeding George Agoglia.  It was the first management change since film-makers Daniel Grodnik and Tim Matheson took control of National Lampoon Inc. in March.  They are looking for a new editor for National Lampoon and are trying to sell Heavy Metal.  Columbia Savings & Loan Association, reeling from thrift-accounting changes mandated by Congress and the recent collapse of the junk-bond market, announced a loss for the third quarter of $226.3 million, or $11.57 a share.  For the quarter a year ago, Columbia reported earnings of $16.3 million, or 37 cents a share.  Total assets increased to $12.7 billion in the latest quarter from $12.4 billion a year earlier.  The loss stems from $357.5 million of write-downs on Columbia's $4.4 billion high-yield investment securities portfolio, which includes about $3.7 billion of junk bonds, $400 million of preferred stock, and Treasury securities.  Columbia owes its spectacular growth in recent years to its junk-bond portfolio, the largest of any U.S. thrift.  Much of Columbia's junk-bond trading has been done through the high-yield department of its Beverly Hills neighbor, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  For the nine months, losses totaled $212 million, or $10.83 a share, compared with net income of $48.7 million, or $1.11 a share, a year earlier.  The results include a $130.2 million write-down of the securities in the high-yield portfolio to the lower of their cost or market value.  Columbia also added $227.3 million to reserves for losses on the portfolio, increasing general reserves to $300 million, or about 6.7% of the total portfolio, as of Sept. 30.  On June 30, loss reserves stood at $108.3 million.  Thrift officials said the $300 million reserve will be adjusted quarterly and will reflect the rate of dispositions and market conditions.  The adjustments result from the recently passed thrift-industry bailout legislation, which requires thrifts to divest all high-yield bond investments by 1994.  Previously, Columbia didn't have to adjust the book value of its junk-bond holdings to reflect declines in market prices, because it held the bonds as long-term investments.  Because Columbia now must sell the bonds within five years, accounting rules require the thrift to value the bonds at the lower of cost or market prices.  For its future strategy, Columbia officials said the thrift may branch out into commercial lending or managing outside investments, as well as beefing up more traditional thrift activities.  The quarterly results also reflected $21.4 million in non-recurring losses from commercial real-estate activities in California.  Thomas Spiegel, Columbia's chairman, said in a statement that the thrift was "disappointed" by the effects of the accounting changes.  But he said Columbia remains "one of the most strongly capitalized thrifts in the industry," based on the economic value of its assets and tangible capital.  Columbia announced the results after the close of the stock market.  Its shares closed at $5.125 each in composite New York Stock Exchange trading, down 37.5 cents.  The price of Columbia shares has been cut nearly in half since August, when they traded at about $10, as investors apparently realized that the thrift would be forced to take a big write-down.  The stock's decline accelerated in the past two weeks, from a price of $8 a share on Oct. 9.  Columbia officials said they don't know how quickly they will dispose of the thrift's junk bonds, because federal regulations, such as those that would allow thrifts to continue holding the bonds in separately capitalized subsidiaries, haven't yet been completed.  Columbia officials also said the thrift shouldn't face problems meeting regulatory capital requirements, despite the large reserves and write-downs and stiffer regulatory requirements that should be in place by year's end.  Its ratio of tangible equity to total assets as of Sept. 30 was 3.6%, and total equity was $457.9 million.  The thrift emphasized that it has a large portfolio of equity securities issued in connection with corporate restructurings and leveraged buy-outs, which has a book value of $90 million.  Although many of the transactions related to those securities haven't been completed, Columbia said the ultimate gain on the sale of those assets will range from $200 million to $300 million.  Columbia also has unrealized gains in its public equity securities portfolio of more than $70 million.  ---  David B. Hilder in New York contributed to this article.  Anheuser-Busch Cos. said it plans to aggressively discount its major beer brands, setting the stage for a potentially bruising price war as the maturing industry's growth continues to slow.  Anheuser, the world's largest brewer and U.S. market leader, has historically been reluctant to engage in price-cutting as a means of boosting sales volume.  With the passing of the heady days of swelling industry sales, however, the once-sporadic and brief forays into discounting are becoming standard competitive weapons in the beer industry.  Over the summer, Anheuser competitors offered more and deeper discounts than industry observers have seen for a long time.  Some experts now predict Anheuser's entry into the fray means near-term earnings trouble for all the industry players.  The St. Louis company said major rivals, Philip Morris Co.'s Miller Brewing unit and Adolph Coors Co. "have been following a policy of continuous and deep discounting for at least the past 18 months" on their premium brands, pricing their product as much as 25 cents a 12-pack below Anheuser's Budweiser label in many markets.  Anheuser said it's discounting policy basically would involve matching such moves by rivals on a market-by-market basis.  Anheuser-Busch announced its plan at the same time it reported third-quarter net income rose a lower-than-anticipated 5.2% to $238.3 million, or 83 cents a share, from $226.5 million, or 78 cents.  Third-period sales were $2.49 billion, up from last year's $2.34 billion.  Anheuser said its new strategy -- started in some markets last month and expected to be applied soon in selected markets nationwide -- will mean lower-than-anticipated earnings for the last half of 1989 and for 1990.  The projection sent Anheuser shares plunging $4.375 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  The stock closed at $38.50 on heavy volume of about 3.5 million shares.  Shares of Coors, the company's sole publicly traded major competitor, fell $1.50 apiece to $19.125 in national over-the-counter trading, apparently on investor concerns over potential fallout from the coming pricing struggle.  Anheuser noted that "beer industry sales volume is 1989 is following the trend that has characterized the last half of the '80s, with sales volume being essentially flat" while consolidation creates fewer, bigger players.  "We cannot permit a further slowing in our volume trend," Anheuser said, adding it will take "appropriate competitive pricing actions to support our long-term market share growth strategy" for the premium brands.  Anheuser said it continues to hold to its earlier-announced goal of a 50% U.S. market share by the mid-1990s.  Beneath the tepid news-release jargon lies a powerful threat from the brewing giant, which last year accounted for about 41% of all U.S. beer sales and is expected to see that grow to 42.5% in the current year.  "Anheuser is the biggest guy in the bar, and he just decided to join in the barroom brawl," said Joseph J. Doyle, an analyst with Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  "It's going to get bloody."  Jerry Steinman, publisher of Beer Marketers Insights, a trade newsletter, said Anheuser's announcement means "everybody else in the industry is going to have a difficult time reaching their profit objectives."  Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. analyst George E. Thompson downplayed the importance of the announcement, and called any comparison between the coming beer-industry tiff and the seemingly unending "cola wars," unwarranted.  Mr. Thompson calls discounting "a loser's game for anyone without a dominant market share," and projected that Anheuser's statement of intent could simply be a means of warning competitors to ease up on price-cutting or face a costly and fruitless battle.  Mr. Thompson noted that the disappointing earnings, which fell five cents a share short of his own projections, contributed to the sell-off by an edgy and currently unforgiving investing public.  But Smith Barney's Mr. Doyle, who yesterday trimmed his 1990 Anheuser earnings projection to $2.95 a share from $3.10, called the market's reaction "justified."  While the third-quarter earnings were a "moderate disappointment," he said, "the real bad news is the intensity of price competition" in the premium-beer sector.  According to Mr. Steinman, the newsletter publisher, Anheuser's market share is nearly twice that of its nearest competitor, Miller Brewing, which had a 21.2% stake last year.  It's followed by Stroh Brewery Co., which has agreed to sell its assets to Coors.  Both Coors and Stroh have recently been ceding market share to Miller and Anheuser.  Tokyo stocks closed easier for the second consecutive day, finishing at the intraday low on index-linked investment trust fund selling toward the end of the afternoon session.  Stocks rose in London, but fell again in Frankfurt.  Tokyo's Nikkei index fell 84.15 points to 35442.40.  Trading was active.  Volume on the first section was estimated at 1 billion shares, up from 914 million Tuesday.  The Tokyo stock price index of first section issues was down 8.65 at 2672.57.  In early trading in Tokyo Thursday, the Nikkei index rose 145.45 points to 35587.85.  On Wednesday, the market opened bullishly with high turnover, ignoring the volatility in New York stocks.  But losers were spread in a broad range by the end of the session.  A trader said that the more an issue gained recently, the sharper the loss sustained Wednesday.  A trader at Yamaichi Securities said the market's mood was undercut by the continuing fall of Nippon Telegraph & Telephone shares, which declined to their lowest level since the begining of this year.  NTT lost 30,000 yen to 1,380,000 yen ($9,756).  Some traders noted individual investors dumped NTT shares amid growing expectation for a division of the company as suggested by a recent government-sponsored panel.  Dealers said they also took profits to reduce holdings in their own account at the end of the October transaction period.  Among pharmaceutical shares, Chugai lost 60 yen to 2,290 yen ($16.20), and Mochida fell 150 to 4,290.  Other losing issues included Showa Shell, which fell 40 to 1,520.  Toyota Motor fell 40 to 2,680.  Sekisui House, which gained 150 Tuesday, lost 70 to 2640.  Daiwa House also ended easier, but Misawa Home was firmer.  Pioneer Electronic and Sony, both of which dominated buying earlier this month, continued to fall Wednesday.  Pioneer was down 90 at 5,810, and Sony lost 40 to 8,550, down 10% from its record set Oct. 11.  London share prices closed modestly higher largely on technical factors, although the market was underpinned near the end of the session by Wall Street's firmer trend.  The Financial Times 100-share index finished at 2161.9, up 12.6 points.  The 30-share index ended 12.6 points higher at 1751.9.  Volume was thin at 374.6 million shares traded, down from 405.4 million Tuesday.  Dealers said the market gained some late steam on a flurry of buying by market-makers looking at blue-chip issues and stocks viewed as oversold during the market's recent downtrend.  Outside what essentially amounted to a bookkeeping exercise, dealers said London dealings were largely dulled by the absence of active interest beyond the market-makers.  The late buying was drawn into the London market, dealers added, after Wall Street showed signs of stability following its rocky opening.  Stocks that suffered on the day were those with active U.S. operations, dealers noted.  Among them were B.A.T Industries, which settled 6 pence a share lower at 753 ($12.10).  Hanson, with 15 million shares traded, closed 2.5 lower at 212.5.  Dealers said the shares were hit by fears of a slowdown in the U.S. economy.  Cable & Wireless benefited from a market squeeze, bouncing 13 to 498 in moderately active volume.  Jaguar was boosted 21 to 715 on follow-through buying after Ford Motor's announcement Tuesday that it might be prepared to mount a full bid for the U.K. luxury auto maker.  It was further helped by Ford, which announced after London's close that it had raised its stake to 12% from just under 11% on Tuesday.  Frankfurt prices closed sharply lower in thin dealings, hurt by the roller-coaster session on Wall Street Tuesday and worries about wage demands by the largest West German trade union.  The German stock index tumbled 26.29 to end at 1481.08.  "It was dead, listless, depressing and negative," said one trader at a U.S. bank in Frankfurt.  "There was little turnover and nothing to stimulate the market."  Equities tumbled at the opening as Tuesday's gyrations on Wall Street, where the Dow Jones Industrial Average recovered most of an 80-point loss, fueled fears of another stock market crash, brokers said.  Tough talk from trade union officials at the conference of the powerful IG Metall metals worker union in West Berlin raised the specter of nationwide strikes next spring, they said.  For the 1990 wage negotiations, the IG Metall is demanding a further cut in the German workweek and steep wage increases, which could sharply increase the costs for German industry.  "All the positive figures on the economy are out already, and people are focusing more on the dangers for next year, mostly the wage talks and the {parliamentary} elections," the U.S. trader said.  The market also shrugged off positive factors, such as higher bond prices and a slowdown in monetary growth in September, traders said.  They said they expect the bearish mood to persist a while longer, as trading volume is falling toward the end of the year and the market is becoming more volatile.  In the auto sector, Bayerische Motoren Werke plunged 14.5 marks to 529 marks ($288), Daimler-Benz dropped 10.5 to 700, and Volkswagen slumped 9 to 435.5.  Continental gave up some of its recent gains, dropping 8 to 338, as rumors of an impending takeover attempt for the tiremaker faded, brokers said.  Deutsche Bank plummeted 12 to 645, hurt by the general mood.  Other banks were slightly more resilient, with Dresdner Bank shedding 4.8 to 320, and Commerzbank slipping 2.5 to 246.5.  Meanwhile, Wall Street's volatility unnerved investors in other markets.  Share prices closed lower in Paris, Zurich, Brussels, Milan and Stockholm, and mixed in Amsterdam.  Among Pacific markets, prices closed lower in Sydney, Seoul, Hong Kong, Manila, Singapore and Wellington.  Trading in Taipei was suspended for a national holiday.  ---  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Oct 23 Oct 20 Year  @U.S. .................... 317.1 319.1 + 23.8  @Britain.................. 654.3 651.7 + 19.8  @Canada................... 427.8 432.4 + 16.5  @Japan.................... 1555.7 1550.4 + 9.5  @France................... 531.2 530.4 + 20.0  @Germany.................. 242.4 242.8 + 16.6  @Hong Kong................ 2070.9 2048.0 + 2.0  @Switzerland.............. 220.7 221.3 + 27.6  @Australia................ 333.1 334.5 + 14.7  @World index.............. 534.9 535.2 + 8.2  French chemicals group, Orkem S.A., said Wednesday it has made a bid for control of Coates Brothers PLC, a British manufacturer of inks and polyester resins.  State-controlled Orkem already owns 40.6% of Coates.  The remainder is held by the public and by family interests, a spokeswoman for the French group said.  Orkem declined to give details of its offer, saying only that the bid will be submitted for approval by the board of the British company.  The Democratic-controlled House, by a margin of 51 votes, failed to override President Bush's veto of legislation renewing federal support of Medicaid abortions for poor women who are victims of rape and incest.  The 231-191 roll call illustrates the limits of power a resurgent abortion-rights movement still faces.  It continues to gain strength in the chamber but remains far short of the two-thirds majority required to prevail over Mr. Bush.  Democrats voted to override by a 3-1 margin, but Republicans were equally firm in support of the president, who has threatened to make abortion a decisive issue on at least three separate fiscal 1990 spending bills.  Yesterday's vote dealt with the largest of these bills, an estimated $156.7 billion measure funding the departments of Labor, Education, and Health and Human Services.  To gain more leverage, abortion-rights advocates may seek to fold the bill into an omnibus continuing resolution next month.  But the stark numbers yesterday -- when 282 votes were needed -- indicate the president is in a commanding position for at least this year.  "Unless he changes, they lose," said a Democratic leadership aide.  The action came as Congress sent to the president last night a stopgap spending bill to keep the government operating through Nov. 15 and provide $2.85 billion in emergency funds to assist in the recovery from Hurricane Hugo and the California earthquake.  By a lopsided 97-1 margin, the Senate approved the measure after attaching further provisions sought by the influential California delegation and, despite reservations, the House adopted the bill on a 303-107 roll call.  The package is more than $1 billion above the recommendations of Budget Director Richard Darman this week.  But given the political importance of California, the administration was content to use its influence to prevent any Senate amendments adding further new appropriations.  The $2.85 billion measure comes on top of $1.1 billion appropriated after Hugo struck the Carolinas and Caribbean last month, and these totals don't reflect the additional benefit of low-interest disaster loans.  The bill last night includes $500 million to help finance this credit and further raises the obligation ceiling for the Small Business Administration sixfold to $1.8 billion to accommodate the expected loan activity.  In direct cash assistance, $1 billion is provided in federal highway construction funds, and $1.35 billion is divided between general emergency aid and a reserve to be available to the president to meet unanticipated costs from the two disasters.  In the Senate, Majority Whip Alan Cranston used his position to win not only the expanded credit but also more generous treatment than the House had permitted in the distribution of highway funds in the next six months.  The emergency assistance wouldn't be counted against a state's normal allocation of annual highway funds, and the bill circumvents existing restrictions that otherwise would prevent the use of federal aid to repair a toll road, such as the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge damaged in last week's earthquake.  The underlying stopgap bill is the second required by Congress this fall and, since the current fiscal year began Oct. 1, only the Energy and Interior departments are operating on permanent appropriations enacted into law.  The standoff over abortion is certain to contribute to further delays and, apart from the health and education measure vetoed by Mr. Bush, bills funding the District of Columbia and the entire U.S. foreign-aid budget are in jeopardy because of related abortion or family-planning issues.  The vote yesterday was the most partisan in many years, and though the Democratic leadership is ambivalent about how to address the abortion issue, the debate is increasingly measured in party terms.  The 189 Democrats who supported the override yesterday compare with 175 who initially backed the rape-and-incest exemption two weeks ago and 136 last year on a similar vote.  By comparison, Republicans have held closer to the anti-abortion movement.  Only 42 GOP members opposed the president's veto, a marginal increase over the vote two weeks ago and just 12 more than the 30 who supported the rape-and-incest exemption last year.  At a recent White House meeting, Rep. Silvio Conte (R., Mass.), the ranking minority member of the House Appropriations Committee, argued with his friend Mr. Bush against a veto, and though Mr. Conte and Minority Leader Robert Michel of Illinois stood with the president yesterday, they are plainly uncomfortable with his position.  "This isn't a political issue, this is a moral issue," said Rep. Henry Hyde (R., Ill.), the most eloquent spokesman for the anti-abortion movement.  But after years of using the issue for its benefit, the GOP finds its candidates on the defensive.  New Jersey gubernatorial candidate Rep. James Florio pointedly returned from campaigning to vote against the president yesterday in contrast with his opponent, GOP Rep. James Courter, who has ardently supported abortion restrictions in the past but was absent.  In an extraordinary mix of cultures and church-state powers, Rep. Robert Dornan (R., Calif.) lectured his fellow Roman Catholics -- including Mr. Florio -- for having the "chutzpah" to disagree with the hierarchy of their church on abortion.  Rep. Les AuCoin was as blunt on behalf of the abortion-rights movement.  "This may not make George Bush a one-term president," said the Oregon liberal, addressing the Republican side of the House.  "But if you support him over rape victims, this may be your last term."  Separately, the House last night approved a nearly $67 billion compromise spending bill providing the first construction funds for the administration's ambitious space station in fiscal 1990 and incorporating far-reaching provisions affecting the federal mortgage market.  The current ceiling on home loans insured by the Federal Housing Administration would be increased to $124,875, and the bill gives the Department of Housing and Urban Development new authority to facilitate the refinancing of subsidized loans for low-income homeowners.  By a 325-92 margin, the Appropriations Committee leadership beat back an early challenge by House Banking Chairman Henry Gonzalez (D., Texas) to the FHA provision.  And on a closer 250-170 roll call, lawmakers upheld controversial agreements made by a House-Senate conference earmarking community development funds for more than 40 projects backed by often influential members.  Rupert Murdoch acquired a 25% stake in Grupo Zeta S.A., the leading Spanish magazine and newspaper publisher said.  The transaction called for Mr. Murdoch's News International PLC, a unit of Australia-based News Corp., to subscribe to a rights issue by Zeta valued at 6.65 billion pesetas ($57 million).  Also participating in the issue was Servifilm Spain Cinematografica S.A.  The film producer, owned by Madrid-based financier Jacques Hachuel, received a 5% stake in the Barcelona-based publishing group.  The cash injection boosted Zeta's capital more than four-fold, to 8.47 billion pesetas from 1.82 billion pesetas, greatly enhancing the group's ability to make investments, Zeta officials said.  Following its failure last month to win a license for one of Spain's first three private television stations, Zeta is seeking investment opportunities in communications and publishing.  With annual sales of about 30 billion pesetas, Zeta publishes over a dozen magazines, including the popular Tiempo, Interviu and Panorama, and three regional dailies.  Chairman Antonio Asensio will retain a 70% share in Zeta.  The New York Stock Exchange is expected to launch its own program trading vehicle today, just as controversy over this trading strategy heats up.  The Big Board this morning plans to begin trading its Exchange Stock Portfolio "basket" product, the first program-trading vehicle carrying the exchange's seal of approval.  ESPs will allow institutional investors to buy or sell all 500 stocks in Standard & Poor's index in a single trade of a minimum of $5 million.  "Customized" baskets of fewer stocks will also be available.  The Securities and Exchange Commission gave provisional six-month approval to the Big Board basket at a meeting late yesterday.  The SEC at the same time approved a similar but smaller basket product on the Chicago Board Options Exchange, where the minimum will be $1.7 million.  Also approved was a plan to trade stock portfolios by computer after regular hours on the Midwest Stock Exchange.  The basket products are "an evolutionary step" in solving problems in trading big blocks of stock that came to light in the 1987 market crash, said SEC Commissioner Joseph Grundfest.  New SEC Chairman Richard Breeden, overseeing his first public meeting, said there have been concerns that the Big Board's basket could attract investors with a "short-term perspective" who would rapidly turn over the product, thus increasing volatility.  But Richard Ketchum, the SEC's market regulation chief, said he didn't believe "this will spawn dramatic new program-trading strategies that will be destabilizing."  The baskets on the Big Board and CBOE -- which involve the actual S&P stocks, unlike the stock-index contracts currently traded on the Chicago futures markets, and index options on the CBOE -- will begin trading as critics step up their attacks on program trading and its contributions to the stock market's wild price swings.  The Big Board argues that its new product will help rather than hurt the situation by possibly drawing business from more-volatile forms of program trading.  ESPs are also an attempt by the Big Board to head off the exodus of program trading business to overseas markets such as London.  Big Board officials also hope Japanese investors will become interested in the exchange's product.  Already, many of the Big Board's own floor traders are warning that the ESP baskets are risky and not in the best interests of the investing public.  The 400-member Alliance of Floor Brokers said the new product, with the $5 million minimum, will benefit only big institutional investors and could lead to "wild spasms of volatility."  Stockbrokers who cater to individual investors said the Big Board's new product confirms the exchange doesn't want to curtail program trading, which last month accounted for a record 13.8% of the exchange's average daily volume.  "The New York Stock Exchange is losing its cool here," said James Andrews, head of institutional trading at Janney Montgomery Scott Inc. in Philadelphia.  The new stock baskets "are going to make it easier for program trading to be done.  And it's going to be done more frequently as the result of having more access to it at different places."  Both the Big Board's Exchange Stock Portfolio and the Chicago exchange's Market Basket are designed for institutional investors.  The Big Board lists its targets as pension plans, mutual fund managers and index-arbitrage traders.  In index arbitrage, program traders buy and sell stocks and stock-index futures to profit from small price discrepancies between the markets.  At the same time, only four securities firms have signed up with the Big Board to buy and sell ESPs as market makers, an unenthusiastic response.  The market makers so far are CS First Boston Group's First Boston Corp. unit, Morgan Stanley & Co., PaineWebber Group Inc. and Salomon Inc.'s Salomon Brothers Inc. unit.  Kidder, Peabody & Co., a General Electric Co. unit that has become the biggest program trader along with Morgan Stanley, isn't a market maker, although the Big Board hopes that will change.  Similarly, the Big Board hopes to entice Merrill Lynch & Co. Neither has plans to be a market maker for now.  Traders said major securities firms are reluctant to become market makers because they fear the baskets may attract only limited trading.  Big Board officials say only 25 contracts a day may trade at first, equivalent to a day's action at a small, regional exchange.  Even though the Big Board says its product represents a post-crash "reform," some traders suggest that if the new basket had been trading during this month's Friday the 13th market plunge, the Dow Jones Industrial Average might have dropped more than the 190 points it did.  With the futures locked into a trading halt Oct. 13 and trading in some individual stock difficult, program traders would have undoubtedly fled to the basket system, the traders say.  "If we had the baskets, we would be leaving in caskets," one trader said.  The SEC's Mr. Breeden said the after-hours trading on the Midwest exchange would help the U.S. win back business that has moved overseas to conduct after-hours trades.  Comprehensive Care Corp., which has agreed to be acquired by closely held First Hospital Corp., reported a $4.7 million loss for its Aug. 31 first quarter and said it is negotiating an extension of senior bank debt past its Oct. 18 due date.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Comprehensive Care shares plunged $3.625 to close at $4.75 on volume of 1,177,000 shares.  The loss in Comprehensive Care's latest quarter is equal to 46 cents a share.  In the year-earlier quarter, Comprehensive Care earned $1.6 million, or 18 cents a share.  Revenue in the latest quarter fell 17% to $44 million from $53.2 million, the company said, reflecting poor utilization of the company's facilities and its behavioral medicine contracts.  Comprehensive Care shareholders have approved acquisition of the developer and operator of Care-Unit chemical dependency and psychiatric programs for about $58 million in cash, notes and stock of First Hospital, Norfolk, Va.  The price was reduced last August from an indicated value of $76 million.  Comprehensive Care said First Hospital had advised it that both bank debt and senior notes would be repaid after the acquisition, although it isn't assured the acquisition will be completed.  If it isn't completed, Comprehensive Care said it would be "required to promptly restructure its debt."  First Hospital advised Comprehensive Care that an agent for the financial institutions providing financing of its acquisition is scheduled to make a final credit determination tomorrow, and that a favorable determination could result in a reorganization at Comprehensive Care "by the end of October."  Failure to win such a determination, however, would lead Comprehensive Care directors to "consider various alternatives," Comprehensive Care said, without elaborating.  Separately, First Hospital reported a 1.6% rise in net income to $6.1 million for its year ended June 30 on a 27% increase in revenue to $110.6 million.  It said, however, that net income for the two-month period ended Aug. 31 plunged to $150,000 from $851,000 in the prior year on a 33% rise in revenue to $21.4 million.  A group including New York investors Douglas A. Kass and Anthony Pedone holds the equivalent of a 12.6% stake in H.H. Robertson Co.'s common shares outstanding, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Officials of Pittsburgh-based H.H. Robertson, which makes steel roofs, store fronts and building parts, declined comment.  As reported last month, Mr. Kass said he was interested in making an offer to buy H.H. Robertson for $13 a share.  In the SEC filing, the Kass-Pedone group said it intends to acquire additional H.H. Robertson shares "with a view towards a possible change in control of the company."  It has not, however, made a formal proposal.  The group also is engaged in talks with third parties regarding obtaining financing to buy more shares, but no agreements have yet been reached, the filing said.  The group controls 795,900 H.H. Robertson common shares, assuming exercise of an option it acquired from Executive Life Insurance Co. to buy 497,400 shares.  Its stake includes 106,100 shares bought in the open market from Aug. 30 to Oct. 18 for $10.375 to $12.125 a share.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, H.H. Robertson closed at $11.625, up 62.5 cents.  After coming close to a partial settlement a year ago, shareholders who filed civil suits against Ivan F. Boesky and the partnerships he once controlled again are approaching an accord, people familiar with the case said.  Meanwhile, within the next few weeks, the limited partners in Ivan F. Boesky & Co. L.P. are expected to reach a partial settlement with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. regarding the distribution of the $330 million in partnership assets, said one of the individuals.  Under the terms of the settlement, the limited partners would drop their civil suits against Drexel, now pending in federal court in New York, another individual said.  Attorneys involved in the talks said that the parties were closer to accord than they were a year ago, when reports of an imminent agreement circulated.  One individual said the shareholders' accord was "well worked out."  However, less optimistic attorneys warned that because of the tangle of numerous defendants and plaintiffs with overlapping claims, there is always the possibility that the talks will again fall apart.  A shareholders' accord would provide the first restitution to thousands of individuals and institutions claiming losses as a result of insider trading by Boesky & Co., once the largest arbitrage fund in the U.S.  The plaintiffs are investors who bought and sold securities in which Mr. Boesky and his partnerships were dealing.  Some claim they suffered losses because they sold while he was buying and others because they bought while he was selling.  Stocks involved in the shareholder suits include Union Carbide, RJR Nabisco, American Natural Resources, Boise Cascade Corp., General Foods Corp., Houston Natural Gas and FMC Corp.  There are at least 27 class-action shareholder suits that have been consolidated in federal court in New York under U.S. District Judge Milton Pollack.  Among the defendants are Mr. Boesky; the now-defunct Ivan F. Boesky & Co.; Mr. Boesky's main underwriter, Drexel Burnham; and Cambrian & General Securities PLC, a British investment fund once controlled by Mr. Boesky.  Individuals familiar with the negotiations said the partial settlement being negotiated would remove the Boesky partnership, the British fund and Mr. Boesky as defendants, while Drexel and other defendants would remain.  Charles Davidow, of the Washington, D.C.-based law firm Wilmer, Cutler & Pickering, which represents Mr. Boesky in this matter, said only that "discussions are under way.  There are no agreements yet."  It has been three years since Mr. Boesky, now in prison, agreed to pay a $100 million fine to settle the government's charges that he had traded illegally using insider information.  Out of this, the government set up a $50 million fund for plaintiffs who can prove their financial losses.  According to William Orbe, an attorney at Grais & Richards, the escrow agents for the fund, as of Sept. 30 the fund amounted to $60.5 million.  Separately, attorneys for the 42 or so limited partners have had serious discussions that could lead to the distribution of the partnership's assets.  The limited partners include insurance companies, financial institutions and individual investors.  An agreement with Drexel regarding the limited partners' investments is an essential step toward getting their money back.  This is because a Delaware court earlier this year said that Drexel is entitled to get its money back before or at the same time as the limited partners.  Drexel is owed $20 million by the partnership.  An individual familiar with the negotiations said that whatever investments the limited partners do not recoup from the $330 million in partnership assets, they will receive from the $350 million restitution fund available as a result of Drexel's settlement with the government in December 1988.  Drexel agreed to plead guilty to six felony counts and pay $650 million, of which $350 million was set aside for shareholders and other plaintiffs, including the limited partners, who claim they were injured by Drexel.  ---  JAILED AFRICAN-AMERICAN activist wins a battle against the FBI.  U.S. District Judge Robert P. Patterson Jr. ordered the FBI to immediately begin processing Herman Benjamin Ferguson's request for documents stemming from the agency's investigation of him during the 1960s.  The FBI had said it would not be able to begin processing the request until June 1990.  Mr. Ferguson, who is 68 years old, fled the U.S. in 1970 after exhausting his appeals of a 1968 conviction on conspiracy to murder.  He turned himself in to authorities in New York earlier this year.  He maintains that the information from the FBI will help him get his 1968 conviction vacated and his bail-jumping indictment dismissed.  His attorneys claim he was framed by the FBI and New York police as part of a campaign to destroy the black liberation movement of the 1960s.  Because the federal Freedom of Information Act wasn't law at that time, the FBI wasn't required to turn over information on its investigations when Mr. Ferguson appealed his conviction in the 1960s.  But in federal court in Manhattan, Judge Patterson said the FBI records could show that Mr. Ferguson's arrest was the result of questionable legal practices.  The judge said that if the FBI's proposed schedule was followed in releasing the documents, "a delay of over one year will have occurred and plaintiff will have served approximately two-thirds of his 3 1/2-year minimum sentence by the time he receives the files."  Gabriel W. Gorenstein, the assistant U.S. attorney handling the case for the FBI, said no decision has been made about appealing the judge's ruling.  ---  FEDERAL COURTS URGED to cut costs and reduce delays of civil suits.  The study, conducted by a task force of the Brookings Institution, suggests that Congress should require the courts to develop the plans.  The study was initiated by Senate Judiciary Committee chairman Joseph Biden (D., Del.).  The Washington, D.C., think tank recommends that the courts adopt different "tracks" for different types of civil cases in order to separate the handling of highly complex suits from simpler ones.  Complex cases, such as antitrust suits and many business disputes, would receive intense supervision by federal judges to keep pretrial proceedings moving.  Standard cases would require less judicial attention, and fast-track cases could be resolved quickly.  The study also said each federal court should set strict time limits for the pretrial exchange of documents and evidence, ranging from as much as 100 days for cases in the fast track to as much as 18 months for complex disputes.  And the study said federal courts should set firm trial dates early in the process.  To take advantage of local expertise and custom, the study said, Congress should require each of the 94 federal district courts to adopt its own plan to speed the handling of civil suits and to reduce the high costs in civil cases.  Although some of the study's recommendations resemble those of similar projects, the makeup of the task force was unusually diverse, adding significance to the effort.  It included lawyers from civil rights and consumer groups, plaintiffs' lawyers and defense attorneys, corporate counsel and law professors.  Businessland Inc. said it purchased a major regional computer retailer, Data Systems Computer Centre Inc., Springfield, New Jersey.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The purchase strengthens San Jose, Calif.-based Businessland's links to the large corporations who are among the biggest buyers of computers.  Data Systems has five retail stores in the northeast, but specializes in selling personal computers made by International Business Machines Corp. and Apple Computer Inc. to banks, brokerage firms and other big businesses based in the New York metropolitan area.  John Fitzsimmons, chief executive officer of Data Systems, said the company was profitable and expected sales of nearly $100 million this year.  He said Businessland, which operates stores in 50 U.S. metropolitan areas, planned to absorb his firm's operations.  Eastman Kodak Co. of Rochester, N.Y., said its Lehn & Fink Products subsidiary was restructured to form two operating groups, one for household products such as cleaners and disinfectants and the other for do-it-yourself products such as wood finishes and stains.  The Montvale, N.J., unit said the new operating structure "creates a more focused and responsive organization geared to effectively managing the size and scope of the unit's current business."  The consumer brands unit was absorbed by the photographic, pharmaceutical and chemical concern last year when it acquired Sterling Drug Inc.  In a related matter, Peter Black, president of consumer brand Minwax, was named group vice president for the household products operating group.  Kenneth M. Evans, president of Thompson & Formby brand, was named group vice president of the do-it-yourself operating group.  Sotheby's Holdings Inc., the parent of the auction house Sotheby's, said its net loss for the seasonally slow third quarter narrowed from a year earlier on a leap in operating revenue.  The New York-based company reported a third-quarter net loss of $5.1 million, or 10 cents a share, compared with a year-earlier net loss of $6.2 million, or 12 cents a share.  Operating revenue surged 54% in the latest period to $42.9 million from $27.7 million.  The company said 80% of its auction business is usually conducted in the second and fourth quarters, with the current quarter having begun "extremely well."  West Texas Intermediate, the U.S. benchmark crude, seemed tethered again yesterday in trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  Widely expected to open 10 to 15 cents a barrel higher on the strength of statistics from the American Petroleum Institute, the December contract managed to start the session only eight cents higher.  In the last hour of the trading day, December contract took a tumble to end the session 10 cents lower at $19.62 a barrel.  And now that the price has fallen below $19.65, which many had said showed considerable resistance, some traders and analysts figure there's little to stop the price from going lower on technical decisions.  With no petroleum-related news or changes in the fundamentals to dictate price moves, "technicians are wanting to sell this stuff," said Eric Bolling of Edge Trading Corp.  "And short-term, the technicians may have their way."  The market quickly discounted the weekly inventory report showing a 6.3 million barrel decrease in U.S. crude oil stocks as the legacy of Hurricane Jerry.  That storm hit the Gulf Coast Oct. 13, closing the Louisiana Offshore Oil Port for a time and preventing tankers from unloading.  Next week's report could very well show an increase in crude inventories.  Dismissing the trade group's numbers left traders plenty of time to worry anew about the latest reports on OPEC production.  An AP-Dow Jones survey of integrated oil companies, independent refiners, and oil industry consultants indicates that the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries increased its production to 22.2 million barrels a day in September.  Estimates suggest October's figure may be even higher.  That level of production isn't of much concern as long as demand continues strong, analysts said.  But the first quarter of the year is generally the weakest and OPEC production doesn't seem to be slackening in anticipation of that.  Also, maintaining current demand assumes no significant slowdown in world economies.  To top off the bearish factors affecting yesterday's trading, late October weather, especially in the Northeast U.S., continues to be very moderate, leaving heating oil futures trading lackluster.  "We aren't seeing any cold weather here," Mr. Bolling said from New York.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Soybean and corn futures prices moved higher on the strength of buying from commodity pool managers trying to profit from technical price trends, as well as continued export strength.  A leveling off of farmer selling tied to the harvest also removed some of the downward pressure on futures contract prices.  Wheat futures prices fell, however, at least partly in reaction to the rumored selling of futures contracts equal to several million bushels of wheat by commodity speculator Richard Dennis.  Neither Mr. Dennis nor officials of his Chicago trading company, C&D Commodities, could be reached for comment.  As for corn and soybean futures, "a lot of commission house buying this morning and computer-driven buying" supported prices in early trading, said Steven Freed, a futures analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. in Chicago.  Soybean futures for November delivery gained 5.25 cents a bushel to close at $5.66 a bushel on the Chicago Board of Trade.  December corn futures added 2.25 cents a bushel to close at $2.4225 a bushel on the Board of Trade.  Announced and anticipated purchases from foreign countries are also supporting futures prices.  "Russian ships are arriving in the gulf and there isn't enough grain in the pipeline," said Katharina Zimmer, a futures analyst with Merrill Lynch & Co. in New York.  The Soviet Union has purchased roughly eight million tons of grain this month, and is expected to take delivery by year end, analysts said.  COTTON: Futures prices rose modestly, but trading volume wasn't very heavy.  The December contract settled at 73.97 cents a pound, up 0.59 cent, but it rose as high as 74.20 cents.  Several cotton analysts said that the move appeared to be mostly technical.  Traders who had sold contracts earlier, in hopes of buying them back at lower prices, yesterday were buying contracts back at higher prices to limit their losses.  Floor traders also said that the market could have been helped by rumors, which have been circulating for the past two days, about China purchasing cotton.  The rumor, which has been neither confirmed nor denied, has China buying 125,000 to 200,000 bales for near-term delivery.  One floor trader said that if there were Chinese purchases, they should have had a bigger effect on the market.  Another said that if China was a buyer, it would be the earliest that country had made purchases since the 1979-80 crop year, and thus would be a bullish sign.  This trader characterized the recent price action as a contest between the fundamentalists, who see higher prices ahead, and the technicians, who are basically buying cotton toward the bottom of the current trading range, around 71 cents, and selling it when the price climbs more than 74 cents.  This trader said that he thought the market would turn aggressively bullish from a technical standpoint if the December contract was able to exceed 75.75 cents.  He also noted that stocks on Aug. 1, 1990, are currently projected at 3.3 million bales, the smallest end-of-season supply since 1985.  COCOA: The modest sell-off, which started on Tuesday, continued.  The December contract ended at $999 a metric ton, down $15.  The market is drifting, at least partly, because of a lack of crop information out of Ghana and the Ivory Coast, the two largest African producers.  Harry Schwartz, a soft commodity specialist for Cargill Investors Services in New York, said the only report Ghana has issued about the arrival of cocoa from the interior was for 7,839 metric tons as of Oct. 12.  By this time last year, he noted, arrivals totaling 33,270 tons had been announced.  A similar situation apparently exists in the Ivory Coast with no figures released yet this year, compared with 55,000 tons as of this time a year ago.  He said that if little cocoa actually has arrived at the ports, shipping delays could result.  This is the worry that probably brought steadiness to the market earlier in the week, he said.  There was also some fear that without Ivory Coast cocoa a large French cocoa merchant, Cie.  Financiere Sucre et Denrees, might not be able to deliver cocoa against the contracts it had sold earlier for December delivery in London.  However, the French merchant has about 200,000 tons of old crop Ivory Coast cocoa stored in the Netherlands from an agreement it had negotiated with the Ivory Coast last spring.  Cargill thinks that even though the merchant has a contract stating that it won't bring this cocoa to market until after March 1991, there is some evidence the contract has been modified.  This modification, apparently, would permit the French merchant to deliver this cocoa, if necessary, against existing short positions.  Richard D. Sutton, 64 years old, chairman of this bank-holding company, was named acting president and chief executive officer of the company and its First National Bank of Toms River subsidiary.  Joseph W. Robertson, 61, was dismissed from those posts, the company said.  He couldn't be reached and a company spokesman wouldn't comment on the dismissal.  Mr. Robertson was also removed from the board of First National Bank of New Jersey-Salem County, another unit, and the Toms River bank.  American Medical International Inc. said it hasn't received any other offers to acquire the owner and operator of hospitals, and took another step toward completion of its $3 billion acquisition by IMA Holdings Corp.  Earlier this month IMA, an investment group that includes Chicago's Pritzker family and First Boston Corp., submitted a reduced bid for American Medical after it couldn't finance its initial offer.  Under the new offer, IMA will pay $26.50 a share for 63 million shares, or about 86% of the shares outstanding.  IMA also will assume $1.4 billion in debt.  Yesterday, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, AMI common closed at $23.625, up 12.5 cents, on volume of almost 1.8 million.  Earlier, American Medical said it had been approached again by two other possible suitors, whom it wouldn't identify but who had previously submitted bids for the company.  Yesterday, American Medical said that the two other parties told the company that they don't have any current intention of making a takeover bid.  American Medical said its directors have approved what is, in effect, a draft of a solvency opinion on the acquisition, submitted by the Los Angeles-based investment banking and evaluation consulting firm of Houlian Lokey Howard & Zukin Inc.  A final opinion must be approved prior to the acceptance of tendered shares for payment under the offer, which was due to expire at 12:01 a.m. EDT today.  Separately, Moody's Investors Service Inc. downgraded the ratings of American Medical's senior and subordinated debt issues and those of its international affiliate.  The downgrade anticipates completion of the IMA Holdings acquisition today, Moody's said.  The ratings concern said the acquisition should result in pretax losses from operations because of increases in interest expense and charges for depreciation and amortization, but that it expects the losses to be reduced through productivity gains and above average growth of the company's hospitals.  Moody's said the ratings anticipate a successful debt-reduction program and modest improvement in discretionary cash flow because of planned asset sales.  Moody's changes affected the following issues: American Medical International: Senior notes, sinking-fund debentures, Euromarket notes, Eurobonds, Swiss franc bonds, unsecured loan stock to Ba3 from Baa2; convertible subordinated debentures, notes, and sinking-fund debentures to B2 from Baa3.  American Medical International N.V.: Guaranteed Euroissues to Ba3 from Baa2.  An American Medical spokeswoman said the Moody's downgrading was expected because of the nature of the takeover.  Bay Financial Corp., Boston, which has been reporting big losses and warning of a possible bankruptcy-law filing, said it was sued by a holder.  The real estate investment trust said the "purported class action suit," seeks "damages and other remedies under federal securities law and state law."  Gerald E. Wilson, corporate secretary and legal counsel, said the company wouldn't disclose further details.  He declined to name the shareholder, the plaintiff's lawyer or the court where the lawsuit was filed.  Bay, which has substantial investments in the floundering Massachusetts market, reported a loss of $62 million, or $15.97 a share, for the fiscal year ended June 30.  It has said it might seek bankruptcy-court protection from creditor lawsuits if it can't renegotiate its borrowings.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Bay closed at $2.625, down 25 cents.  Keith A. Tucker was named a director of this insurance and financial services concern.  Mr. Tucker, 44 years old, is president of Trivest Securities Corp. and senior vice president of Trivest Inc., closely held investment companies based in Miami.  His selection increases the size of the board to 12 members.  Torchmark also said that Samuel E. Upchurch Jr., 37, vice president and general counsel, was selected to serve the remainder of the term vacated by John S.P. Samford, who resigned as director.  Philip Morris Cos., New York, adopted a defense measure designed to make a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive.  The giant foods, tobacco and brewing company said it will issue common-share purchase rights to shareholders of record Nov. 8.  Under certain circumstances, the rights would entitle Philip Morris holders to buy shares of either the company or its acquirer for half price.  The board isn't aware of any attempts to take over Philip Morris, the company said.  As of Sept. 30, Philip Morris had 926 million shares outstanding.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Philip Morris shares closed yesterday at $43.50 each, down $1.  Beghin-Say S.A. said that it plans to sell its remaining paper operations by the end of January as part of a drive to refocus on the food sector and lower its debt.  The French unit of Ferruzzi Agricola Finanziaria also disclosed a 40% rise in its consolidated net profit for the first half of 1989, excluding nonrecurring items and after payments to minority interests.  Beghin-Say said the sale will be done in two parts and will raise a total of 2.025 billion francs ($325 million).  This will include the sale of its interest in the joint venture Beghin Corbehem to Feldemuehle AG.  The West German paper company entered the venture in April 1988 by acquiring a 50% stake, also from Beghin-Say.  The other part of the transaction will see Beghin-Say sell its 50% stake in its Kaysersberg paper affiliate to an unspecified unit of the petrochemical group Montedison S.p.A., which is also controlled by Ferruzzi.  And in a separate transaction, Beghin-Say will sell its remaining 25% interest in A.T.B., a holding company for international trading assets, to an unspecified unit of Ferruzzi for 258 million francs.  Esselte AB, the Stockholm office supplies company, as expected, proposed to acquire the 22% it doesn't own of its U.S. unit, Esselte Business Systems Inc.  The price in the proposal is $43.50 for each of the 4.9 million shares the parent doesn't own, or $213.2 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Esselte closed yesterday at $43.50 a share, up $1.  A committee of outside directors for the Garden City, N.Y., unit is evaluating the proposal; the parent asked it to respond by Oct. 31.  The unit said it can provide no assurance a transaction will occur.  Esselte AB sold the minority stake five years ago in a $40 million international share offering.  The unit, which is the holding company for Esselte's non-Swedish units, accounted for 58% of sales and 71% of operating profit last year.  Separately, Esselte Business Systems reported third-quarter net income fell 5.9% to $9.5 million, or 46 cents a share, from $10.1 million, or 49 cents a share, in the year-ago period.  Sales rose 2.9% to $329.2 million from $320 million.  House and Senate conferees agreed to continue production of Grumman Corp.'s F-14 and to provide more than $3.8 billion for the Strategic Defense Initiative during the current fiscal year.  Industry officials and congressional aides said that the main points of a compromise defense authorization bill, hammered out during a flurry of private meetings over the past few days, provide a face-saving compromise for both the White House and House Democrats.  Although conferees are still putting the finishing touches on the package, the final agreement could be announced as early as tomorrow.  An announcement is more likely next week, though.  President Bush and other supporters of SDI will be able to take credit for blocking House efforts to significantly cut the program to develop a space-based antimissile system, which already has cost some $17 billion.  Senate Armed Services Committee Chairman Sam Nunn (D., Ga.) and other Senate conferees have opposed the House cuts, stalling for almost two months action on a number of big-ticket items in the Pentagon's budget.  The Senate voted to authorize $4.5 billion for SDI spending in the current fiscal year, but the House, reflecting a dramatic erosion of support for the program, earmarked only $3.1 billion.  Despite the widening gap between the two sides, conferees eventually followed the pattern set in previous years by opting to roughly split the difference.  That would hold spending on the program at about the previous year's level.  The decision to keep the embattled F-14's production line running for at least another year is an important victory for the House, and especially for Rep. Les Aspin (D., Wis.).  As the head of the House conferees, Rep. Aspin has been under intense pressure from his colleagues to reject Senate provisions that would have abruptly cut further F-14 production.  The package "provides a temporary, golden parachute for Grumman," according to one congressional aide familiar with the closed-door bargaining.  But as part of the overall agreement, Grumman and its outspoken supporters on Capitol Hill effectively will be precluded from reopening the emotional issue in the debate over next year's budget.  Defense Secretary Dick Cheney and most senators contend that the Navy's F-14 is too expensive in an era of shrinking Pentagon budgets.  But the plane boasts a strong core of support in the House, where members are intent on saving Grumman jobs and are worried about potential shortages of carrier-based aircraft by the late 1990s.  Conferees also agreed to Pentagon requests to earmark a total of nearly $1 billion for work on both mobile MX and Midgetman nuclear missiles, according to congressional aides.  And lawmakers are putting the finishing touches on a compromise that would give the Air Force nearly all of the $2.4 billion it wants for production of Northrop Corp.'s radar-eluding B-2 bombers, which cost $530 million apiece.  The final B-2 agreement is certain to require detailed testing and verification of the bomber's capabilities, but congressional aides said the accord won't include a House-passed provision that would have withheld production funds until Congress approves a cheaper, scaled-down version of the $70 billion fleet of 132 B-2s envisioned by the Pentagon.  Consolidated Freightways Inc. reported a 77% drop in third-quarter net income, citing expected losses in its Emery Worldwide shipping business.  The Menlo Park, Calif., company said net was $7.4 million, or 22 cents a share, down from $32.3 million, or 86 cents a share, a year ago.  Revenue totaled $1.01 billion, a 43% increase from $704.4 million, reflecting the company's acquisition of Emery earlier this year.  Profit also suffered because of "intense" discounting in its long-haul trucking business, the company said.  Analysts had expected Consolidated to post a slim profit, and the company's stock was down only 25 cents to $30.25 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  "They have to continue to tighten their belts," said Craig Kloner, an analyst at Goldman, Sachs & Co.  A round of futures-related program selling near the close sent the stock market lower in otherwise directionless trading.  Nervousness that the market hasn't seen the last of its recent volatility kept trading at a moderate pace, as did anticipation of a report on the economy's third-quarter performance.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average, which plunged more than 80 points in early trading Tuesday and then recovered nearly all of its losses by the close, fell 5.94 to 2653.28 in the latest session.  The average drifted in a trading range of about 30 points throughout the day.  The lower boundary was established just after the opening in a brief round of selling; the upper boundary was set at midday as scattered bargain-hunting pushed prices higher.  Buying interest in Du Pont, which declared a stock split and a dividend boost, and certain other blue-chip issues gave the industrial average a better performance than broader indexes.  Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index dropped 1.20 to 342.50; the decline was the equivalent of a nine-point setback in the 30-stock average.  The Dow Jones Equity Market Index fell 1.16 to 320.94 and the New York Stock Exchange Composite Index slid 0.53 to 189.52.  But advancing issues topped decliners by 784 to 700 on the Big Board despite the late sell programs, resulting from stock-index arbitrage.  The programs occurred against the backdrop of a late pullback in UAL, which had held at slightly lower levels through most of the session amid optimism that another bidder might surface.  Traders said program activity wasn't in evidence through most of the session, however, and Big Board volume dropped to 155,650,000 shares from about 238 million Tuesday as concerns about the potential for additional sharp swings in the market kept other trading in check.  "People are sort of nervous to do anything in the market now.  Our phones are quiet around here," said Don R. Hays, director of investment strategy at Wheat First Butcher & Singer Inc., Richmond, Va.  The gross national product report, due to be released before today's opening, is expected to show that the economy continued to expand in the third quarter at a moderate pace.  The consensus of economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report calls for a 2.5% annual growth rate for GNP during the quarter.  Du Pont, which announced plans for a 3-for-1 stock split and raised its quarterly dividend by 14%, jumped 2 1/2 to 117 3/8.  The company also posted third-quarter earnings that were in line with analysts' forecasts.  Blue-chip consumer stocks also provided a lift to the industrial average.  American Telephone & Telegraph rose 3/8 to 43 1/2 in Big Board composite trading of 1.5 million shares, Chevron advanced 1 3/4 to 66 5/8 on 2.3 million shares, Woolworth rose 1 to 58 5/8, Coca-Cola Co. gained 5/8 to 72 1/2 and Eastman Kodak added 3/8 to 44 1/2.  But General Motors dropped 1 7/8 to 44 7/8.  Its GM Hughes Electronics and financial-services units both reported that third-quarter earnings were down from a year earlier.  Anheuser-Busch plunged 4 3/8 to 38 1/2 on 3.5 million shares.  Its third-quarter earnings were lower than analysts had forecast, and the company said it had lowered its projections for earnings growth through the end of 1990 because of planned price cuts.  Xerox fell 3 1/8 to 59 5/8.  Disappointment with the company's earnings for the quarter led Prudential-Bache Securities to reduce its 1989 and 1990 earnings estimates, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Computer Associates International, the most active Big Board issue, was another victim of an earnings-related sell-off.  The stock fell 3/4 to 12 7/8 as 3.6 million shares were traded in the wake of its report that fiscal second-quarter net income fell 66% from a year ago.  Insurance stocks moved higher in the wake of a strong third-quarter earnings report from Chubb, coming on the heels of speculation that last week's devastating earthquake in the San Francisco area would lead to higher premium rates.  Chubb, whose net income for the quarter exceeded most analysts' expectations, rallied 3 3/4 to 86 1/2.  Aetna Life & Casualty gained 1 3/8 to 61 1/8, Cigna advanced 7/8 to 64 3/4, Travelers added 1/2 to 40 3/8 and American International Group rose 3 1/8 to 107 3/4.  Comprehensive Care plunged 4 3/4 to 3 5/8 on 1.2 million shares.  The company reported a third-quarter loss and said it is holding talks with its bank lenders for an extension on some overdue debt payments.  TW Services dropped 1 1/4 to 31 1/4 following the postponement of a $1.4 billion junk-bond offering that would have permitted Coniston Partners to complete its takeover of the company.  Coniston said it would pursue "various financing alternatives."  UAL stock declined by 9 to 161 after nobody surfaced to claim credit for aggressive buying Tuesday by Bear Stearns that sent UAL stock up 35 points in a matter of hours.  Tuesday's rumored buyer, Coniston Partners, wouldn't comment on speculation that Coniston, which battled the UAL board in 1987, might challenge the board's decision Monday to remain independent.  Other airline stocks were mixed.  AMR, which owns American Airlines, rose 3 3/8 to 72 1/4; USAir Group fell 1 1/2 to 38 5/8, and Delta Air Lines rose 1/2 to 66 1/2 after posting higher earnings for the September quarter.  Stocks that reportedly benefited Tuesday from a Japanese buy program handled by PaineWebber gave back some of their gains.  Procter & Gamble went down 3 1/2 to 130, Dow Jones fell 3 1/2 to 37 1/2 and Rockwell International dropped 2 1/8 to 25.  However, Atlantic Richfield preserved its twopoint advance in the previous session and added 1/8 to 103 7/8.  General Mills gained 2 1/4 to 72 7/8.  Goldman Sachs placed the stock back on its list of recommended issues, raised its 1990 earnings estimate and recommended that its clients shift funds from Kellogg to General Mills.  Kellogg dropped 1 3/4 to 73 1/4.  Manville advanced 3/4 to 10.  The company offered to purchase $500 million of convertible preferred stock from the trust that handles its payments to asbestos victims.  Di Giorgio gained 1 to 30 3/4 after the company said it is starting negotiations with unidentified parties interested in acquiring its units.  Investor Arthur Goldberg is pursuing a $32-a-share takeover offer.  Esselte Business Systems rose 1 to 43 1/2.  Esselte AB of Sweden offered $43.50 a share for the 22% of the company it doesn't already own.  Public Service of New Hampshire went up 3/8 to 4.  Northeast Utilities boosted its offer to acquire the company by $400 million, to $2.25 billion.  Newell, which declared a 2-for-1 stock split and boosted its quarterly dividend by 14%, added 7/8 to 49 3/8.  Also, the company posted improved third-quarter earnings.  The American Stock Exchange Market Value Index fell 0.44 to 375.92.  Volume totaled 8,930,000 shares.  Mission Resource Partners lost 5 1/4 to 14 1/8.  The partnership, which had solicited takeover offers, said it failed to receive any adequate bids for all of its operations but is reviewing offers for individual properties.  Japan is going on a capital-spending binge that could make its trade surpluses even harder to shrink.  Its capital spending is growing at double-digit rates for the second year in a row, and its superefficient producers of everything from cars to computer chips are rushing to expand capacity, modernize factories and develop new products.  "The boom's so huge," says Mitsuru Saito, an economist at Sanwa Research Institute, "it makes you think of the Golden '60s," when Japan developed rapidly.  The more factories and robots Japanese manufacturers add, the more they will be able to export, and the less their domestic customers will need to import.  At Canon Inc., for example, sales are up nearly 20% this year; so, the maker of cameras and computer printers is doing what any Japanese company would do under the circumstances: It is increasing capital spending -- by 60%.  It is building, among other things, a new laser-beam-printer factory in western Japan that can produce up to 150,000 printers next year.  Some 70% of them are to be exported to the U.S.  Even companies in smokestack industries wrestling with world-wide overcapacity are joining the boom.  Japan's steelmakers are raising capital spending 22% this year to $4.8 billion.  Hitachi Zosen Corp., a shipbuilder buried in debt just a few years ago, will build a machinery plant, its first expansion in 14 years.  So big is the capital-spending boom that Japanese companies' outlays in Japan topped American companies' domestic outlays by $521.4 billion to $494.8 billion in the 12 months ended March 31 even though Japan's total output of goods and services is less than two-thirds America's.  From a financial standpoint, the boom couldn't come at a better time.  Many Japanese companies expect record profits this fiscal year, and Japanese interest rates, though up a bit recently, are still low.  And in a business system where shareholders have few rights and expect only modest dividends, companies can plow their profits back into plant and equipment.  But some economists and government officials here aren't applauding.  They fear that the boom may be too big for Japan's or anyone else's good.  "It's an explosive cocktail" thrown at the world, says Kenneth Courtis, senior economist at the Tokyo unit of Deutsche Bank Group.  The Ministry of International Trade and Industry is so concerned that it recently took the unusual step of urging Japanese auto companies to exercise caution in capital spending.  MITI officials hope to avoid yet-another source of trade friction with the U.S. even though export restraints currently limit Japanese car exports to the U.S.  Not everyone is worried, however.  Some economists -- and many Japanese companies -- are puzzled by the warnings.  The investment boom is mainly sparked, they say, by strong domestic demand and isn't likely to increase exports sharply.  Moreover, much investment isn't aimed at increasing capacity.  According to a survey of some 2,400 large companies by the Japan Development Bank, expanded capacity is the goal of just 51.8% of the outlays; for manufacturers alone, the figure is 32%.  The manufacturers said 14.2% of their spending is designed to improve products or add new ones, 17.5% is to cut costs, 12.5% is for research and development, and the rest is for maintenance and other purposes.  But the worriers remain unconvinced.  With Japan running enormous trade surpluses against much of the world, they think that Japan should meet the increased domestic demand by importing more.  And eventually, they contend, domestic demand will weaken, forcing companies to emphasize exports again.  "If there's a further drive to export," says Nobuyuki Arai, an economist at the Japan Development Bank, "that'll be a problem."  Even in the short run, the investment boom could exacerbate a disturbing trend: Japanese exports are showing surprisingly little tendency to ease.  Japanese auto makers, for example, are increasing their production capacity in the U.S.; the additional production should, in part, replace imported vehicles with locally manufactured ones.  But although Japanese companies increased their U.S. auto output by 42% from January to September compared with the year-earlier period, their exports to the U.S. will drop only 9% this year, Nikko Research Center estimates.  In contrast to previous economic booms, Japanese auto companies aren't just trying to boost production.  Many are pouring money into developing high-quality products to target affluent consumers and, to some extent, to avoid direct combat with cheaper cars from South Korea and Taiwan.  Others are replacing older facilities with flexible assembly lines on which different models can be turned out at once.  So many companies are investing in high-tech machinery that Fanuc Ltd., a robot maker, also had to build a new plant.  The buildup is "making Japan clearly more efficient, more technologically advanced and more competitive," declares a Western diplomat in Tokyo.  But whatever its effects on exports and imports, Japan's investment boom during the past two years has been stimulated at least partly by soaring domestic demand.  Japan's marathon economy, growing at 4.3% this year, is now in its 35th month of expansion, and some economists are betting that the boom will outlast the record 57-month expansion in the late 1960s.  Japanese consumers are increasingly eager to spend their money, especially on high-priced goods such as 29-inch television sets and luxury cars.  Nissan Motor Co.'s domestic auto sales are up 20% this year largely because its expensive Cima, Sylvia and Cefiro models are in heavy demand.  "One dealer told me that if he had more cars, he'd sell them right away," says Takuro Endo, Nissan executive vice president.  He adds that the company is trying to keep up with demand "by overworking" its employees.  Similarly, Honda Motor Co.'s sales are so brisk that workers grumble they haven't had a Saturday off in years, despite the government's encouragement of more leisure activity.  With demand growing and workers in short supply, many Japanese manufacturers are spending heavily on automation.  Among them are the shipbuilders, which had halved their shipyard work forces to cut costs during a prolonged slump in demand but now are capturing an increased share of the strengthening global market.  Sasebo Heavy Industries Co., a medium-sized shipbuilder, expects its sales to increase 30% this year, largely because of rising demand for oil tankers.  Once one Japanese company steps up its investments, the whole industry follows.  Because most businesses put market share above profitability, to let a competitor's addition to capacity go unmatched is to concede defeat.  The emphasis on market share is evident at Daikin Industries Ltd., Japan's biggest maker of industrial air conditioners.  Seeing new office buildings sprout up and its sales soar, Daikin is building another plant, which will lift its production capacity 50%.  The expansion is aimed not just at meeting demand but also at expanding the company's market share to 30% from 27% currently.  Besides, Daikin's major competitors, Hitachi Ltd. and Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd., "are all adding production lines," a Daikin spokesman says.  "Until now, we were trying to increase productivity with the facilities we already had.  But we can't produce enough anymore."  The competition is even more heated in the auto industry, where companies are racing one another in a world-wide market.  Nissan aims to expand its 25% share of the market to 30% by spending $141 million on a plant in southern Japan that could make as many as 240,000 cars a year.  Meanwhile, Toyota Motor Corp.'s $247 million buildup is increasing its annual capacity by 180,000 cars, and Honda is spending $317 million on expansion.  Mazda Motor Corp. is still considering its options, but it boldly aims to double its annual domestic sales to 800,000 cars in the next four years.  Those who aren't worried about how Japanese manufacturers' investments will affect trade note that many new products aren't replacements for imports.  Although imports account for less than 1% of beer sales in Japan, Asahi Breweries Ltd., which has been gaining share with its popular dry beer, plans to fend off Japanese competitors by pouring $1.06 billion into facilities to brew 50% more beer.  But new-product development will make Japanese companies stronger, and big investments in "domestic" industries such as beer will make it even tougher for foreign competitors to crack the Japanese market.  Moreover, much of the investment boom is in high-tech fields in which Japanese companies have only limited foreign competition; so, more investment practically assures more exports.  Toshiba Corp., for example, is spending $986 million on two new plants to build four-megabit dynamic random access memories, the next generation of computer chips.  The product isn't widely used yet, but Toshiba, which has already beaten everyone else in producing the current-generation one-megabit DRAMs, believes that its early investment will heighten its chances of beating its competitors again.  "It's important to gain leadership," a Toshiba spokesman says.  Meanwhile, Toshiba's Japanese rivals, Hitachi, Fujitsu Ltd. and NEC Corp., aren't sitting still.  After doubling production in one plant, NEC is spending $275 million to build another plant that, in two years, will be able to make a million four-megabit DRAMs a year.  The new chip plants "won't be excessive investment," says Hajime Sasaki, an NEC vice president.  "We have enough products to make and the markets to sell these products."  Some of Japan's goods being produced as a result of the investment boom are already successful overseas.  Toyota's $35,000 Lexus automobile, a luxury model that it started shipping to the U.S. only last month, is racking up orders at a time when U.S.-made luxury-car sales are slow.  Toyota plans to raise Lexus exports when a new plant starts up next year.  What if its sales weaken someday?  Japanese companies have a caveat competitor attitude.  If excess capacity develops, they say, not everyone will suffer.  The losers will be those with the least attractive products, and many of them, analysts think, will be foreign companies.  Benjamin Franklin Federal Savings & Loan Association said it plans to restructure in the wake of a third-quarter loss of $7.7 million, or $1.01 a share, reflecting an $11 million addition to loan-loss reserves.  The Portland, Ore., thrift said the restructuring should help it meet new capital standards from the Financial Institution Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act.  A year ago, Benjamin Franklin had profit of $1.8 million, or 23 cents a share.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Benjamin Franklin rose 25 cents to $4.25.  The company said the restructuring's initial phase will feature a gradual reduction in assets and staff positions.  The plan may include selling branches, consolidating or eliminating departments, and winding down or disposing of unprofitable units within 18 months.  Initially, the company said it will close its commercial real-estate lending division, and stop originating new leases at its commercial lease subsidiary.  Details of the restructuring won't be made final until regulators approve the regulations mandated by the new federal act, the company said.  Amdahl Corp., a maker of mainframe computers, reported a sharp decline in net income for its third quarter, citing pricecutting by competitors and adverse effects from a strong U.S. dollar.  Net income fell 37% to $32.9 million, or 30 cents a share, from $52.2 million, or 48 cents a share, in the year-ago period.  Revenue rose 15% to $534.3 million from $464.7 million.  Amdahl's results were somewhat worse than expected.  Jay Stevens, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds, said he expected the Sunnyvale, Calif., company to earn 35 cents a share for the quarter and said the firm's weaker profit was partly the result of increased competition from International Business Machines Corp., Amdahl's principal competitor for mainframe sales.  ONEIDA Ltd. declared a 10% stock dividend, payable Dec. 15 to stock of record Nov. 17.  The Oneida, N.Y., maker of consumer, food-service and industrial products also declared a quarterly cash dividend of 12 cents a share, with the same payable and record dates.  The cash dividend paid on the common stock also will apply to the new shares, the company said.  The move rewards shareholders and should improve the stock's liquidity, Oneida said.  The company has about 8.8 million shares outstanding.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Oneida's shares closed at $18.375 a share, unchanged.  Federal health officials are expected today to approve a program granting long-deferred access to the drug AZT for children with acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  Announcement of the approval is expected to be made by Louis Sullivan, secretary of Health and Human Services.  The clearance by the Food and Drug Administration comes after two years of restricted access for the youngest victims of AIDS to the only antiviral drug yet cleared to treat the fatal disease.  The drug will be given treatment investigational new drug status, a label accorded to drugs believed effective but lacking formal approval.  The move will make the drug available free of charge for a time to children with the disease and symptoms of advanced infection.  Adults with AIDS have had access to AZT since FDA approved the drug's usage for adults in March 1987.  But despite more than two years of research showing AZT can relieve dementia and other symptoms in children, the drug still lacks federal approval for use in the youngest patients.  As a result, many youngsters have been unable to obtain the drug and, for the few exceptions, insurance carriers won't cover its cost of $6,400 a year.  So far, AIDS has stricken 1,859 children under age 13, with many times that number believed to carry the infection without symptoms.  To date, 1,013 of those children have died, according to the federal Centers for Disease Control.  Mothers of young AIDS patients expressed somber satisfaction.  "Thank goodness it's happening.  It should have happened sooner," said Elizabeth Glaser, a Los Angeles mother and activist who contracted the AIDS virus through a blood transfusion, and transmitted it to two of her children.  One of them, a daughter Ariel, died a year ago at age seven after her parents unsuccessfully pleaded for the drug.  "I could get AZT," says Mrs. Glaser, who bears her infection without any symptoms.  "But my daughter couldn't, until she was too ill to take it.  To watch your child die is an inhuman experience."  Her son, healthy and symptom-free, currently takes no medication.  The delay in getting AZT to children has been blamed on a combination of factors.  Traditionally, the medical establishment has waited two years to approve adult treatments for pediatric uses, because of a combination of conservative safety standards and red tape.  Secondly, critics have charged AZT's maker Burroughs Wellcome Co. with corporate inertia because children account for just 1% of the patient population and hence a small part of the large and lucrative market.  Wellcome has replied that it is moving ahead to compile the relevant data, and recently promised to develop a pediatric syrup form easier for youngsters to take.  Still, all this comes nearly a year and a half after Philip Pizzo of the National Cancer Institute offered evidence that AZT could reverse the ravages of AIDS dementia, sometimes prompting dramatic recovery of IQ levels and reappearance of lost motor skills.  Since then, roughly 50 pediatric patients have received the drug in his program.  To some mothers, the expected FDA action is a poignant reminder of what might have been.  "My first reaction is I don't understand why it's taken so long.  Why has it taken people so long for people to understand pediatric AIDS is a major problem?" asked Helen Kushnick, whose son Samuel died six years ago at age three, victim of a tainted transfusion.  Similar sentiments were voiced on Capitol Hill.  "While I'm pleased the FDA is finally releasing AZT for children, it's taken much too long to get to this point," said Rep. Ted Weiss.  "Why did it take Burroughs Wellcome so long to apply" for treatment investigational new drug status? the New York Democrat asked.  "Let's not forget this is the same company that has been profiteering with this drug for 2 1/2 years," Mr. Weiss added.  Mrs. Glaser, who is a co-founder of the Pediatric AIDS Foundation, based in Santa Monica, Calif., condemned neither bureaucratic nor corporate foot-dragging.  "There's no finger to be pointed," she said.  "The crucial thing is that we learn our lesson well, and to make sure other experimental drugs, like Bristol-Myers Co.'s DDI, don't follow the same frustrating course as AZT."  AIDS dementia -- which gradually steals children's ability to speak, walk and think -- is often the most striking aspect of the pediatric syndrome.  For some patients, AZT has restored the ability to ride a bicycle or solve puzzles, giving back a piece of their childhood if only temporarily.  "It's impossible to overstate how much this means to the families of these patients," said Samuel Broder, director of the National Cancer Institute and a main developer of AZT.  AVON RENT-A-CAR & TRUCK Corp. said it declared a dividend of one warrant for each three shares of common stock.  Currently, Avon, based in Santa Monica, Calif., has 3.3 million common shares outstanding.  About 1.1 million Class C warrants were issued, the company said.  Each of the Class C warrants will enable the holders to purchase one share of common stock at $5.50.  The warrants may be exercised until 90 days after their issue date.  Avon also said it will issue an additional 243,677 of the Class C warrants to holders of its Class A, Class B and unclassified warrants.  Issuance of those warrants will be at the rate of one-third warrant for each warrant exercised.  THE BIG BOARD PLANS to launch its own vehicle for program trading today amid growing controversy over the practice.  The new "baskets" of stocks will allow big investors to buy or sell all 500 S&P index stocks in a single trade.  The exchange argues that the product, which the SEC temporarily approved yesterday, will help ease rather than worsen any volatility in the stock market.  SEC Chairman Breeden said he would consider imposing "circuit breakers" to halt program trading during sharp swings in the market.  ---  Kemper Financial Services has stopped executing its stock trades through four big securities firms because of their involvement in program trading, which Kemper and others say is ruining the market.  ---  The main capital-gains tax plan in the Senate isn't winning support from Democrats who favor a reduction.  The trend is making proponents less optimistic a tax cut will pass.  ---  Bethlehem Steel's profit plunged 54% in the third quarter, hurt by higher costs and lower shipments to key clients.  Also, Armco and National Intergroup had lower operating profit in steel, marking what may be the end of a two-year industry boom.  ---  Columbia S&L posted a quarterly loss of $226.3 million as the Beverly Hills thrift reeled from new industry rules and turmoil in junk bonds.  ---  Anheuser-Busch plans to aggressively discount its major beer brands, setting the stage for a price war as the beer industry's growth slows.  ---  PS New Hampshire received a sweetened bid from another suitor, United Illuminating, which valued its new proposal at $2.29 billion, apparently topping all others so far.  ---  Financial markets quieted, with stock prices edging lower, bonds inching up and the dollar almost unchanged.  The Dow Jones industrials closed off 5.94 points, at 2653.28.  --- Fed Chairman Greenspan said the central bank can wipe out inflation without causing a recession, but doing so will inflict short-term pain.  ---  GM's Hughes Electronics unit said profit slid 22% in the third quarter.  The finance unit, GMAC, said net fell 3.1%, but EDS's profit rose 16%.  ---  Campeau reportedly may receive a $1.3 billion offer for Bloomingdale's from Tokyu Department Store of Japan.  Campeau declined to comment.  ---  UAL's pilots and machinists unions appear to hold the key to any future takeover bid for the airline.  ---  Provigo plans to sell all non-food operations to refocus on its retail and wholesale grocery business.  Also, Chairman Pierre Lortie resigned.  ---  Westinghouse expects operating margins of over 10% and sharply higher earnings per share next year due to a major restructuring.  ---  Some major U.S. trade partners quickly rejected a compromise proposal by Bush to liberalize trade and reduce farm-product subsidies.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 155,650,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2653.28, off 5.94; transportation 1199.32, off 11.38; utilities 216.49, up 1.45.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3427.39, up 2.17.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.48, up 0.24; spot index 130.73, off 0.03.  Dollar: 141.52 yen, up 0.07; 1.8353 marks, off 0.0002.  GORBACHEV SAID Moscow won't intervene in East bloc moves to democracy.  The Kremlin leader, on the first day of a three-day official visit to Helsinki, assured Finland's president that the Soviet Union has "no moral or political right" to interfere with moves toward democracy in Poland, Hungary or elsewhere in Eastern Europe.  In Moscow, the Soviet State Bank announced a 90% devaluation of the ruble against the dollar for private transactions, in an apparent attempt to curb a black market for hard currency.  The action will establish a two-tier exchange rate.  Workers at six mines in Arctic Circle coal fields called strikes over a series of economic and political demands.  The move defied a law, approved in Moscow this month, banning such walkouts.  ---  THE HOUSE FAILED to override Bush's veto of a bill easing abortion funding.  The chamber voted 231-191, 51 votes short of the two-thirds majority needed to overturn the president's veto of legislation renewing support of Medicaid abortions for poor women who are victims of rape and incest.  The roll call was considered an illustration of the limits of power that the resurgent abortion-rights movement faces.  The legislation was part of a $156.7 billion measure funding the departments of Labor, Education, and Health.  Michigan's Senate passed a bill requiring girls to get parental consent for an abortion and Pennsylvania's House cleared a measure banning abortions after the 24th week of pregnancy.  ---  The FDA is expected to approve today a program granting access free of charge to the drug AZT for children with AIDS. Adults have had access to the only approved antiviral drug since 1987.  Research shows AZT can relieve dementia and other symptoms in children, 1,859 of whom are known to have been infected.  ---  Congress sent to Bush a $2.85 billion emergency package to assist in the recovery from last week's California earthquake and from Hurricane Hugo.  The action came after the Senate approved the House-passed measure.  In the San Francisco Bay area, more than 13,000 people were homeless and landslides threatened more houses. ---  House-Senate conferees agreed to continue production of Grumman Corp.'s F-14 jet and to provide more than $3.8 billion during the current fiscal year to develop a space-based anti-missile system.  The final package is expected to be announced within the next week.  ---  The White House has decided to seek changes in pesticide law that are aimed at speeding the removal of harmful chemicals from the food supply.  The changes, which could be announced as early as today, would apply to pesticides and other substances found on fresh and processed foods, officials said.  ---  East German leader Krenz said he was willing to hold talks with opposition groups pressing for internal changes.  The Communist Party chief, facing what is viewed as the nation's worst unrest in nearly 40 years, also said he would allow East Germans to travel abroad more freely, but made clear that the Berlin Wall would remain.  ---  A Lebanese Christian alliance accepted an Arab-sponsored proposal aimed at ending Lebanon's 14-year-old civil war.  The move by the coalition of political parties and Lebanon's largest Christian militia isolated military chief Aoun, who has rejected the plan, which includes political changes and a Syrian troop withdrawal from Beirut.  ---  Baker offered to review Israel's "suggested changes" to his proposal for direct Israeli-Palestinian talks.  But the secretary of state advised Israel that attempting to overhaul the five-point plan risked delaying the negotiations aimed at Mideast peace.  ---  NATO defense ministers said the 16-nation alliance continues to need a strong nuclear strategy despite political changes in Eastern Europe.  The ministers, concluding a two-day meeting in southern Portugal, welcomed Moscow's pledges to cut its military forces, but urged the Soviets to do more to slash short-range nuclear weapons.  ---  The Justice Department indicated a possible challenge to a court order allowing former National Security Adviser Poindexter to subpoena ex-President Reagan's personal papers for use in the defense case against Iran-Contra charges.  A department spokesman said the ruling "raised a serious question" about the office of the president.  ---  Bush said Washington would continue a trade embargo against Nicaragua, declaring that the Central American country poses "an unusual and extraordinary threat" to the security of the U.S. Meanwhile, Secretary of State Baker said the U.S. protested to Moscow over shipments of East bloc arms to Salvadoran rebels from Managua.  ---  A landslide engulfed a hillside slum in Sao Paulo, Brazil, and at least 20 people, most of them children, were missing and feared dead.  The city's mayor vowed to take legal action against developers who had been excavating at the crest of the hill.  ---  Czechoslovakia's premier said he supports broad political and economic restructuring, but ruled out any dialogue between Prague's Communist government and independent human-rights or dissident groups.  Ladislav Adamec, ending a two-day visit to Austria, pledged changes in Czechoslovakia, including freer travel to the West.  ---  Died: Mary McCarthy, 77, novelist and literary critic, in New York City, of cancer. . . .  Marion Harper, 73, founder and ex-chief executive of Interpublic Group of Cos., in Oklahoma City, of a heart attack.  Adolph Coors Co. said William K. Coors, chairman, assumed the additional responsibilities of president, succeeding Jeffrey H. Coors.  Jeffrey Coors, 44 years old, had been president since 1985, when he succeeded his father Joseph in the job.  But the brewer said Jeffrey Coors voluntarily gave up the position to focus more of his energy on Coors Technology Co., a small unit of Coors he has run for several years.  A Coors spokesman said the company doesn't believe the move will further increase William Coors's influence or reduce the influence of Jeffrey Coors, Peter Coors or Joseph Coors Jr., who run the company's three operating units.  "It certainly wasn't intended to be a demotion," the spokesman said.  "Pete and Jeff and Joe Jr. have taken over the reins and are doing most of the work.  We don't think this will affect that."  Jeffrey, Peter and Joseph Jr. are brothers.  William Coors is their uncle.  Jeffrey, Peter, Joseph Jr., William and Joseph Sr. constitute the company's board.  Peter Coors runs the Coors Brewing Co. unit, the nation's fourth-largest brewery that accounted for $1.24 billion of Adolph Coors's $1.52 billion in 1988 sales.  Joseph Jr. runs Coors Ceramics Co., the other operating unit, which had about $150 million in 1988 sales.  Dun & Bradstreet Corp. said business failures fell 17.8% to 11,586 in the third quarter from 14,099 in the year-earlier period.  In the first nine months of this year, business failures dropped 15.6% to 37,820 from 44,796.  Except for a few spots, notably Georgia, Virginia and Michigan, failures declined almost across the board, according to the business information services company.  D&B defines a business failure as a company that closes with losses to creditors.  The current decline in failures continues a trend begun in late 1987, D&B said.  The drop accelerated in this year's third quarter, underscoring an overall lack of stress in the U.S. economy, the company said.  Failures in seven of nine regional areas fell more than 10% in the nine months.  The South Atlantic States were the only region to report an increase in bankruptcies, up 5.3% to 5,791 from 5,502.  This occurred partly because of more competition as the number of new businesses surged.  The only industry sector to report more business failures for the nine months was the finance, insurance and real-estate sector, where bankruptcies grew 8.1% to 2,046 from 1,892.  The troubled savings-and-loan industry and subsequent stress in real-estate businesses fueled bankruptcies in this sector, D&B said.  A major Tokyo newspaper reported that a Japanese department store concern is planning to offer about $1.3 billion to buy Bloomingdale's.  Campeau Corp., the chain's owner, declined to comment on the report.  A spokeswoman said Toronto-based Campeau has received "expressions of interest" in Bloomingdale's, but she declined to comment on whether any actual bids had been made.  Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Japan's leading economic newspaper, reported Wednesday that Tokyu Department Store Co. is planning to team up with U.S. and Western European financing to buy the New York-based retail chain, which Campeau has put up for sale.  The service didn't identify its Tokyu sources.  "This is the first of many rumors we expect to hear during the sale's process," said a Bloomingdale's spokesman.  "We won't comment on them."  Tokyu executives weren't available for comment early Thursday morning in Tokyo.  Campeau's chairman, Robert Campeau, said at its annual meeting in July that he valued Bloomingdale's at $2 billion.  Among previously disclosed possible bidders is Bloomingdale's Chairman Marvin Traub, who has aligned himself with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and Blackstone Group.  Investment bankers in Tokyo confirmed that Tokyu Department Store is one of several Japanese companies that has been approached by representatives of a management committee headed by Bloomingdale's Mr. Traub.  But they said detailed financial figures haven't been passed yet to any prospective buyers.  "Nobody is going to make a real bid before the middle of November," said one investment banker familiar with the discussions in Japan.  "Tokyu is one of the potential buyers who might raise its hand.  But it's in very early stages still."  Bloomingdale's is a 17-store chain acquired last year by Campeau in its $6.6 billion acquisition of Federated.  Bloomingdale's does an estimated $1.2 billion in annual sales.  The sale of Bloomingdale's is a condition of efforts by Toronto-based Olympia & York Developments Ltd. to arrange $800 million in bridge financing for Campeau, which disclosed last month that its retailing units, Federated Department Stores Inc. and Allied Stores Corp., were strapped for cash.  O&Y, owned by Toronto's Reichmann family, is also supervising major restructuring and refinancing of Campeau, a Toronto-based real estate and retailing company.  One executive familiar with the Bloomingdale's situation said, "No book has been issued regarding Bloomingdale's, there are no projections, so I doubt very much whether any bid has been made."  Separately, a Campeau shareholder filed suit, charging Campeau, Chairman Robert Campeau and other officers with violating securities law.  The suit, filed in U.S. District Court in Manhattan, seeks class-action status.  The suit accuses the retailer and several of its officers of making false and misleading statements about the company's business affairs.  The suit says the company failed to disclose material adverse information about its financial condition.  A spokesman for the company said Campeau hasn't seen the suit and declined to comment.  McCaw Cellular Communications Inc. must extend its offer for LIN Broadcasting Corp. because it has "not yet announced committed financing sufficient to complete" the bid, LIN said in New York.  According to Securities and Exchange Commission rules, McCaw is required to keep its offer for the cellular-phone and broadcasting concern open for at least five business days after the announcement of the financing, LIN said.  McCaw's offer is scheduled to expire tomorrow.  Last week, McCaw said it obtained "firm" financing commitments from three major banks in regard to its bid to control LIN Broadcasting.  The banks jointly committed $1.2 billion of financing, subject to certain conditions, McCaw said.  A spokesman for McCaw said the company was "moving forward with our financing."  He added that "hopefully LIN will conduct a fair auction."  McCaw wants to buy 22 million shares of LIN for $125 each, or $2.75 billion, which would result in McCaw's owning 50.3% of LIN.  The offer is in limbo, however, because LIN has agreed to merge its cellular-phone businesses with BellSouth Corp.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, LIN rose 50 cents, to $109.25.  NICHOLS INSTITUTE declared a 2-for-1 split of its common stock, payable Nov. 27 to stock of record Nov. 10.  The clinical testing services holding company is based in San Juan Capistrano, Calif.  StatesWest Airlines, Phoenix, Ariz., said it sent a more detailed merger proposal to much-larger Mesa Airlines.  Farmington, N.M.-based Mesa has consistently rejected StatesWest's offers, and early this week said its board wouldn't give the proposal further consideration, calling it "vague and ill-defined" because it didn't describe the source of funds or the specific terms of StatesWest securities which were part of the offer.  The new letter purports to do this, saying that in addition to $7 a share in cash, StatesWest would offer one share of new 6% convertible preferred stock of StatesWest it values at $3 a share.  It also said the cash portion of the transaction would be financed with StatesWest's own cash and short-term investments, plus debt and other financing arranged through Hibbard Brown & Co., the company's investment banker.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Mesa closed at $7.25, up 25 cents.  StatesWest asked Mesa to repond by Oct. 31.  Mesa President Larry Risley said his board had received Stateswest's most recent offer and was reviewing it.  Spiegel Inc., citing continuing improvement in the apparel market, said third-quarter net income jumped 65% from the soft year-earlier period, on an 11% increase in revenue.  The catalog retailer reported net income of $10.8 million, or 21 cents a share, up sharply from $6.6 million, or 13 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose to $372.1 million from $336.4 million.  Spiegel said margins improved because its inventory position this year didn't need the costly markdowns required to trim last year's swollen levels.  A spokeswoman said the apparel market troughed in the first half of 1988, then began showing improvement in the second half of last year.  "We've seen continued improvement in 1989," she said.  The year-ago quarter's results were crimped by expenses associated with Spiegel's $260 million acquisition of catalog-clothing-merchandiser Eddie Bauer, Spiegel noted.  In addition, the company said ongoing cost-cutting efforts contributed to the latest period's earnings upturn.  Spiegel is 84%-controlled by the Otto family of West Germany.  In national over-the-counter trading, the company's shares climbed 37.5 cents to $20.375.  For the latest nine months, Spiegel's net climbed a solid 47% to $23.8 million, or 46 cents a share, from $16.2 million, or 34 cents.  Unlike the quarter's results, which were based on roughly equal shares outstanding, nine-month per-share figures reflect an increase in average common shares outstanding to 51.9 million from 47 million.  Nine-month revenue was $1.02 billion, up 22% from $841.5 million.  The bad news in the junk bond market yesterday was that TW Services, a group of restaurant chains, became the latest prospective issuer to get a cold shoulder from bond buyers.  The good news -- to fans of stable credit, at least -- is what the rejection says about the state of mind of junk buyers.  Apparently they are learning to say no to excess risk.  Coniston Partners, which with related entities controls 80% of TW, had been planning to sell $1.15 billion of junk bonds, among other things to finance their acquisition of the remaining public shares.  But Coniston, a New York partnership managed by the firm of Gollust, Tierney & Oliver, yesterday announced that "in view of unsettled conditions in securities markets" the offering would be postponed and restructured.  What wasn't mentioned is that Coniston and its investment banker, Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette, just completed a two-week "road show" for the purpose of marketing the bonds.  And investors, at least for now, took a pass.  TW's junk bonds weren't, as junk bonds go, unusually weak.  Its fast-food restaurants -- including Denny's, Hardee's, Quincy's and El Pollo Loco ("the only significant fast-food chain to specialize in char-broiled chicken") -- are stable, recession-resistant and growing.  But unless they continued to grow, TW, based in Paramus, N.J., would have run into trouble.  Until recently, such buy-now, pray-for-growth-later deals were routine.  "But people don't buy anything on expectation anymore," says Jack Utter, who manages the high-yield fund of IDS Financial Services.  "Investors," he adds, "are getting religion."  The TW buy-out may yet be financed.  "There is nothing wrong with the company," says Coniston principal Paul Tierney.  The rub, he says, is that "the junk market isn't as deep" as before.  TW's stockholder meeting was postponed from tomorrow to Nov. 21.  By then, DLJ hopes to be able to sell less-junky junk bonds.  Gollust, Tierney & Oliver is likely to contribute more than the $120 million in equity it had planned on.  Banks may contribute more senior debt.  And the total amount of junk financing will be reduced.  A DLJ banker, putting a best possible face on it, asserts that "very few people said they didn't like the credit quality.  People said they didn't think a billion-dollar deal would trade."  But trading risk stems from credit risk.  And by adding equity, DLJ would seem to be acknowledging that credit risk was a concern.  Indeed, the DLJ banker says, in the reborn capital structure cash coverage of interest "will meaningfully improve."  As he sums it up: "We are listening to the market."  What is it, to borrow a term from Coniston, that so unsettled the market?  Some of the same risks that were cited -- and seemingly ignored -- in dozens of previous junk offerings.  The TW prospectus says that if the acquisition had been completed earlier, pretax earnings "would have been insufficient to cover its fixed charges, including interest on debt securities," by approximately $62.7 million in the first six months of 1989.  TW notes, as many junk issuers do, that "adjusted to eliminate non-cash charges" TW would have run a cash surplus -- in this case, of $56 million over six months.  But such calculations ignore the noncash charge of depreciation, taken to allow for the gradual wearing out of french friers, deterioration of stores and the like.  In fact, DLJ says, the company envisions capital expenses of about $180 million a year.  TW's pitch was that sales and earnings at its restaurants have risen steadily and that people won't stop eating during a downturn.  But they won't necessarily eat at Denny's.  The fast-food business is "intensely competitive," notes Wertheim Schroder analyst John Rohs.  Prospective bond buyers noted that TW historically has prospered because it has been willing to spend aggressively on remodeling restaurants and redoing menus.  "We were concerned that they weren't going to generate enough cash for capital spending and also to pay down debt," says a big investor in high-yield debt.  DLJ argues that TW could, if necessary, cut capital spending, since half of what it plans to spend is for "growth," rather than maintenance.  But investors noted that under the shelved offering, TW would have needed to grow to meet its debt payments.  Its calculations for meeting cash charges ignore $52 million a year in interest on cash-deferred, or zero-coupon debentures -- which ultimately would have had to be paid.  The prospectus notes "there can be no assurance" that future growth will continue at past levels.  In the recent past, bond buyers didn't seek such assurance.  Now, apparently, they do.  ---  TW Services  (NYSE; Symbol: TW)  Business: Restaurants  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988*  Revenue: $3.57 billion  Net Income: $66.9 million; $1.36 a share**  Third quarter, Sept. 30, 1989:  (Net Loss: 7 cents share) vs. net income:  51 cents a share  Average daily trading volume:  179,032 shares  Common shares outstanding: 49 million  *Includes results of Denny's Inc., acquired in September 1987.  **Includes $9 million write-down of assets and takeover defense costs.  Maggie Thatcher must be doing something right; her political enemies are screaming louder than ever.  Mrs. Thatcher, who was practicing the read-my-lips school of politics years before Mr. Bush encountered it, has made clear her opposition to refashioning Britain's free-market policies to suit the bureaucrats in Brussels.  In return, Mrs. Thatcher is excoriated from Fleet Street to Paris as an obstructionist.  Well, it now turns out that Mrs. Thatcher had to travel across the globe to the 49-member Commonwealth summit in Kuala Lumpur to discomfit the Holy Order of Consensus Builders.  "A disastrous farce in Malaysia," screamed the Manchester Guardian.  "She can no longer be trusted to behave in a civilised -- that is unflaky -- fashion when abroad."  Egad.  Canada's Brian Mulroney and Australia's Bob Hawke, the paper said, were "enraged."  The London Times said she had "contravened protocol."  As usual, her sin was saying what she thought.  She issued a separate statement, separating herself from a Commonwealth document reasserting the political value of imposing sanctions against South Africa.  While supporting the Commonwealth "in utterly condemning apartheid," her statement urged it to "encourage change" rather than inflict further punishment on the country's black population.  Actually there is a consensus somewhere on sanctions: In May a Gallup Poll found that most South African blacks, 85%, oppose economic sanctions.  Still, Mrs. Thatcher had once again gone against the grain.  Malaysia's Prime Minister Mahathir Mohamad sniffed, "If everybody else puts out their left foot and you put out your right foot, you are out of step."  Mrs. Thatcher: "If it's one against 48, I'm very sorry for the 48."  If indeed Mrs. Thatcher has one opponent that could throw her off political course it is Britain's mysteriously intractable inflation problem.  We cannot, however, join the political chorus that as one proclaims how offputting it is that Mrs. Thatcher refuses to get along by going along.  It is refreshing to see at least one world figure who knows what she believes in and is not inclined to reflexively compromise those beliefs.  Perhaps Mrs. Thatcher understands better than those distressed at her style that ultimately history and Britain's voters will decide who is right about Europe, sanctioning South Africa or running Britain's economy.  Follow With Care  "Work hard, play hard" is advice  Best taken with some caution,  For it can bring fitness and success  Or a state of total exhaustion.  -- Edward F. Dempsey.  ---  Double Check  The guest paid his bill at the resort hotel, and as he departed he noticed a sign saying, "Have You Left Anything?"  The man went back and spoke to the desk clerk: "That sign is wrong," he said.  "It should read, "Have You Anything Left?"  -- Sam Ewing.  After being trampled in Tuesday's selling stampede, the Nasdaq over-the-counter market dusted itself off and moved on in moderate trading.  But while the Composite gained 1.19, to 462.89, many issues didn't participate in the advance.  "It was a mixed bag," said Richard Bruno, who heads over-the-counter trading at PaineWebber.  "We played catch-up in some areas, and sold off in some others."  Volume totaled 132.1 million shares, which is about average for the year.  Of the 4,348 issues that changed hands, 1,074 advanced and 866 declined.  Big financial stocks carried the day.  The Nasdaq Financial Index rose 2.09, to 454.86.  Meanwhile, the Nasdaq 100 Index of the big non-financial stocks basically stood still, easing 0.12, to 452.23.  Despite the Composite's advance, some trading officials are guardedly optimistic that the market is on the road to recovery.  Lance Zipper, head of over-the-counter trading at Kidder Peabody, said it is difficult to make predictions based on yesterday's trading volume.  The advance felt more like a technical bounce, he said.  "The market acted better, but it wasn't a tremendous comeback," Mr. Zipper observed.  "If we get a decent rally {today}, maybe the buyers will come back."  If E.E. "Buzzy" Geduld is right, a seatbelt may come in handy during the next few sessions.  The president of Herzog, Heine, Mr. Geduld expects the market to be "very choppy" for a while.  "There's a lot of uncertainty out there, and it will cause a lot of swings," he said.  Among active stocks, MCI Communications rose 7/8 to 43 on 2.2 million shares, Mentor Graphics added 1/8 to 16 3/8 on turnover of 1.5 million shares.  Apple Computer dropped 1 1/8 to 46 1/2 on one million shares.  Almost one million shares of Sun Microsystems changed hands, but the issue was unchanged at 17 3/4.  Biotechnology issues were strong.  Amgen advanced 1 1/2 to 56; Chiron jumped 2 to 29 3/4; Cetus gained 1 to 16 7/8 and Biogen rose 5/8 to 14 5/8.  The American depositary receipts of Jaguar jumped 3/8 to 11 5/8 on turnover of 1.9 million.  Ford Motor said it raised its stake in the British car maker to 12.45% of the ordinary shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Ford said it holds 22.8 million ordinary shares.  The company has said it is prepared to make a bid for all of the shares outstanding of Jaguar if British government restrictions to such a transaction are removed.  Another takeover target, LIN Broadcasting, rose 1/2 to 109 1/4 on 495,000 shares.  Its suitor, McCaw Cellular, also added 1/2 to 40 1/2 on 395,700 shares.  Other stocks were affected by corporate earnings.  Informix, which recently said third-quarter net income rose to 16 cents a share from a penny a share a year ago, gained 1 5/8 to 13 5/8 on 810,700 shares.  The 1988 results included a one-time gain.  Cimflex Teknowledge rose 13/16, or 39%, to 2 7/8 on volume of 494,100 shares.  The maker of software products and services, which had a net loss in the 1988 third quarter, earned 200,000, or a penny a share, in this year's quarter.  It was Nasdaq's biggest percentage gainer.  Star States plunged 3 1/4 to 8 3/4 on 207,000 shares.  The company suffered a $9 million loss in the third quarter, compared with net of $2.5 million a year earlier.  Collagen dropped 2 5/8 to 15 5/8 on 428,000 shares.  In its fiscal-first quarter ended Sept. 30, the biomedical-products maker earned 10 cents a share, up from eight cents a share in the 1988 quarter, which included an extraordinary credit.  Occupational-Urgent Care Health fell 1 3/4 to 15 1/2 on 354,000 shares.  The company's third-quarter earnings also rose to 10 cents a share from eight cents a share a year ago.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL --------------- %  @ COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @ Firemen's Fund ($.05) $.43 (3) $.44 (9) ....  @ Consol Edision 1.20 .82 (3) .95 (6) 46.34  @ Centerior Enrgy .78 .72 (3) .69 (7) 8.33  @ Salomon Inc 1.28 ... .71 (5) 80.28  @ Airborne Frght .72 ... .48 (7) 50.00  @ Times Mirror Co .54 ... .47 (8) 14.89  @ NEGATIVE  @ USAir Grp ($1.86) ... $1.56 (9) ....  @ Centel Corp (.05) ... .18 (4) ....  @ Homestake Mng .01 ... .10 (6) 90.00  @ Microamerica .06 ... .15 (5) 60.00  @ Borden Chem & Plas .30 ... .58 (4) 48.28  @ Wyse Tech (.25) ... (.18) (6) 38.89  @ Fed'l-Mogul .22 ... .33 (8) 33.33  @ Family Dollar .13 ... .19 (7) 31.58  @ Applied Biosys .16 ... .23 (9) 30.43  @ Goodyear Tire 1.22 ... 1.67 (3) 26.95  @ FMC Corp .96 ... 1.18 (4) 18.64  @ HomeFed Corp 1.10 ... 1.34 (11) 17.91  @ Steel Tech .10 ... .12 (3) 16.67  @ Tenneco Inc .68 ... .81 (9) 16.05  Source: Zacks Investment Research  One day last March, CBS Sports President Neal Pilson and Olympics superagent Barry Frank met for lunch at the Lotos Club here.  Mr. Frank told Mr. Pilson that Olympics officials wanted $290 million or more for TV rights to the 1994 Winter Games in Norway.  The CBS official said that price sounded fine.  At that price, CBS was the only player at the table when negotiations with the International Olympic Committee started in Toronto Aug. 23.  Dick Pound, a committee member, began by disclosing that ABC and NBC had refused to even bid.  Then, he asked Mr. Pilson to raise his offer anyway: "If we can have a number that starts with a three, you can have a dea."  Mr. Pilson and his team huddled in a hallway and took just 10 minutes to return with a $300 million offer.  Mr. Pound responded, "It's a deal."  A beaming Mr. Pilson announced his lastest coup at a news conference that afternoon.  Mr. Pilson's rivals at ABC and NBC grimaced at the price.  How could CBS get pushed into outbidding itself?  Well, CBS, mired in the ratings cellar and looking to sports as a way out, wanted to close the deal immediately and block its rivals from getting another chance to bid.  But Mr. Pilson has been put in the uncomfortable role of setting off a bidding frenzy for sports rights, a frenzy that the networks had hoped to avoid.  "The price of poker has gone up," crows Charles M. Neinas, the College Football Association's executive director.  With CBS Inc. on a spending spree that may top $2.5 billion for four years of major sports events, the new bout of hyperinflation could jolt the entire broadcast business.  CBS itself could run up losses of a few hundred million dollars on four years of various sports if its big gamble goes wrong.  ABC, a unit of Capital Cities/ABC Inc., and General Electric Co.'s National Broadcasting Co. also risk losses if they outbid CBS for other contracts.  While rights fees head skyward, ad rates won't.  Advertisers already are balking at higher prices.  "The networks are paying too much for rights," warns adman Paul Isacsson of Young & Rubicam.  "If they ask advertisers to absorb the costs, they're likely to lose all but a few who need sports, above all."  Viewers may not be cheering, either.  Soaring rights fees will lead to an even greater clutter of commercials.  At the same time, some sports events will move off "free" television and onto cable or pay-cable, where half the nation's TV homes can't see them.  CBS has changed the rules by throwing out the old basis for sports bids -- that is, can the network alone make a profit on it?  Mr. Pilson emphasizes the ancillary benefits of positive press, contented affiliate stations, enthusiastic advertisers and huge audiences that might stick around to watch other CBS programs when the game is over.  The billion-dollar question is, How much are those benefits worth?  Some TV people doubt they will materialize and argue that even if they do, they won't offset the multimillion-dollar deficits that CBS could run up.  "As we've seen in the '80s," says Roger Werner, the president of the ESPN sports channel, "those deals can turn sour if the numbers don't work.  And three years later, in a sea of red ink, the heroes can find themselves with a lot of explaining to do."  CBS pursues top sports "to belie the fact that they aren't supporting affiliates, viewers and advertisers," charges Thomas H. Wyman, who was ousted as chairman of CBS Inc. after Laurence A. Tisch bought a 24.9% stake in the company and took over three years ago.  "They lost the entertainment crown, and they needed one.  And they've bought one."  On just three big deals -- for four years of baseball and for the Olympic Winter Games in both 1992 and 1994 -- Pilson bid a total of $1.64 billion.  That's well over half a billion dollars more than ABC and NBC were willing to pay. (After 1992, the winter and summer Olympics will be held two years apart, with the revised schedule beginning with the winter games in 1994 and the summer games in 1996.)  Now, Mr. Pilson -- a former college basketball player who says a good negotiator needs "a level offocus and intellectual attention" similar to a good athlete-s is facing the consequences of his own aggressiveness.  Next month, talks will begin on two coveted CBS contracts, for the pro and college basketball finals.  CBS is likely to spend whatever it takes to keep them.  The potential bill: more than $600 million for several seasons, an 80% jump.  A few months later, CBS's college and pro football contracts come up for renewal; they could go for close to $100 million more than CBS now pays, a 40% to 50% rise.  "What happens to those two basketball contracts will shape the next five years of network sports," says Peter Lund, a former CBS Sports president now at Multimedia Inc. J. William Grimes, former president of ESPN, says NBC may "come in with a huge bid for college basketball to take it away from CBS and say, 'We can overbid, too.' And the winners will be the colleges, not either network.  Nor, by the way, advertisers."  Mr. Pilson is an unlikely big spender.  In the mid-1980s, after ABC had just bid a record $309 million for the 1988 Winter Games, he sniped at rivals for paying reckless prices.  "I love Pilson, but he was the guy who complained most bitterly and loudly," says Robert Wussler, a former CBS Sports president.  "And yet his company is one reason why rights are so high today."  Rivals carp at "the principle of Pilson," as NBC's Arthur Watson once put it -- "he's always expounding that rights are too high, then he's going crazy."  But the 49-year-old Mr. Pilson is hardly a man to ignore the numbers.  A Yale law school graduate, he began his career in corporate law and then put in years at Metromedia Inc. and the William Morris talent agency.  In 1976, he joined CBS Sports to head business affairs and, five years later, became its president.  Mr. Pilson says that when he spoke out a few years ago, "I didn't say forever, and I didn't say every property."  The market changed, he adds.  And he isn't the only big spender: NBC will pay a record $401 million for the 1992 Summer Games, and ESPN, 80%-owned by Capital Cities/ABC, will shell out $400 million for four years of baseball, airing 175 regular-season games a year.  "Our competitors say we overbid them.  Who cares?  Maybe we recognize values the other guys don't," Mr. Pilson says.  Mr. Pilson's "Major Events" strategy jelled after Mr. Tisch took over.  Mr. Pilson recalls that in April 1986, after CBS's annual meeting in Philadelphia, he and Mr. Tisch took the 90-minute train ride back to New York, and Mr. Pilson used this extended private audience to outline his ambitions.  Mr. Tisch, a billionaire in hotels and finance, was just learning the TV business.  Five months later, Mr. Tisch took over as CBS's chief executive, and soon he was wielding sole approval each time Mr. Pilson scribbled a frighteningly large figure on a slip of paper, sealed it in an envelope and gave it to sports negotiators.  Then, in May 1988, Mr. Tisch urgently needed to make a bold statement to quell rumors that he might sell the network.  Mr. Pilson gave him one: He bid $243 million for rights to the 1992 Winter Games in Albertville, France; ABC and NBC wouldn't bid even $200 million.  That started the still-raging bidding wars.  The "Major Events" strategy, Mr. Pilson says, is designed to notch a place for CBS on the crowded TV dial of the 1990s.  It's also a fast fix for an ailing image.  He sees flashy sports as the only way the last-place network can cut through the clutter of cable and VCRs, grab millions of new viewers and tell them about other shows premiering a few weeks later.  Next October, CBS, for the first time, won't have to start the season against the much-watched American and National baseball league championships and the World Series.  "I've been struggling against that for years," says Jonathan Rodgers, who runs WBBM-TV, the CBS-owned station in Chicago.  Even if baseball triggers losses at CBS -- and he doesn't think it will -- "I'd rather see the games on our air than on NBC and ABC," he says.  That isn't surprising.  Regular TV series ratings have slumped in the past five years, and premiering new shows is "a crap shoot," Mr. Pilson says.  But top sports events are still a strong bet to lure audiences 30% or 40% larger than those CBS usually gets.  Mr. Pilson says baseball and the Olympics may help CBS move up to No. 2 in the household ratings race, putting pizazz back into the network's image.  And the Winter Olympics will air during the February "sweeps," when ratings are used to set ad rates for local stations.  That will please once-grumpy affiliates -- another aim of the Pilson plan.  They gleefully await the "dream season" in 1990.  CBS will air the Super Bowl, baseball playoffs, college and pro basketball finals and other premier sports events.  "It's made me more committed to CBS," says Philip A. Jones, the president of Meredith Corp.'s broadcast group, which has two CBS affiliates.  The CBS plan to use big-time sports as a platform for other series carries no guarantee of success, however.  No amount of hype will bring viewers back if the shows are weak.  "In this market of 40 channels, sophisticated viewers and the remote control, trial isn't a guarantee of anything," ESPN's Mr. Werner says.  "If the show ain't a killer, they're gone."  During the 1984 Summer Games, for example, ABC touted "Call to Glory," but the military drama was missing in action within weeks.  Last October, during the 1988 Summer Games, NBC relentlessly pitched a new series, "Tattingers."  It belly-flopped anyway.  Moreover, sports is hardly the best way to lure adult women.  Though CBS might move up to No. 2 in household ratings, most advertisers buy based on ratings for women aged 18 to 49.  CBS may remain a distant No. 3 in that regard.  Nor is CBS a shoo-in to get blockbuster ratings.  In recent years, the World Series and the Olympics were aired against CBS's last-place lineup.  But CBS will put the athletes up against Bill Cosby, "Cheers" and other shows in NBC's No. 1 schedule.  Even the boon to affiliate relations may be limited.  The sports lineup may add only 1% to 5% to a station's annual profits.  It alone isn't likely to stop a station from dumping CBS shows.  "The World Series, seven nights, wasn't enough of an incentive," says Arnold Klinsky of WHEC-TV in Rochester, which dropped CBS for NBC six weeks ago.  "You've got to judge where the network will be in three years."  The intangible benefits may prove extremely costly if CBS can't avoid big losses on the sports coverage itself.  And avoiding such losses will take a monumental effort.  On the $1.06 billion baseball agreement alone, CBS is likely to lose $250 million in four years, contends Mr. Wussler, the former CBS man, now at Comsat Inc. Nevertheless, he deems the deal "plain smart" for its huge promotional value.  Mr. Pilson calls that loss estimate "wildly inaccurate," conceding only that CBS will lose money on baseball in the first year.  "It's too early to tell" what happens after that, he says.  But Mr. Tisch expects losses in all four years of the contract, he told U.S. senators last June.  CBS will pay an average of $82 million more each year than ABC and NBC had paid together -- and those two networks expect losses on baseball this season.  Yet CBS will air only 12 regular-season games, 26 fewer than ABC and NBC.  That has outraged some fans.  It also indicates a $50 million drop in ad sales for regular-season games -- a risk CBS took to get an unprecedented lock on all playoff games.  If the playoffs end in four-game sweeps, losses could soar.  Advertisers are resisting higher prices, which would help close the gap.  CBS signed General Motors and Toyota to be the only auto-maker sponsors in baseball for four years.  Price: $265 million.  But ad executives who negotiated the deal say that works out to only $275,000 for a 30-second ad in the World Series through 1993 -- 17% less than what ABC is charging for the Series this month.  Moreover, "there's no question ad rates will come down considerably" from the GM-Toyota price, says Arnold Chase of Bozell Inc. Other admen, however, say rates could rise later if ad spending surges.  The Winter Games outlook also is mixed.  CBS expects to make modest profits, but rivals contend that it will take a beating.  ABC lost $75 million on the 1988 Winter Games, partly because of its $309 million rights fee.  It aired 94.5 hours of mostly live events in Calgary -- helping raise ratings slightly from 1984 -- but still failed to deliver the audience promised to advertisers.  CBS will add 25 1/2 hours to that load in 1992, and ratings could be hurt by a lack of live events.  All prime-time fare will be on tape-delay because of time differences with Norway, so the results can be announced on the 6 o'clock news. (Turner Broadcasting will pay CBS $25 million to air 50 hours of CBS coverage plus 50 hours of additional events.)  Barry Frank, the agent who took Mr. Pilson to lunch last March, says that even if CBS loses, say, $10 million, it matters little.  "Ten million ain't jack, man, when you got $3 billion sitting in the bank," says Mr. Frank, senior vice president at International Management Group, citing CBS's enormous cash reserves from selling off various businesses.  "It doesn't mean anything -- it's public-relations money."  Moreover, sports has "claimed its place" as a guaranteed ratings-getter, says David J. Stern, the commissioner of the National Basketball Association.  "This isn't outlandish bidding; this is a situation of very careful businessmen making judgments about the worth of product and acting on it. . . .  I would tend to trust their judgment."  That's easy for him to say: CBS's four-year NBA pact, now at $176 million for four years, could double in price by the time his talks with Mr. Pilson are completed later this month.  That would cut into CBS's slim margin for profit -- and error.  CBS Sports earned $50 million or so last year.  And CBS takes in the least money in prime time; ABC and NBC charge 30% to 35% more for ads, according to a Variety survey.  But CBS's costs are huge, and the risks go up with each new sports package that CBS locks up.  Although sports officials predict jumps of 50% to 100% in the major contracts coming up for renewal, ad rates may rise only 20%.  CBS hopes to save money by ordering fewer episodes of regular series because sports will fill up a few weeks of prime time.  But the savings will be minuscule.  Each hour of Olympics and baseball in prime time will cost CBS $2.6 million to $2.8 million; an hour-long drama costs only $900,000, and it is aired twice.  CBS may cushion losses with about $200 million a year in interest earned on the proceeds from selling CBS Records and other businesses.  But media-stock analyst Richard J. MacDonald of MacDonald Grippo Riely says Wall Street won't take kindly to that.  "On a stand-alone basis, the network ought to make money," he says.  When Mr. Pilson is asked directly -- can you make money on all this? -- he doesn't exactly say yes.  "What you're really asking is, Are the profit and loss margins anticipated on the events acceptable to management?" he says.  Then, he answers his own question.  "Yes, they are.  That's the only question we need to address."  Place a phone order through most any catalog and chances are the clerk who answers won't be the only one on the line.  Bosses have big ears these days.  Or open up an electronics magazine and peruse the ads for sneaky tape recorders and other snooping gadgets.  Some would make even James Bond green with envy.  Eavesdropping -- both corporate and private -- is on the rise, thanks to the proliferation of surveillance technologies.  And while sellers of the equipment and companies "monitoring" employees have few qualms, right-to-privacy advocates and some lawmakers are alarmed.  "New technologies are changing the way we deal with each other and the way we work," says Janlori Goldman, a staff attorney at the American Civil Liberties Union.  "Our expectation of confidentiality is being eroded."  On the corporate side, companies claim that monitoring employee phone conversations is both legal and necessary to gauge productivity and ensure good service.  The practice is common at catalog, insurance and phone companies, banks and telemarketers, according to trade groups and worker organizations.  It's also widespread for reservations clerks in the airline, car-rental, hotel and railroad industries.  The Communications Workers of America, which opposes such monitoring, says supervisors listen in on an estimated 400 million calls each year.  Among companies saying they monitor employees are United Airlines, American Airlines, United Parcel Service, Nynex Corp., Spiegel Inc., and the circulation department of this newspaper.  Some Wall Street firms monitor for recordkeeping purposes.  Dictaphone Corp. says there's a big business demand for its voice-activated taping systems, whether the sophisticated Veritrac 9000 system, which costs from $10,000 to $120,000 and can record 240 conversations simultaneously, or simple handheld units selling for $395.  Businesses "want to verify information and ensure accuracy," says John Hiltunen, Dictaphone's manager of media relations.  The state of Alaska recently bought the Veritrac system, he says, "to monitor the Exxon cleanup effort."  Merrill Lynch & Co. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. say they use voice-activated systems to record and verify orders between salesmen and traders.  Shearson says it has taped some of its institutional trading desks, such as commodities and futures, for about four years.  Both companies stress that employees know they are being recorded and that customer conversations aren't taped.  Kidder Peabody & Co. says it monitors bond-trading conversations between brokers and customers to safeguard order accuracy.  Eavesdropping by individuals is harder to measure.  But devices are there for the asking, whether in stores or through the mail.  The Counter Spy Shop in Washington, D.C., for instance, offers the "Secret Connection" attache case, which can surreptitiously record conversations for nine hours at a stretch.  That and other fancy gizmos may cost thousands, but simple voice-activated tape recorders sell for as little as $70 at electronics stores like Radio Shack.  The most common use of spying devices is in divorce cases, say private investigators.  While tape recordings to uncover, say, infidelity aren't admissible in court, they can mean leverage in a settlement.  Concerned with the increased availability of surveillance technology and heavier use of it, lawmakers have proposed laws addressing the issue.  Nine states have introduced bills requiring that workers and customers be made aware of monitoring.  And four states -- California, Florida, Michigan and Pennsylvania -- have adopted rules that all parties involved must consent when phone calls are recorded.  Two bills in Congress hope to make such restrictions national.  In May, Rep. Don Edwards (D.  Calif.) introduced congressional legislation that would require an audible beeping during any employee monitoring, warning people that they are being heard. (The legislation is similar to a 1987 "beeper bill" that was defeated after heavy lobbying by the telemarketing industry.) Also last spring, Rep. Ron Dellums (D., Calif.), introduced a bill requiring universal two-party consent to any tapings in cases that don't involve law enforcement.  In addition, products such as voice-activated tape recorders would have to include beep tones and labels explaining federal laws on eavesdropping.  The outlook on both federal bills is uncertain, especially remembering the 1987 defeat.  The ACLU and worker organizations back tighter laws, but employers and device manufacturers object.  "I'm sympathetic with workers who feel under the gun," says Richard Barton of the Direct Marketing Association of America, which is lobbying strenuously against the Edwards beeper bill.  "But the only way you can find out how your people are doing is by listening."  The powerful group, which represents many of the nation's telemarketers, was instrumental in derailing the 1987 bill.  Spiegel also opposes the beeper bill, saying the noise it requires would interfere with customer orders, causing irritation and even errors.  Laura Dale, center manager at the catalog company's customer order center in Reno, Nev., defends monitoring.  "We like to follow up and make sure operators are achieving our standards of company service," says Ms. Dale, who supervises 350 operators.  John Bonomo, a Nynex spokesman, says the telephone company needs to monitor operators to evaluate performance during the first six months on the job.  "Sometimes," he says, "we'll pull someone off the phones for more training."  Federal wiretap statutes recognize the right of employers to monitor employees' for evaluation purposes.  And in the past, Congress has viewed monitoring as an issue best handled in union negotiations.  But opponents, led by the CWA, say new laws are needed because monitoring is heavily concentrated in service industries and 81% of monitored workers aren't represented by unions.  The CWA claims that monitoring not only infringes on employee privacy, but increases stress.  "Nine to Five," a Cleveland-based office workers organization that supports the beeper bill, six months ago started a privacy hot line to receive reports of alleged monitoring abuses.  Meanwhile, supporters of the Dellums two-party consent bill say it is needed because of a giant loophole in the one-party consent law.  Currently, if the person taping is a party to the conversation, it's all right to record without the knowledge of the other person on the line. (Intercepting other people's private conversations is illegal and punishable by five years in prison and fines of $10,000.)  The electronics industry is closely following the Dellums bill.  Some marketers of surveillance gear -- including Communication Control System Ltd., which owns the Counter Spy Shop and others like it -- already put warning labels in their catalogs informing customers of the one-party law.  But vendors contend that they can't control how their products are used.  Radio Shack says it has a policy against selling products if a salesperson suspects they will be used illegally.  "Everything sold at Radio Shack has a legal purpose," says Bernard Appel, president of the Tandy Corp. subsidiary.  He says he hasn't yet studied the Dellums bill, but that requiring a beeping tone on recorders "would be ludicrous."  Still, Radio Shack is aware that some of its products are controversial.  A few years ago, the company voluntarily stopped selling "The Big Ear," a powerful microphone.  With its ability to pick up rustlings and flapping wings, "it was meant to be a toy for children for bird watching," says Mr. Appel.  "But we were getting too many complaints that people were using them to eavesdrop on their neighbors."  ---  @ Eavesdropping Made Easy  @ Prospective snoopers have a range of gadgets from which to choose.  Here's a sampling:  @ Product: Portable voice stress analyzers  @ Purpose: Portable lie detector.  More sophisticated models also have tape recorders and elaborate print-out capabilities.  @ Source: Communication Control System Ltd.  @ Price: From $3,000 to $12,000  @ Product: "Secret Connection" attache case  @ Purpose: Brief case with hidden tape recorder.  Extras include wiretap alerts, night vision devices, telephone descramblers.  @ Source: Communication Control System Ltd.  @ Price: From $450 to $15,000  @ Product: Infinity Transmitter  @ Purpose: Can pick up conversations within a 30-foot radius and can transmit information directly over telephone lines.  Ads claim the transmitter "can be concealed anywhere."  @ Source: Criminal Research Products Inc.  @ Price: $595  @ Product: Telephone recording system  @ Purpose: System can automatically record conversations every time the handset is picked up.  @ Source: Life Force Technologies Ltd.  @ Price: Around $500  @ Product: Telephone recorder patches  @ Purpose: Patches plug in between telephones and tape recorders.  @ Source: Life Force Technologies Ltd.  @ Price: $59.95  @ Product: Voice-activated tape recorders  @ Purpose: Tape conversations in the same room.  @ Source: Various manufacturers.  Available at many electronic stores.  @ Price: $69-$300, depending on size and features  @ Product: The Listenaider  @ Purpose: Device, which looks like a small portable radio, "allows you to hear the slightest whisper up to 25 feet away."  @ Source: Ryans by Mail  @ Price: $49.95  The hottest rivalry in the computer industry intensified sharply yesterday as Digital Equipment Corp. announced its first line of mainframe computers, targeting International Business Machines Corp.'s largest market.  IBM fired back with new mainframes of its own, extending the long-dominant 3090 line with a 7% to 14% power boost.  Up to now, the intense competition between IBM and Digital has been confined largely to the broad midrange of the computer market, where Digital sought to exploit IBM's weaknesses in networking.  But Digital's move into mainframes will target IBM's home turf, where it has a commanding 70% share of the market.  Digital, Maynard, Mass., insisted yesterday that its marketing focus would differ sharply from IBM's.  "This is not your father's mainframe," said Allan McGuire, a Digital spokesman.  "It's a whole new generation," he said.  IBM, which gets about half its revenue and more than half its profit from mainframes, also announced upgraded operating system software that, together with the new hardware, lets customers do so-called batch processing as much as 60% faster.  Batch processing is the high-volume, single-job data processing that most mainframes typically chug through at night, such as updating accounts at banks.  IBM said the 16 new J and JH models will generally be available immediately, though three won't ship until the third quarter of next year.  Prices on the larger models, which range as high as $13 million, generally won't change.  Small models, whose performance increased as much as 46%, will carry higher prices.  Upgrades to bigger models also will be costlier.  Digital's VAX 9000 mainframes, which it claimed were among the fastest available, were priced from $1.2 million to $3.9 million, sharply lower than IBM models of comparable power.  The first models will ship in the spring, with the largest following in the fall.  Analysts were disappointed that Digital's new line apparently won't contribute much to earnings before the next fiscal year, which begins in July.  Jay Stevens of Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. said he may cut his earnings estimate for the current fiscal year because he had expected at least some mainframe profit this year.  But he added that he expected to raise his estimate for fiscal 1991 at the same time.  After the announcement yesterday, Digital shares gained $1.25 to close at $89.875 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  IBM shares closed at $103, down 50 cents, in Big Board trading.  Analysts have predicted strong pent-up demand for the new line among Digital's customers.  Large Digital buyers say the new VAX will let them stay with Digital when they need the power of a mainframe, instead of turning to IBM.  "I'm convinced there's a huge market for this machine," said Stephen Smith of PaineWebber Inc.  Digital also plans to compete fiercely with IBM when the giant's customers are computerizing new aspects of their businesses.  Digital, however, doesn't expect to displace IBM mainframes that are already installed at big companies.  In addition to commercial markets, Digital's new line targets the low end of the engineering and scientific supercomputer market, when it's packaged with an optional supercharger, known as a vector processor.  Digital's push into mainframes comes at a time when its mainstay minicomputer line is under growing pressure from smaller personal computers and workstations that operate on standard operating systems rather than on the proprietary systems that older minicomputers use.  Although Digital has staked out a major presence in the booming workstation market, profit margins in that market are much slimmer than for mainframes.  The slow-growing mainframe market also has shown new signs of life lately.  IBM's mainframe sales have held up better than expected this year, with analysts estimating they have risen 10% to 12%.  "Demand for these systems has been very, very strong," said Bill Grabe, a senior IBM marketing executive.  "We have a good strong backlog for the fourth quarter even without" the systems that were announced yesterday.  But the 3090 line is nearly five years old -- which is getting up there in mainframe years -- and its growth is expected to slow in 1990.  IBM, Armonk, N.Y., said it wanted to bring out the mainframes as soon as it could to spark as many sales as possible by the end of the year.  The fourth quarter is always IBM's biggest by far, with most sales coming in December as customers seek to use budgets before year end.  Still, Steve Cohen, an analyst at SoundView Financial Group Inc., said, "I don't see that this will be sufficient to give IBM a significant kick in the fourth quarter."  IBM has already indicated it will have problems in the quarter, partly because of a delay in shipping a high-end disk drive and partly because the strong dollar will cut significantly the value of IBM's overseas earnings when translated into dollars.  Some analysts have estimated IBM's fourth-quarter per-share earnings will fall 10% to $3.57 a share from $3.97 a share a year earlier.  In addition to the new mainframe hardware and software, IBM announced a magnetic-tape system for data storage that it said occupies half as much floor space as older systems but can store five times as much data on a single cartridge.  That should help IBM address the damage that a resurgent Storage Technology Corp. has inflicted in that market.  Concord Camera Corp. completed the acquisition of Peter Bauser G.m.b.H., a West German photographic products distributor.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Concord is a camera and photographic products company.  The Navy awarded Litton Industries Inc.'s Ingalls Shipbuilding division $15.5 million for shipyard services on the Aegis cruiser program.  The award exercises a Navy option to extend a contract given in 1984.  The White House called on Congress to attach the proposed capital-gains tax cut to its final deficit-reduction bill, but lawmakers seem likely to balk at the idea.  Earlier this month, the White House endorsed stripping the controversial tax measure from the bill so that Congress could pass quickly a "clean" bill containing only provisions specifically designed to meet federal budget targets under the Gramm-Rudman act.  But now that Congress has missed the legal deadline for meeting the Gramm-Rudman targets, the White House said it has returned to its original view that a capital-gains cut should be part of the deficit-reduction bill, on which Congress continues to work.  "If that doesn't happen, then we press forward on another vehicle and a separate vote," said press secretary Marlin Fitzwater.  On Capitol Hill, though, there doesn't seem to be sufficient sentiment to pair capital gains and the deficit-reduction bill.  Texas Rep. William Archer, the ranking Republican on the House Ways and Means Committee said, "I don't see how we have the votes" to place a capital-gains tax cut there.  Meanwhile, President Bush stepped up his personal lobbying for the capital-gains tax cut.  The White House said he plans to hold a series of private White House meetings, mostly with Senate Democrats, to try to persuade lawmakers to fall in line behind the tax cut.  The first meeting yesterday was with 10 Senate Democrats who have expressed an interest in cutting the tax.  According to some who attended, the senators argued that the president should give the Democratic leaders in Congress a victory of their own to compensate them for allowing the president to win on the controversial capital-gains issue.  Issues discussed in this context were an increase in the minimum wage and an increase in child-care spending.  The president was said to have been noncommittal.  Toshiba Corp. said its new French marketing concern has started operating under the aegis of the company's West German subsidiary, which formerly handled all sales of Toshiba electronic products in France.  A recent change in French law, according to Toshiba, permitted formation of the semiconductor marketing arm in Paris.  American Telephone & Telegraph Co. unveiled new optical transmission systems for data, video and voice communications.  Two products in what the telecommunications giant called a new generation of such equipment are available now, AT&T said, and three others will be introduced in 1990 and 1991.  The products are aimed at a market expected to total more than $1 billion a year in sales by 1995, said Morgan Buchner Jr., vice president of transmission systems for AT&T.  The products already available are cross-connect systems, used instead of mazes of wiring to interconnect other telecommunications equipment.  This cuts down greatly on labor, Mr. Buchner said.  To be introduced later are a multiplexer, which will allow several signals to travel along a single optical line; a light-wave system, which carries voice channels; and a network controller, which directs data flow through cross-connect systems.  AT&T said the products, unlike previous generations, will meet so-called Sonet compatability standards, which AT&T expects to be broadly adopted.  Sonet, or synchronous optical network, products have more capacity than earlier models.  "These products are the heart of our transmission-product line," Mr. Buchner said.  He declined to disclose specific prices, but said each product costs in the tens of thousands, or even hundreds of thousands, of dollars.  AT&T said it expects to beat to the marketplace two rivals, Northern Telecom Ltd. of Canada and France's Alcatel N.V., which also have announced Sonet-based products.  AT&T predicted strong growth in demand for such products.  It noted that last July, Nippon Telegraph & Telephone Corp. of Japan selected AT&T to supply $154 million of such equipment over a four-year period starting next year.  Law firms that have feasted and grown on the revenue from mergers and acquisitions work are feeling the squeeze as that work declines.  The disarray in the junk-bond market that began last month with a credit crunch at Campeau Corp. and the failure of banks to deliver financing for a leveraged buy-out of United Airlines parent UAL Corp. has reverberated through some of the nation's largest law firms.  While it is still too early to tell whether the dearth of takeover activity is only temporary, many lawyers say their firms are bracing for lower revenue from merger work, which has been so lucrative in the past.  Much of this work was done for higher fees than other legal work and was not generally billed by the hour.  If deals take longer to complete and there are fewer of them to do, "you can't bill the same kind of premium as when deals took a few weeks from start to finish," says one lawyer at a large New York firm.  "We're planning on a rip-roaring year in 1989, but next year we'll be another story," said Robert Freedman, a partner at Simpson Thacher & Bartlett.  "We're settling down to a less active period."  Lawyers at such firms as Sullivan & Cromwell; Willkie Farr & Gallagher; Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz; and Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson all say they, too, have experienced a significant slowdown, particularly during the past few weeks.  "Everyone is waiting to see if deals can be done at sensible prices and if money is available," said Jack Nusbaum, co-chairman of Willkie Farr.  "It's hard to know right now if the change is fundamental or cyclical."  Some lawyers say the slump, while more obvious in recent weeks, began earlier this year.  Dennis Block, a partner at the New York firm of Weil, Gotshal & Manges, said that in the first eight months of this year, 89 hostile offers were launched, compared with 157 for the first eight months of 1988.  What's more, he said, "transactions are taking a much longer time to conclude and many fall apart for lack of financing" and more stringent scrutiny by state courts.  Lawyers also say an erratic stock market and uncertain financing conditions have sharply reduced the number of lucrative big deals likely to be proposed.  Still, some lawyers say the mergers slowdown hasn't affected foreign buyers as much as domestic ones.  "We just took another floor for our London offices," said Joseph Flom of the New York firm of Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom.  Davis Polk & Wardwell also said its international clients are keeping mergers and acquisitions partners busy.  "European companies are looking to buy American ones," said Henry King, the managing partner at that firm.  "But the question is whether things people are looking at will actually surface in live transactions in light of the current market conditions."  ---  MURDER THREAT charged in Haas Securities Corp. stock-manipulation trial.  In the trial of former Haas Securities Chairman Eugene Laff, the defense accused one of the government's chief witnesses of threatening to kill Mr. Laff.  Mr. Laff's attorney, John Lang, filed a memorandum asking that the trial record include a secretly taped conversation in which the witness, Henry Lorin, told a Haas stockbroker that Mr. Laff should be killed.  The conversation was taped by federal investigators in what Mr. Lang said was an effort to get Mr. Lorin to implicate Mr. Laff.  In his opening arguments last week in federal court in New York, Mr. Lang told the jury that Mr. Lorin was the "real master criminal" behind the stock manipulation, and that Mr. Laff knew nothing about it.  In March, Mr. Laff was indicted on 15 counts of conspiracy, mail and securities fraud, and obstructing an investigation by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The government has charged that Mr. Lorin and Mr. Laff were part of a conspiracy to maintain the prices of certain stocks at artificially high prices.  Mr. Lorin, a stock promoter, pleaded guilty to the stock-manipulation charges in April and agreed to cooperate with the government's investigation of Mr. Laff.  During his cross examination of Mr. Lorin, Mr. Lang read from the transcripts of a conversation that was taped Oct. 20, 1988.  Stanley Aslanian, the Haas broker who agreed to carry a hidden microphone during the conversation, also has pleaded guilty to conspiracy to commit securities violations in the stock manipulation and agreed to cooperate.  According to the transcript, Mr. Lorin said Mr. Laff should be killed after Mr. Aslanian told him that information given to Mr. Laff by another conspirator could jeopardize the stock scheme.  Mr. Lorin then repeated the threat, and Mr. Aslanian urged him not to say such things.  From the parts of the transcript read by Mr. Lang, it was unclear what exactly Mr. Lorin feared might happen.  When asked for a copy of the transcript, Mr. Lang said Judge Thomas P. Griesa had instructed him not to release it or the memorandum.  During the trial, Mr. Lang asked Mr. Lorin whether he had been so upset "that you considered killing Mr. Laff? . . .  Isn't it true that you were so worked up that framing Mr. Laff for this crime was the least that you planned for him?"  Mr. Lorin responded, "No."  When Mr. Lang asked Mr. Lorin whether he had taken steps to have Mr. Laff killed, the witness again said no.  Peter Lieb, the assistant U.S. attorney prosecuting the case, declined to comment on the trial.  ---  TRUSTEE WHO MONITORED settlement payments to Dalkon Shield claimants quits.  Stephen A. Saltzburg, one of five trustees appointed to monitor payments to women injured by the Dalkon Shield intrauterine contraceptive, resigned, citing personal reasons.  Mr. Saltzburg, who teaches evidence at the University of Virginia School of Law and was a deputy assistant attorney general in the U.S. Justice Department until August, submitted his resignation earlier this month to federal Judge Robert R. Merhige Jr., in Richmond, Va.  Judge Merhige is overseeing the bankruptcy-law reorganization of A.H. Robins Co., the company that manufactured the shield.  In a letter Monday to Mr. Saltzburg, the judge said he would "reluctantly" accept the resignation.  The $2.38 billion Dalkon Shield Claimants Trust was established as part of A.H. Robins' bankruptcy-reorganization plan to resolve injury claims arising from use of the shield.  American Home Products Corp. proposes to acquire the company.  The remaining four trustees on the Claimants Trust have 60 days to nominate a successor to Mr. Saltzburg.  Judge Merhige will make the appointment.  ---  CHICAGO LAW FIRM recruits American Express Co. vice president: Coffield Ungaretti Harris & Slavin brought in Howard A. Menell as a partner in its Washington, D.C., office, which opened Oct. 1.  For the past six years, Mr. Menell, 43 years old, served as vice president for government affairs at American Express.  He previously was staff director and counsel for the Senate committee on banking, housing and urban affairs.  The other lawyer in the office is partner Robert A. Macari, the firm's legislative director.  ---  THE PHILADELPHIA law firm of Ballard, Spahr, Andrews & Ingersoll said three partners have joined its business and finance department.  John Ake, 48, a former vice-president in charge of legal compliance at American Capital Management & Research Inc., in Houston, will join Ballard Spahr's corporate-securities practice.  Kent Walker, 45, a former partner at the Philadelphia law firm of Mesirov, Gelman, Jaffe, Cramer & Jamieson, will specialize in antitrust, real estate and mergers and acquisitions.  Richard L. Sherman, 42, will advise midsized businesses.  Mr. Sherman is former deputy general counsel for SmithKline Beckman Corp., in Philadelphia, now SmithKline Beecham PLC, in London.  Delmed Inc.'s top two officers resigned and were succeeded by executives of Fresenius USA Inc. and its parent, Fresenius AG, a major Delmed holder that has been negotiating to acquire a controlling stake.  In addition, Delmed, which makes and sells a dialysis solution used in treating kidney diseases, said negotiations about pricing had collapsed between it and a major distributor, National Medical Care Inc.  Delmed said Robert S. Ehrlich resigned as chairman, president and chief executive.  Mr. Ehrlich will continue as a director and a consultant.  Leslie I. Shapiro, chief operating officer and chief financial officer, also resigned, the company said.  Mr. Ehrlich was succeeded as chairman by Gerd Krick, a director of Fresenius, a West German pharmaceutical concern.  Ben Lipps, president of Fresenius USA, was named president, chief executive and chief operating officer.  None of the officials was available for comment.  In trading on the American Stock Exchange, Delmed closed at 50 cents, down 6.25 cents.  Fresenius owns about 42% of Delmed's fully diluted common stock.  The two companies have been discussing a transaction under which Fresenius would buy Delmed stock for cash to bring its beneficial ownership to between 70% and 80% of Delmed's fully diluted common stock.  The transaction also would combine Fresenius USA and Delmed.  Under the proposal, Delmed would issue about 123.5 million additional Delmed common shares to Fresenius at an average price of about 65 cents a share, though under no circumstances more than 75 cents a share.  Yesterday, Delmed said it "continues to explore the possibility of a combination with Fresenius USA."  It added that it is apparent that any terms of a combination "would be substantially less favorable than those previously announced."  While the discussions between Delmed and National Medical Care have been discontinued, Delmed will continue to supply dialysis products through National Medical after their exclusive agreement ends in March 1990, Delmed said.  In addition, Delmed is exploring distribution arrangements with Fresenius USA, Delmed said.  Philip L. Hall, president of J. Lawrence Hall Co., Nashua, was named a director of this thrift holding company, filling a vacancy.  Kennametal Inc. said it intends to acquire J&L America Inc. for $44 million plus a consideration of as much as an additional $12 million, payable over five years.  Kennametal is a carbide-products and cutting-tools company.  J&L, whose principal offices are in Detroit, is a mail-order distributer of industrial tools and supplies.  The acquisition is subject to approval by Kennametal's board.  Genentech Inc. said third-quarter profit more than doubled to $11.4 million, or 13 cents a share, from a depressed 1988 third-quarter performance of $5.3 million, or six cents a share.  Revenue rose 23% to $100 million from $81.6 million.  Net product sales accounted for $76 million, up from $57.5 million a year earlier.  Sales of the heart drug TPA were $43.6 million, better than last year's depressed third period when the company sold just $29.1 million of the drug.  But TPA sales fell below levels for this year's first and second quarter sales of $48 million, cooling investors.  Genentech stock fell 12.5 cents in trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange to $20.125.  In the nine months, net income slid 21% to $28.4 million, or 33 cents a share, from $36 million, or 42 cents a share.  Revenues climbed 18% to $289 million from $245.3 million.  "We continue to be on target for . . . increasing TPA sales 20% to 25% this year," said founder and Chief Executive Officer Robert Swanson.  But some analysts remain sour on the company.  "TPA sales are down quarter to quarter.  Expenses are flat and that's a good sign.  There's contract revenue from {limited research and development} partnerships.  But I still think the fundamentals are poor," said Denise Gilbert, an analyst with Montgomery Securities in San Francisco.  Genentech faces competition in the cardiac-drug market from SmithKline Beecham PLC's heart drug Eminase, expected to receive market approval shortly.  And Genentech isn't likely to have any new products ready for market until at least 1992, Ms. Gilbert added.  "The company's stock is trading at 40 times next year's numbers, and that's too much," she said.  On the plus side, Genentech is benefiting from a lower tax rate due to its research outlays, giving a boost to earnings, she said.  THE AMERICAN CANCER SOCIETY'S 1988 costs of fund raising and administration were $72.4 million, or 23.2% of its revenue.  A chart in last Friday's special report on personal finance contained an incorrect figure supplied by NonProfit Times, a monthly newspaper covering charities.  {See: "Personal Finance (A Special Report): Beware] --- Give and Take: Many Fund-Raisers Think Charity Begins at Home -- Their Home" -- WSJ Oct. 20, 1989}  Ryder System Inc. posted a third-quarter net loss of $27.6 million, because of an expected $57 million after-tax charge and continued weakness in the company's truck-rental business.  The loss, which is 38 cents a share, is the transportation services concern's first quarterly setback in more than a decade and compares with net income of $55.3 million, or 68 cents a share, in the year-ago period.  The previous year's third quarter included gains on the sale of aircraft by the company's Aviation Leasing & Services Division.  Revenue was flat at $1.3 billion.  The latest quarter's after-tax charge -- which is 75 cents a share -- was related to adjustments to reserves for workers' compensation claims; reductions in vehicle fleets, staff and facilities; and writedowns of assets.  Although Ryder didn't break out the charge, analysts estimated that the majority of the $57 million was linked to workers' compensation reserves and anticipated losses on the disposal of trucks.  Many analysts said they weren't surprised that problems in many of Ryder's lines of business continued to plague the company.  "It pretty much confirms what we had been expecting," said Anthony Hatch, an analyst at PaineWebber Inc.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Ryder closed at $22.25, down 37.5 cents.  M. Anthony Burns, Ryder's chairman and chief executive officer, said: "We're constantly trying to find ways to regain the earnings momentum.  But we're still at the beginning stages of some of these changes."  He said the fourth quarter will be "challenging," and maintained his conservative forecast that 1990 "won't be a barn burner."  In the nine months, net income fell 79% to $31.1 million, or 33 cents a share, from $149.3 million, or $1.82 a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose slightly to $3.8 billion from $3.7 billion.  Robert L. Wood, 37-year-old chief financial officer, was named chairman and chief executive officer of this independent power producer, succeeding Raymond L. Hixson, 63.  Mr. Hixson, who resigned effective Jan. 1 for health reasons, remains a director.  Advanced Medical Technologies Inc. said it purchased 93% of a unit of Henley Group Inc.  Advanced Medical paid $106 million in cash for its share in a unit of Henley's Fisher Scientific subsidiary.  The unit makes intravenous pumps used by hospitals and had more than $110 million in sales last year, according to Advanced Medical.  Maxicare Health Plans Inc., operating under Chapter 11 bankrupty-law protection, outlined terms of its reorganization plan that calls for creditors and shareholders to receive at least $78.8 million in cash and $67 million face amount of 10-year, 13.5% notes.  The plan, outlined in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, also calls for creditors and shareholders to receive common stock and warrants in the new company.  The health-maintenance concern said it reached the agreement with its court-appointed creditors' committees Sept. 28, and intends to submit the plan to the bankruptcy court in November.  Maxicare, which filed for bankruptcy protection March 16, has total debt of $750 million.  The company has promptly paid all its expenses and obligations since March 16, a Maxicare spokesman said.  General unsecured creditors of Maxicare's continuing operations initially will receive $47 million in cash, $35 million face amount of senior notes, and 49% of the new company's stock.  Those creditors, whose claims are estimated at about $200 million, include doctors and hospitals.  General unsecured creditors of Maxicare's discontinued operations, whose claims total $110 million, initially will receive $17.8 million in cash and $10 million in senior notes.  Maxicare's public shareholders will receive 2% of the new company's stock and warrants entitling them to acquire as much as an additional 5% of the stock on a fully-diluted basis.  General unsecured creditors of the parent holding company initially will receive $14 million in cash, $22 million face amount of senior notes and 49% of the new company's stock.  That group includes banks and bondholders, who have claims of $150 million and $350 million respectively.  Maxicare also will guarantee that the banks will realize at least $7 million on certain notes pledged to them.  Maxicare said the plan stipulates that enrollees in the company's health plans will have valid claims covered in full.  Those claims, along with priority employee claims, administrative claims, priority tax claims and administrative convenience claims, are expected to total about $16 million.  The plan is subject to approval by the bankruptcy court and others.  The spokesman said Maxicare hopes to complete the reorganization by early 1990.  Birmingham Steel Corp. said that its Emeryville, Calif., minimill sustained only minor damage from last week's earthquake.  Steelmaking resumed Oct. 18, but the company expects production to be hampered in the next few months by traffic disruptions around the plant and outages for repair to gas and electric power systems.  The average interest rate rose to 8.337% at Citicorp's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, from 8.292% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $475 million were submitted.  Accepted bids ranged from 8.328% to 8.347%.  However, Citicorp said that the average rate fell to 7.962% at its $50 million auction of 182-day commercial paper from 7.986% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $425 million were submitted.  Accepted bids were all at 7.962%.  The bank holding company will auction another $50 million in each maturity next Tuesday.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a General Motors Corp. unit, said the Intelsat VI commercial communications satellite is set to be launched Friday.  The satellite, built by Hughes for the International Telecommunications Satellite Organization, is part of a $700 million contract awarded to Hughes in 1982 to develop five of the three-ton satellites.  Italian car manufacturer Fiat said it isn't interested in partnership or industrial cooperation with Swedish auto and aerospace group Saab-Scania AB, which faces heavy losses in its car division.  Fiat said it's only interested in technical cooperation with Saab.  "We know that Saab is looking for a partner for industrial and financial cooperation," Fiat said.  "But that partner isn't Fiat."  The Italian auto maker confirmed that it was discussing technical cooperation with Saab, but declined to comment on rumors that it was planning to buy Saab's car division.  Fiat's rejection of partnership with Saab means that the Swedish company, which announced last Friday that its pretax profit for the first eight months plummeted 49%, will have to look for a partner among other car manufacturers as both Ford Motor Corp. and Fiat have turned down the offer.  News reports said yesterday that Saab is trying to start negotiations with French automakers Peugeot and Renault.  ITT Corp., its insurance business hurt by Hurricane Hugo, reported a 4% decline in third-quarter net income, despite a 4.2% rise in revenue.  ITT also forecast a fourth-quarter blow to earnings from the California earthquake.  Except for insurance, however, ITT said it expects improved operating earnings "in all of our businesses for the full year."  Third-quarter net income dropped to $221 million, or $1.55 a share, from $230 million, or $1.60 a share, in the year-earlier period.  ITT bought back 8.8 million shares this year, including 2.8 million during the third quarter.  Third-quarter revenue rose to $4.9 billion from $4.7 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, ITT common stock fell 62.5 cents to close at $58.75 a share.  In addition to insurance and finance, ITT has interests in electronic parts, defense technology, automotive parts, fluid technology, pulp and timber, and communications and information services.  "Hurricane Hugo losses and the continuing industrywide downturn in the property and casualty insurance business were the major factors affecting quarterly comparisons," said Rand V. Araskog, chairman and chief executive officer.  ITT's Hartford Insurance Group had a $53 million quarterly pretax loss from Hurricane Hugo, ITT said.  Hartford expects to report a further pretax loss of about $30 million for the current quarter, as a result of the California earthquake this month, ITT added.  The company also disclosed its financial operations had increased reserves for bankrupt accounts, resulting in a $40 million pretax charge for the third quarter.  This charge was partly offset, however, by $19 million in pretax capital gains.  ITT also said its consumer finance unit agreed in September to settle a civil suit with the California attorney general over alleged improper lending and sales practices.  Anticipating this settlement, the company recorded a pretax charge of $24 million during the fourth quarter of 1988.  An ITT spokesman said the charge wasn't publicly reported at the time.  "The company's product businesses, with the exception of electronic components, had higher operating earnings for the first nine months of 1989," the company said.  Elaborating on the exception, it said volume and margins were lower in semiconductor and power systems operations.  Amoco Corp. said it plans to install two platforms and drill as many as 22 wells to develop oil reserves it discovered in the Atlantic Ocean about 25 miles off the coast of Congo.  Amoco, an energy concern, is the operator of the project with a 43.75% working interest, and other partners include Hydro Congo, the Congolese state oil company, with a 50% interest, and Kuwait Foreign Petroleum Exploration Co. with a 6.25% stake.  Production is expected to be about 40,000 barrels of oil a day after completion of the drilling program.  Jacobs Engineering Group Inc.'s Jacobs International unit was selected to design and build a microcomputer-systems manufacturing plant in County Kildare, Ireland, for Intel Corp.  Jacobs is an international engineering and construction concern.  Total capital investment at the site could be as much as $400 million, according to Intel.  The 150,000-square-foot plant will be constructed on a 55-acre site near Dublin.  Jacobs Engineering officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Bob Evans Inc. said its board authorized the purchase of as many as 500,000 shares of its common.  The stock, to be purchased on the open market or through privately negotiated transactions, will be held as treasury shares for stock options or other general corporate purposes.  The program expires April 27.  The restaurant operator had 32.2 million shares outstanding as of Sept. 29.  Coda Energy Inc. said it completed the sale of Phenix-Transmission Co. to Bishop Pipeline Co., for $17 million in cash and notes.  Coda, an oil and gas concern, said it and its partners received $7 million in cash and $10 million in five-year notes for the Kansas intrastate pipeline.  Coda owned 60% of the pipeline and private entities owned the rest.  Bishop is based in Hutchinson, Kansas.  French consumer prices rose 0.2% in September from August, according to provisional estimates by the National Statistics Institute.  The agency noted that because of a strike by Finance Ministry personnel the provisional estimate doesn't correspond exactly to the consumer price index usually published.  The agency noted, however, the estimate will likely be confirmed.  The institute didn't estimate annual price growth in September, but a 0.2% rise by the consumer price index would put growth at either 178.8 or 178.9, up 3.3% or 3.4% from the year-earlier level of 173.1.  The index was 178.5 in August and is based on 1980 equaling 100.  International Technology Corp. and Davy McKee Corp., a unit of London's Davy Corp., said they were awarded a $55 million contract by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers for the closure of the Helen Kramer Landfill Superfund site in Mantua Township, N.J.  International Technology, an environmental management concern, said the contract includes construction of slurry walls, gas collection systems, a multilayer cap and water treatment plant.  U.S. Memories Inc., the venture that seeks to crack Japan's domination of the memory-chip market, said it has chosen four potential sites for its operations after a fierce bidding war by 15 states.  U.S. Memories said it will begin visits during the next several weeks to sites in Austin, Texas; Colorado Springs, Colo.; Middletown, N.Y.; and Phoenix, Ariz.  Sanford Kane, president, said the finalists were chosen from among 57 locations based on financial, business, and quality of life considerations.  Conspicuous by its absence is California.  San Jose and several other California cities mounted major campaigns during the summer to woo the group, which was founded last June by seven electronics concerns.  The venture plans to announce a final site by late November.  It expects to begin construction by year end and start shipping four-megabit dynamic random-access memory chips by mid-1991.  U.S. Memories investors include Advanced Micro Devices Inc., Digital Equipment Corp., Hewlett-Packard Co., International Business Machines Corp., Intel Corp., LSI Logic Corp., and National Semiconductor Corp. Mr. Kane said he expects several other companies to join some time after the venture completes a business plan, probably later this week.  A seat on the Chicago Board of Trade was sold for $390,000, unchanged from the previous sale Oct. 13.  Seats currently are quoted at $361,000 bid, $395,000 asked.  The record price for a full membership on the exchange is $550,000, set Aug. 31, 1987.  Dennis R. Mangino, a general manager of EniChem Americas, was named vice president of research and development, a new post at this steel company.  Fred D. Thompson, a 47-year-old attorney in private practice in Washington and Nashville, Tenn., was elected to the board of this engineering and construction company.  The board increased to 11 seats.  Sun Microsystems Inc. said Prime Computer Inc. has agreed to resell as much as $200 million worth of Sun's machines over the next two years.  The computers use the company's own microprocessor called Sparc, Sun said.  Quickview Systems Inc. said it filed a lawsuit against Apple Computer Inc., claiming patent infringement in an element of Apple's popular HyperCard software program.  The suit, filed in Minneapolis federal court, claims that Apple violated a Quickview patent that allows computer users to display "only portions of multiple fields on a computer screen with the ability to see the entire contents of any given field."  The HyperCard program allows users to design applications for Macintosh computers without having to be hardcore programmers and is distributed with every Macintosh sold.  It's one of the most popular computer programs of all time, but analysts said the Quickview suit doesn't appear to bode major difficulties for Apple.  The technology at issue "is not an underlying technology of HyperCard to my knowledge," said Danny Goodman, a San Francisco-area HyperCard program developer.  Nonetheless, the suit seeks unspecified damages that an attorney for Quickview claimed could run into the millions of dollars.  In Cupertino, Calif., Apple said that it believes the case has no merit, and that HyperCard does not infringe "any valid claims" of the Quickview patents.  It said it filed an action of its own in federal court in San Jose, Calif., seeking a declaration that Quickview's claims are invalid.  This is in response to Atsushi Kageyama's Manager's Journal, "Looking for the Real Thing in Sony" (editorial page, Oct. 2).  Though I agree with many of Mr. Kageyama's comments, I believe he points the gun in the wrong direction: It isn't the Americans who must be criticized for not understanding the Japanese culture, but the Japanese who insist on forcing their culture on Americans.  The Japanese want us to accept their culture, but they refuse to accept the American culture.  Japanese managers can't expect Americans to behave as if they were Japanese; instead, they must manage Americans as Americans.  Americans are expected to conform to the Japanese culture when in Japan.  What is wrong with expecting the Japanese to conform to American norms when they locate here?  Americans place native or native speakers in charge of subsidiaries overseas.  European multinationals do likewise; even in America, their affiliates are usually run by American managers.  But the Japanese insist upon Japanese managers everywhere they set up shop.  Do the Japanese feel so superior that they cannot find capable American managers?  Paul A. Herbig  Indiana University  Bloomington, Ind.  ---  Mr. Kageyama suggests that Kotobuki Electronics Industries workers were having difficulty understanding their foreign bosses' perspective.  While Mr. Kageyama does an excellent job of explaining the differences, both cultural and philosophic, I question his perspective.  Would he suggest that employees of an American company doing business in Japan conform to their new bosses' culture and philosophy?  Obviously not.  Thus the conclusion is that the burden rests with management to understand/adopt the culture and philosophy of the country in which they are operating.  The workers can be motivated, and the company reach its full potential, only when management embraces the employees' perspective.  A. Lawton Langford  President  Municipal Code Corp.  Tallahassee, Fla.  --- I believe Mr. Kageyama left out one major aspect of Japanese culture that permeated his piece: the belief in the superiority of Japanese culture and behavior vs. others.  A manager should not have to rebut the opinions of his employees about the style of his management.  Instead, he should listen to see how that criticism can be used constructively to advance his objective of carrying out a set of tasks through the efforts of his subordinates.  Japanese culture vs.  American culture is irrelevant.  The key is how a manager from one culture can motivate employees from another.  For Mr. Kageyama to argue that American employees must passively accept a direct imposition of the Japanese way of doing things is outright cultural chauvinism of the first order.  The Japanese are neglecting the opportunity to synthesize a new corporate culture based on a fusion of the best aspects of both national cultures.  Mr. Kageyama is accurate to deny a specific anti-American bias.  It is more difficult to deny a general bigotry in seeing things only the Japanese way.  When the response to criticism is only a better explanation of policies without altering the reasons for the criticism, I am convinced that Mr. Kageyama has still failed to attack the root cause of the problem and is simply treating symptoms.  Norman L. Owens  Tempe, Ariz.  Cie.  Generale des Eaux reported that net profit climbed 30% in the first half of 1989 and said that it expects a gain of about 25% for the full year.  The French water treatment group said consolidated net profit after payments to minority interests rose to 749 million francs (US$119.2 million) from 575 million francs in the first half of 1988.  Revenue climbed 13% to 45.4 billion francs from 40.1 billion.  Generale des Eaux said the earnings gain was led by its water, energy and building activities.  As a presidential candidate in 1980, George Bush forthrightly expressed his position on abortion in an interview with Rolling Stone magazine published that March.  What did he think of the Supreme Court's decision legalizing abortion?  "I happen to think it was right," Mr. Bush said flatly.  A few months later, Mr. Bush became Ronald Reagan's running mate.  Suddenly, George Bush the pro-choice advocate became George Bush the anti-abortionist.  And the vacillation didn't end there.  Just a month ago, Mr. Bush sternly threatened to veto a pending welfare bill if it provided any abortion funds, except to save a woman's life.  Then, two weeks ago -- declaring that "I'm not looking for any conflict over this" -- the president said he would consider a compromise to fund abortions for poor women in cases of rape and incest.  But only four days after that, Mr. Bush resurrected the veto threat.  "I do not support federal funding for abortions except where the mother's life is threatened," he proclaimed, and finally vetoed the measure last weekend.  So what does George Bush really believe?  The answer is so murky that it is beginning to get this popular president in trouble with each of the increasingly vocal, increasingly powerful sides of the abortion issue.  The result is mistrust and criticism from all around.  Anti-abortion forces regard him as at best an uncertain ally.  "In all honesty if you ask me, `Is this man a true believer?' I don't know," says John Fowler, head of the Washington-based Ad Hoc Committee in Defense of Life Inc. Yet abortion-rights forces remain bitterly critical.  Douglas Gould, vice president of communications for the Planned Parenthood Federation of America, calls Mr. Bush's position on the abortion-funding issue "extremely cruel," adding: "The guy hasn't done one thing about prevention.  He's totally geared to a punitive position."  Mr. Bush is plainly uncomfortable with the entire abortion question.  For most of the past nine years, he has striven to convince anti-abortion activists of his stalwart support for their position.  But ever since the Supreme Court's Webster vs.  Reproductive Health Services decision this year changed the political landscape of the abortion issue, the president seemingly has tried just as hard to avoid saying anything more unless pressed to the wall.  Many Americans still agonize over their own personal feelings about abortion.  Mr. Bush's problem isn't so much that he seems to be agonizing over the issue as it is that he seems to vacillate on it.  The political risk would be far less if the president drew a firm line and hewed to it, experts insist.  "If you have a position, you're better off to stick with it than to move around very much," says Republican strategist John Sears.  The need for consistency is especially acute for Mr. Bush, who, Mr. Sears maintains, lacks a strong ideological base.  By his moderate Republican heritage as well as the warnings of political advisers who say the issue is vital to younger voters, the president might seem to have at least some sympathy with abortion-rights arguments.  Yet he is also firmly bound by his hard-line rhetoric and promises he made to anti-abortion activists during his long pursuit of the White House.  On many issues -- flag-burning, for instance -- his keen political sensitivities overcome such conflicts.  But Mr. Bush and his advisers miscalculated the politics of the abortion issue, failing to grasp how dramatically the abortion-rights movement would be aroused following last summer's Supreme Court decision to restrict those rights in the Webster case.  "It was one of the quickest changes in public attitudes I've ever seen," says former Reagan pollster Richard Wirthlin.  These days, when others raise the subject of abortion, the usually loquacious president can be close-mouthed almost to the point of curtness.  Ten days ago he was asked to amplify the reasons behind his anti-abortion stance.  "My position is well-known and well-stated," he replied.  A close look at his record over the last 15 years suggests that Mr. Bush has well-stated his views -- on all sides of the issue.  In 1974, as the U.S. representative to the United Nations, he wrote an introduction to a book on world population in which he boasted of his leadership during his term in Congress in expanding family-planning services for the poor.  Running for president in early 1980, he was also quoted as supporting federal funding for abortions in cases of rape, incest and to save the life of the mother.  In his Rolling Stone interview in 1980, Mr. Bush volunteered his abortion-rights remarks to contrast himself with his rival, Ronald Reagan.  In addition to supporting the landmark Roe vs.  Wade Supreme Court decision legalizing abortion, Mr. Bush said he opposed the constitutional ban on abortion that Mr. Reagan was promising to promote.  As Mr. Reagan's running mate, though, Mr. Bush plunged headlong into the anti-abortion position, endorsing a constitutional amendment outlawing abortion.  He acknowledged only one difference with Mr. Reagan -- that the amendment ought to have exceptions for rape and incest as well as to save a woman's life.  Throughout the early 1980s, Mr. Bush was quoted sometimes supporting federal funding for abortion in cases of rape and incest and sometimes opposing it.  In April 1986, then-Vice President Bush had his staff write a letter spelling out that he would support a constitutional amendment banning abortions except in cases of rape, incest and life endangerment, but that he opposed federal funding in all but the latter case.  At the GOP convention last year, he again came out for an amendment with exceptions for rape, incest and life endangerment.  His rhetoric gathered momentum as he rolled into office, affirming his "firm support of our cause" during an anti-abortion rally three days after his inauguration last January.  He again urged passage of a constitutional amendment outlawing abortion.  But when the high court ruled in the Webster case in July, the president began to lower the volume.  When the ruling was handed down, the vacationing president dispatched Chief of Staff John Sununu to issue a statement and refused to answer questions himself.  He did later threaten vetoes over legislation restoring the District of Columbia's right to use its own tax money to fund abortions for poor women and over restoring funding to the United Nations Population Fund.  But in the months since then, while trying to drum up support for other issues -- such as an anti-flag-burning constitutional amendment -- he has shied away from talking about abortion.  What few comments he has initiated have been oblique, such as urging "greater efforts toward the protection of human life" at a meeting of Catholic lawyers in Boston last month.  The White House has likewise avoided any involvement in Florida's recent special legislative session on abortion, which anti-abortion forces had regarded as a key test of their ability to get state lawmakers to toughen abortion restrictions.  The session failed to enact any new curbs.  Now, some see Mr. Bush trapped in a position he is neither comfortable with nor able to escape.  Ken Ruberg, head of the Republican Mainstream Committee, a group of party moderates, observes: "The administration finds itself in an ideological cul de sac that it will find it difficult -- if not impossible -- to get itself out of."  Christopher Cox's Oct. 13 editorial-page article "Toward More Crippling Lawsuits . . ." misses the point.  The 1989 Americans With Disabilities Act is about eliminating discriminatory barriers.  When we look closely at our own history, it is clear that our constitutionally mandated civil rights have evolved not through the goodness of people's hearts but through legislation and constitutional amendments.  This is how American women won the right to vote.  And it is how African-Americans and other minority groups were guaranteed their equal rights as citizens in this nation.  For the more than 43 million Americans with disabilities, the 1989 Americans With Disabilities Act provides the missing piece.  Disabled Americans have had their civil rights guaranteed in all federally funded programs since Section 504 was passed as a part of the 1973 Rehabilitation Act.  The 1989 act simply extends these guarantees to the private sector.  Those who fear a plethora of suits paralyzing our legal system need only look at the record on the Rehabilitation Act.  Without legal recourse, there are no guarantees of civil rights for anyone.  John R. Garrison  President  National Easter Seal Society  Chicago  Ford Motor Co. said it is consolidating control of its Asian operations under a new organization here that will be headed by W. Wayne Booker.  Ford Asia-Pacific will coordinate the activities of Ford subsidiaries in Japan, Australia, Taiwan and New Zealand and work with Ford business associates throughout the region.  These functions are currently performed out of Melbourne, Australia, and at Ford's headquarters in Dearborn, Mich.  Mr. Booker, executive director of Ford's Latin America Automotive Operations since December 1988, was named vice president of Ford Asia-Pacific.  Goodyear Tire & Rubber Co., buoyed by improved operating profit in its tire segment, reported that third-quarter net income rose 11% to $70.5 million, or $1.22 a share.  In the year-ago period, Goodyear had net of $63.5 million, or $1.11 a share.  Sales rose slightly to $2.68 billion, from $2.66 billion.  Analysts had mixed responses to the results.  Donald DeScenza, an independent analyst in New Canaan, Conn., said he was "impressed with the company's performance."  He said results were better than he'd expected and indicate that Goodyear is in the midst of a turnaround from a string of lackluster quarters that have plagued the company for a year.  However, Harry Millis, an analyst at McDonald & Co., Cleveland, said Goodyear's results "fell at the bottom" of his range of estimates.  Excluding an increase in the tax rate and the effects of foreign currency translations, Mr. Millis said the company's results "were still a little disappointing."  Goodyear's stock, which has been weak in recent weeks, fell $2.875 yesterday to close at $43.875 a share in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  The Akron, Ohio-based company said pretax operating income in its tire segment jumped about 31% to $196.2 million from $150.2 million a year earlier, reflecting improvements in raw material costs, sales of replacement tires and pricing.  McDonald's Mr. Millis said Goodyear appeared to have held or gained some market share in the U.S. for the first time since the second quarter of 1988.  But Goodyear said total U.S. tire unit sales were off about 2%.  Total tire segment sales were up only about 1% to $2.2 billion, and the company said it reduced manufacturing levels at some of its U.S. tire plants because of inventory adjustments and slackened production by auto makers.  In the latest quarter, Goodyear's tax rate was 51% compared with 41% a year earlier.  As a result, total tax outlays were $73.5 million, compared with $44.1 million the year earlier.  For the nine months, profit skidded about 35%, reflecting charges taken in this year's second quarter and the effect of translations of weaker foreign currencies into the stronger U.S. dollar.  Net was $192.1 million, or $3.33 a share, compared with net of $293.7 million, or $5.13 a share, the year earlier.  The latest nine months included charges of $95 million related to the company's South African subsidiary and unused pipe sold by its crude oil pipeline unit.  Sales rose nearly 2% to $8.13 billion from $7.98 billion.  Environmental Control Group Inc. said it expects to report "minimal" earnings or a loss for the third quarter.  The environmental services company said that the discontinuation of unsuccessful product lines and an increase in baddebt reserves probably will result in charges of $2.5 million to $4 million, most of which will be taken against third-quarter results.  In the year-ago quarter, the company reported earnings of $2.2 million, or 35 cents a share.  Former USX Corp. Chairman David M. Roderick may have been lucky he retired last May.  As he handed over the reins to successor Charles A. Corry, steel profits were close to a cyclical peak.  Though imports were troublesome, they weren't running away with the market, and American companies had high hopes that steel import quotas would be extended for another five years.  Perhaps most important, Carl Icahn, who had once threatened a hostile takeover bid, was subdued.  He and Mr. Roderick were even dining out together.  Today, Mr. Corry presides over a company whose fortunes have changed abruptly.  Mr. Icahn, the company's deep-pocketed, tenacious adversary, recently disclosed that he had raised his USX stake to 13.1%, and he again threatened a takeover.  A battle with Mr. Icahn would rattle even the most seasoned chief executive, to say nothing of one who took the helm less than five months ago.  In addition, USX's giant steel segment, representing 34% of its 1988 sales, is facing softening demand and slipping prices as well as increasing competition from foreign steelmakers and low-cost minimills.  The import quotas got only a 2 1/2-year extension, and USX is laboring under a staggering $5.8 billion debt at a time when it must spend money to upgrade steel mills and drill for oil.  "It's a baptism of fire for Corry," says one USX executive.  The burning question is whether the new chief can parry Mr. Icahn without being pushed into unwelcome moves.  Mr. Corry might have to dismember the company more than he wants to.  Or he might have to incur a huge expense of either buying Mr. Icahn's stock, possibly at a premium, or paying stockholders a special dividend partly because of Mr. Icahn's pressure.  With his recent purchases of USX common stock, Mr. Icahn shattered a three-year-old, unwritten standstill agreement with Mr. Roderick.  In 1986, Mr. Roderick adroitly dodged Mr. Icahn's first bullet after the takeover specialist had built up an 11.4% stake.  Mr. Roderick did so by having USX redeem a series of guaranteed notes, a move that, in effect, raised the cost of a $7.19 billion Icahn bid by about $3 billion.  And he managed to fend off further advances and even strike up an unlikely friendship with the interloper.  Over dinners at New York's Sky Club and Links Club restaurants, the steel executive and the big investor talked steel, international trade and thoroughbred horses.  Mr. Corry, who has boned up on corporate raiders by reading T. Boone Pickens's autobiography, had hoped the detente would continue.  He was shocked, associates say, to learn of Mr. Icahn's new takeover threat. (Both men declined to be interviewed for this article.) But the fiercely competitive Mr. Corry quickly showed he's no pushover.  He huddled with directors at a special meeting two weeks ago and tried to block his opponent.  Although the board believed that Mr. Icahn is more interested in talking the stock price higher than acquiring USX, it adopted a poison-pill defense, to be swallowed if anyone amasses a 15% stake.  Now, it's Mr. Icahn's move.  Will he try to gain a seat on or control of the board and force a radical split of USX into separate oil and steel companies?  Given the weakness of the junk-bond market, can he finance a buy-out?  Mr. Icahn may not want to sell out unless he can get a special dividend similar to one he received before selling his stake in Texaco Inc. in June -- a coup that gave him enough cash to make his USX move.  And although the recent turmoil in the stock and junk-bond markets, by making it harder to arrange takeover financing, has eased some of the pressure on Mr. Corry, it doesn't end the takeover threat.  "I know it's not over," a sober-faced Mr. Corry acknowledged while greeting steel suppliers in New York on Oct. 12 and inviting them to a buffet of salmon and sushi in honor of Kobe Steel Ltd., USX's partner in a steel mill in Lorain, Ohio.  In fact, it's barely begun for Mr. Corry, who faces tough decisions before he has had a chance to get settled into his new job.  "He's in a vulnerable position because he hasn't established much credibility on his own," says Bryan Jacoboski, a securities analyst at PaineWebber Inc.  The 57-year-old tax attorney never even aspired to the job of chief executive.  An undistinguished college student who dabbled in zoology until he concluded that he couldn't stand cutting up frogs, Mr. Corry wanted to work for a big company "that could do big things."  But after joining the tax department of a USX subsidiary 30 years ago, he set the modest goal of becoming tax manager by the age of 46.  For years, he quietly stuck to the back accounting rooms, wearing a hat to work because everyone else did.  "I was never a rebel," he said in an earlier interview.  "I don't think most of the people that have been around me would ever say they've seen me pound the table or get angry."  Yet, the unassuming Mr. Corry helped chart USX's transition from Big Steel to Big Oil.  He served as Mr. Roderick's front man in tense negotiations for the 1982 purchase of Marathon Oil for $5.9 billion.  Nevertheless, Mr. Corry, once named chief executive, didn't waste any time distancing himself from his former boss, who still has an office on the 62nd floor of the USX tower in Pittsburgh.  Soon after taking over last June, Mr. Corry rescinded a pay cut imposed on clerical workers, a move that Mr. Roderick hadn't made in spite of improved earnings.  Mr. Corry also ruled that all board meetings would be held in Pittsburgh instead of New York or Findlay, Ohio, Marathon's home.  And, earlier this month, he announced the sale of the reserves of Texas Oil & Gas, which was acquired three years ago and hasn't posted any significant operating profits since.  One former executive says, "Nobody wanted that deal inside USX except Dave Roderick," who was a hunting and fishing buddy of William L. Hutchison, chairman of Texas Oil & Gas.  The executive recalls Mr. Corry whispering to him and others, "Remember, this was Dave's deal."  What miffed many USX executives and shareholders was that the acquisition, for $3 billion of stock, doubled the USX shares outstanding and considerably diluted them.  What's more, the takeover occurred as natural-gas prices were falling and just as Texas Oil & Gas reported its first annual loss in 28 years.  Mr. Corry expected the Texas Oil & Gas sale to delight Mr. Icahn by addressing his concern about boosting shareholder value.  But when the two men met in New York a day after Mr. Icahn disclosed the rise in his USX stake, Mr. Corry learned that Mr. Icahn wanted him to sell all of Texas Oil -- not just its reserves of about 1.2 trillion cubic feet of natural gas and 28 million barrels of oil but also its pipeline, gas-gathering and contract-drilling operations.  That would leave USX with Marathon, its steel mills and its diversified business segment, which includes, among other things, mineral and transportation products.  Some speculate that Mr. Corry would agree if he could find a buyer at the right price.  The problem is that Mr. Icahn is pushing him to move faster and further in restructuring USX than Mr. Corry had planned.  Mr. Icahn has long believed, associates say, that the company, whose 1988 sales totaled $16.88 billion, is worth $70 a share if broken up.  The stock closed yesterday at $33.625, giving Mr. Icahn's 33.6 million shares a value of $1.13 billion.  Mr. Icahn advocates the sale of the company's steel operations, and Mr. Corry doesn't necessarily disagree.  Unlike his predecessor, who saw steel as America's backbone, Mr. Corry tends to view it as a capital-draining and labor-intensive business with limited potential, associates say.  In the past five years, USX has turned steel into a profit maker by closing several plants and reducing labor costs.  But the short-term outlook is so-so.  It isn't surprising that Messrs.  Roderick and Corry view steel so differently.  While Mr. Roderick was reared in the shadows of Pittsburgh's smoking mills, Mr. Corry grew up in Cincinnati, a city nicknamed "Porkapolis" and more accustomed to pork chops than pig iron.  He has never met Lynn Williams, the president of the United Steelworkers union, and isn't active in the industry's main trade group, the American Iron and Steel Institute, which Mr. Roderick served as chairman.  "Dave thought the country needed a strong U.S. Steel and, while Chuck agreed, he was more apt to say, `Not at any cost to shareholders,'" a former executive says.  Indeed, Mr. Corry, at an August press conference, talked about investing in steel as long as it provides a good return and "not a day longer."  However, shedding steel would run directly counter to Mr. Roderick's original rationale for diversifying into oil and gas: Having two major products would lessen the company's vulnerability to one market's down cycle and help smooth out the flow of cash and earnings.  As Mr. Roderick once said: "We're a two-product company and, boy, if you can't figure out the value of those two parts, you are so damn dumb that you don't belong on Wall Street."  Moreover, the opportunity to sell steel at a price acceptable to USX may be gone, for now.  "The time has passed for us to spin off steel," either in a public offering or to a buyer, one executive contends.  About the only way that USX now can get out of steel is to dish it out, piece by piece, in separate joint ventures, he adds.  With Mr. Icahn breathing down his neck, however, Mr. Corry may have little choice but to sell at a weak price, even if it means losing some steel-related tax-loss carryforwards.  That would leave USX essentially an oil company with Marathon as its core.  Marathon has benefited from higher crude-oil prices and strong demand for refined products.  Oil has long been Mr. Corry's pet.  Indeed, when the Bush administration finally decided this summer to renew import restrictions -- arguably the most important decision to affect the steel industry in five years -- Mr. Corry and his directors were aboard helicopters, high above Marathon's rich oil reserves in the North Sea.  Should USX be left with only Marathon, Mr. Corry might well feel pushed to scout out other energy companies.  However, even USX executives who work closely with him aren't sure about his long-term goals.  "I don't think he has a clear sense of where he wants the company to go," one says.  Right now, the executive adds, "he wants to continue to focus on paying down" USX's debt by selling assets.  One thing is certain, however: Mr. Corry, while studying other options, probably won't make a major move until he's clear about Mr. Icahn's intentions.  And then, "he won't panic," says J. Bruce Johnston, a former USX executive and now a labor and benefit consultant with Adler Cohen & Grigsby in Pittsburgh.  Mr. Corry learned presence under fire when, as vice president of corporate planning, he handled what Mr. Johnston calls "don't-con-me" negotiations that led to USX's shedding of a wide array of assets ranging from chemicals to construction.  When negotiating, Mr. Corry played his cards close to the vest.  Johnnie Johnson, who worked for Mr. Corry in strategic planning, recalls how his boss would routinely ask a subordinate to research an entire industry to target acquisition candidates.  "What he really wanted to know was about a particular company, but you didn't know that.  He wanted your own unbiased, virgin opinion," says Mr. Johnson, now managing director at Georgeson & Co., a proxy-solicitation and investor-relations firm.  Ever the pragmatist, Mr. Corry said in August that he realized that USX is on "acquisition screens all over the country."  "It's part of the capitalistic market system that equity can be bought and equity is bought," he said.  USX, he noted, was formed 88 years ago, "by in effect buying out a bunch of other companies. . . .  People got rich through takeovers in those days, as they do today."  ---  Thomas F. O'Boyle contributed to this article.  Westinghouse Electric Corp. said it will buy Shaw-Walker Co. Terms weren't disclosed.  Shaw-Walker, based in Muskegon, Mich., makes metal files and desks, and seating and office systems furniture.  Israel has launched a new effort to prove the Palestine Liberation Organization continues to practice terrorism, and thus to persuade the U.S. to break off talks with the group.  U.S. officials, however, said they aren't buying the Israeli argument.  Israeli counterterrorism officials provided the State Department with a 20-page list of recent terrorist incidents they attribute directly to forces controlled by PLO Chairman Yasser Arafat.  Mr. Arafat publicly renounced terrorism Dec. 15, satisfying the U.S. precondition for a direct "dialogue" with the PLO.  A U.S. counterterrorism official said experts are studying the Israeli list.  "We have no independent evidence linking Fatah to any acts of terrorism since Dec. 15, 1988," he said, referring to the specific PLO group that Mr. Arafat heads.  "So far, this list doesn't change our view.  Israel wants to end the dialogue, but our analysts take a different view than theirs."  Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir's top adviser on counterterrorism, Yigal Carmon, was here Monday to present the report to members of Congress, reporters and others.  Mr. Carmon said he also presented the list last week to William Brown, U.S. Ambassador to Israel.  Separately, the New York Times reported that the Israeli government had provided its correspondent in Jerusalem with different documents that Israel said prove the PLO has been conducting terrorism from the occupied Arab territories.  The State Department said it hasn't yet seen copies of those papers.  "If the dialogue was based on the assumption that Arafat or the PLO would stop terrorism, and we have evidence of continued terrorism, what would be the logical conclusion?"  Mr. Carmon asked.  Israel has long claimed Mr. Arafat never meant to renounce terrorism, particularly because he and his lieutenants reserved the right to press "armed struggle" against the Jewish state.  Now, Jerusalem says it is backing up its contention with detailed accounts of alleged terrorist acts and plans linked to Mr. Arafat.  It blames most of these on Fatah.  The new accusations come at a delicate time in U.S. efforts to bring about talks between Israel and Palestinian representatives.  The State Department said it had received a new letter on the subject from Israeli Foreign Minister Moshe Arens, restating Israel's previous objection to negotiating with any Palestinian tied to the PLO.  Deciding what constitutes "terrorism" can be a legalistic exercise.  The U.S. defines it as "premediated, politically motivated violence perpetrated against noncombatant targets by subnational groups or clandestine state agents."  To meet the U.S. criteria, Israel contended it only listed incidents that involved civilians and occurred inside its pre-1967 borders.  At the heart of Israel's report is a list of a dozen incidents Jerusalem attributes to Fatah, including the use of bombs and Molotov cocktails.  But U.S. officials say they aren't satisfied these incidents constitute terrorism because they may be offshoots of the intifadah, the Palestinian rebellion in the occupied territories, which the U.S. doesn't classify as terrorism.  In addition, the officials say Israel hasn't presented convincing evidence these acts were ordered by Fatah or by any group Mr. Arafat controls.  U.S. terrorism experts also say they are highly uncertain about the veracity of the separate documents leaked to the New York Times.  The papers, which Israel says were discovered in Israeli-occupied Gaza, refer to terrorist acts to be carried out in the name of a group called "the Revolutionary Eagles."  Some supporters of Israel say U.S. policy on Palestinian terrorism is colored by an intense desire to maintain the dialogue with the PLO.  But State Department officials accuse Israel of leaking questionable claims to embarrass the U.S.  The dollar finished lower yesterday, after tracking another rollercoaster session on Wall Street.  Concern about the volatile U.S. stock market had faded in recent sessions, and traders appeared content to let the dollar languish in a narrow range until tomorrow, when the preliminary report on third-quarter U.S. gross national product is released.  But seesaw gyrations in the Dow Jones Industrial Average yesterday put Wall Street back in the spotlight and inspired market participants to bid the U.S. unit lower.  UAL's decision to remain an independent company sent share prices tumbling.  By midmorning, the DJIA had plunged 80 points and foreign-exchange dealers quickly drove the dollar down.  When the DJIA modestly rebounded, the dollar bounced back in choppy dealings but ended the day below the levels of late Monday.  Stock prices, meanwhile, posted significant gains in later trading and closed down by only 3.69 points on the day.  Some dealers said that the market's strong reaction to Wall Street reflects a general uneasiness about the dollar.  They added that the DJIA's swift drop proved an easy excuse for the market to drive the U.S. currency in the direction it was already headed.  In late New York trading yesterday, the dollar was quoted at 1.8355 marks, down from 1.8470 marks Monday, and at 141.45 yen, down from 141.90 yen late Monday.  Sterling was quoted at $1.6055, up from $1.6030 late Monday.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 141.57 yen, down from Tuesday's Tokyo close of 142.10 yen.  Tom Trettien, a vice president with Banque Paribas in New York, sees a break in the dollar's long-term upward trend, a trend that began in January 1988.  He argues that the dollar is now "moving sideways," adding that "the next leg could be the beginning of a longer term bearish phase."  Analysts peg the dollar's recent weakness to an underlying slowdown in the U.S. economy, highlighted by recent economic data, particularly a surprisingly sharp widening in the August U.S. trade gap.  They also point out that narrowing interest-rate differentials between the U.S. and its major trading partners tend to make the U.S. currency less attractive to foreign investors.  Despite several spurts of dollar trading, it was noted that mark-yen cross trade grabbed much of the market's attention.  Following the dive in U.S. stocks, the mark has strengthened more than its major counterparts.  Traders attribute the mark's surge to a robust West German economy and higher rate differentials.  But, they add that the mark's strength is in part a reflection of a shift away from U.S. assets by Japanese investors into West German investments.  "The question remains: how much can the West German market absorb?" says one senior dealer.  Some dealers say that Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita's reassurance that Japanese monetary policy won't be changed for the time being has given investors an added excuse to push the yen down even further against the mark.  Despite the yen's weakness with respect to the mark, Tokyo traders say they don't expect the Bank of Japan to take any action to support the Japanese currency on that front.  Meanwhile, sterling slumped on news that the United Kingdom posted a wider-than-expected trade deficit in September.  The news also knocked the British unit to below 2.95 marks in London, but a bout of short-covering helped sterling recoup some of its earlier losses.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery jumped $3.20 to $370.20 an ounce.  The close was the highest since Aug. 15.  Estimated volume was a light two million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was quoted at $368.25 an ounce.  Boston Co., the upper-crust financial services concern that was rocked by a management scandal late last year, has had a sharp drop in profitability -- mainly because a high-risk bet on interest rates backfired.  Boston Co.'s fall from grace is bad news for its parent, Shearson Lehman Hutton Holdings Inc., which has relied heavily on the banking and money management unit's contributions in recent years.  In 1988, for example, Boston Co. had an estimated pretax profit of at least $110 million, while Shearson managed net income of just $96 million.  Shearson doesn't break out the earnings of its subsidiaries.  But people familiar with Boston Co.'s performance say the unit had profit of around $17 million for the third quarter, after barely breaking even for the first six months.  Shearson, meanwhile, posted net income of $106 million for the first nine months of the year, down slightly from $110 million for the year-ago period.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. last week downgraded the long-term deposit rating of Boston Co.'s Boston Safe Deposit & Trust Co. subsidiary, to single-A-1 from double-A-3, citing problems in the company's "aggressively managed securities portfolio."  John Kriz, a Moody's vice president, said Boston Safe Deposit's performance has been hurt this year by a mismatch in the maturities of its assets and liabilities.  The mismatch exposed the company to a high degree of interest-rate risk, and when rates moved unfavorably -- beginning late last year and continuing into this year -- "it cost them," Mr. Kriz said.  Mr. Kriz noted that Boston Safe Deposit "has taken some actions to better control asset-liability management and improve controls in general, and we think these will serve to improve credit quality."  As some securities mature and the proceeds are reinvested, the problems ought to ease, he said.  But he also cited concerns over the company's mortgage exposure in the troubled New England real estate market.  Boston Co. officials declined to comment on Moody's action or on the unit's financial performance this year -- except to deny a published report that outside accountants had discovered evidence of significant accounting errors in the first three quarters' results.  An accounting controversy at the end of last year forced Boston Co. to admit it had overstated pretax profits by some $44 million.  The resulting scandal led to the firing of James N. von Germeten as Boston Co.'s president and to the resignations of the company's chief financial officer and treasurer.  The executives were accused of improperly deferring expenses and booking revenue early, in an effort to dress up results -- and perhaps bolster performance-related bonuses.  Mr. von Germeten, in turn, attributed the controversy to judgmental errors by accountants and accused Shearson of conducting a "witch hunt."  Mr. Kriz of Moody's said the problems in the securities portfolio stem largely from positions taken last year.  The company's current management found itself "locked into this," he said.  Mexico exported an average of 1,296,800 barrels of crude oil a day at an average of $15.31 a barrel during 1989's first eight months for a total of $4.82 billion, Petroleos Mexicanos S.A. said.  The state petroleum monopoly said sales in the period gained 15%, and $262.4 million more than originally projected at an average of $10 a barrel on an export platform of 1,250,000 barrels a day.  CHICAGO - Sears, Roebuck & Co. is struggling as it enters the critical Christmas season.  Yesterday, the retailing and financial services giant reported a 16% drop in third-quarter earnings to $257.5 million, or 75 cents a share, from a restated $305 million, or 80 cents a share, a year earlier.  But the news was even worse for Sears's core U.S. retailing operation, the largest in the nation.  Sears said its U.S. stores had a loss of $6.9 million, their first deficit for the period in more than five years.  Analysts estimated that sales at U.S. stores declined in the quarter, too.  The results underscore Sears's difficulties in implementing the "everyday low pricing" strategy that it adopted in March as part of a broad attempt to revive its retailing business.  Under the new approach, Sears set prices that were somewhere between its old "regular" and "sale" prices.  The company said it would resort far less often to slashing prices to woo shoppers.  Sears officials insist they don't intend to abandon the everyday pricing approach in the face of the poor results.  Instead, a spokesman blames the dismal third-quarter showing on "an environment that is being distorted by a very harsh climate for sales of durable goods," which account for roughly two-thirds of Sears's annual merchandise volume.  The new pricing strategy "is working," the spokesman asserted.  He added that, after an initial surge triggered by an advertising blitz in March, Sears expected that the pricing program wouldn't have any effect on revenue.  Sears has been counting on growth coming from the large displays of brand-name merchandise it is adding to its stores over the next two years in what it calls "power formats."  But analysts say Sears faces an especially daunting challenge on the eve of the Christmas shopping season.  "I believe everyday pricing in the current environment doesn't work," says Walter Loeb of Morgan Stanley & Co., pointing to soft durable-goods sales.  "Sears is likely to be unsuccessful if it continues with its pricing policy when everyone else is offering unusual values."  In what amounts to an admission that the transition hasn't gone as smoothly as Sears had hoped, the giant retailer is now trying new ways to drum up business without appearing to abandon its seven-month-old strategy.  The company is highlighting more special deals in its advertising and stores, and it's offering to defer finance charges on certain big-ticket items.  Sears is also stepping up its television ads and changing its message.  In a new TV ad, for instance, a woman going through the Sunday newspaper brands as hype claims by other stores that they are offering goods for "50%, 60% and 70% off."  By lowering prices throughout its stores, she says, "Sears has the right idea."  But the ad also mentions Sears's sales -- a topic that the retailer has avoided since switching to everyday pricing.  "When Sears has a sale at a special price," the woman in the ad declares, "it's something you don't want to miss."  Recent surveys by Leo J. Shapiro & Associates, a market research firm in Chicago, suggest that Sears is having a tough time attracting shoppers because it hasn't yet done enough to improve service or its selection of merchandise.  The number of people who said they were more likely to shop at Sears fell in September to 37% from 66% in March, when Sears blanketed the airwaves with ads about its new pricing strategy.  Moreover, the number of people who spontaneously cited lower prices as the reason for their interest in Sears declined to 16% in September from 33% in March.  Just 5% of the respondents mentioned brands in September, up slightly from 2% in March.  Only 2% of the people in September cited Sears's "friendly personnel."  "The power of price as an appeal, which was very considerable in driving traffic in March and April, has diminished," says George Rosenbaum, president of Shapiro & Associates.  "You see some improvement in these other areas, but it's a very small and slow process."  For the third quarter, Sears said its total revenue rose 4.8% to $13.18 billion from $12.57 billion a year earlier.  Net income at Sears's merchandise group, which includes international and credit card operations, as well as U.S. stores, fell 25%.  Profit at Sears's Allstate insurance unit fell 38% to $126.1 million because of Hurricane Hugo, which inflicted the greatest single storm damage loss in the company's history.  Sears said claims from the storm, as expected, reduced its third-quarter net by $80 million, or 23 cents a share.  Allstate is expected to absorb another big hit in the fourth quarter as claims pour in from the San Francisco earthquake.  But a spokesman said the quake won't have as big a financial impact on Allstate as Hurricane Hugo did.  Net income at Sears's Dean Witter Financials Services group, meanwhile, rose nearly 32% to $35.7 million, reflecting improvements in its basic stock brokerage and Discover credit card businesses.  Profit at Sears's Coldwell Banker Real Estate Group nearly quadrupled to $81.2 million because of gains on sales of property.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Sears shares closed at $40.50, up 87.5 cents.  Oil imports to Japan rose 12% in September from year-earlier levels, according to statistics released by the government's Ministry of International Trade and Industry.  The imports, totaling 98.5 million barrels, were 11% lower than August levels.  The year-on-year rise was partly because of higher demand for petroleum products, and partly because of tax changes in 1988 that left oil companies with high inventories in the late-summer/early-FALL PERIOD.  Imports of crude from the Middle East grew 17% from year-earlier levels, and Southeast Asian crude imports grew 43%.  While Mideast crude imports were higher compared with year-earlier levels, they fell 18% compared with August imports.  Southeast Asian crude imports, however, were 3.6% higher than August.  This is in response to George Melloan's Business World column "The Housing Market Is a Bigger Mess Than You Think" (op-ed page, Sept. 26).  In Houston, we have seen how bad the housing problem can become.  Unused houses deteriorate rapidly, affecting the value of nearby homes; in a domino effect, the entire neighborhood can fall victim.  At this stage some people just "walk away" from homes where the mortgage exceeds current market value.  But most of them could have afforded to keep up their payments -- they chose not to do so.  The problem is so vast that we need to try innovative solutions -- in small-scale experiments.  Here are some ideas:  1) Foreclosed homes could be sold by the FHA for no down payment (the biggest obstacle to young buyers), but with personal liability for the mortgage (no walking away by choice).  2) Encourage long-term occupancy by forgiving one month's payment (off the tail end of the mortgage) for every six months paid; or perhaps have the down payment deferred to the end of the mortgage (balloon), but "forgiven" on a monthly pro-rata basis as long as the owner remains the occupant.  3) Develop rental agreements with exclusive purchase options for the renter.  An occupant will, in most every case, be better for the home and neighborhood than a vacant house.  In this way, the house is not dumped on to a glutted market.  John F. Merrill  Houston  ---  The Federal Housing Administration, Veterans Administration and the Department of Housing and Urban Development further aggravate the problem of affordable housing stock by "buying in" to their foreclosed properties (of which there are, alas, many) at an inflated "balance due" -- say $80,000 on a house worth $55,000 -- instead of allowing a free market to price the house for what it's really worth.  Worse, the properties then sit around deteriorating for maybe a year or so, but are resold eventually (because of the attractiveness of the low down payment, etc.) to a marginal buyer who can't afford both the mortgage and needed repairs; and having little vested interest that buyer will walk away and the vicious cycle repeats itself all over again.  Paul Padget  Cincinnati  Italy's unemployment rate rose to 12% of the labor force in July from 11.9% in April, and was up from 11.7% a year earlier, according to quarterly figures from the state statistical institute.  Istat said a national survey during the first week of July showed the number of job seekers was 2,888,000 up from 2,822,000 in April, and from 2,853,000 a year ago.  The unemployment rate was by far the highest in the southern, so-called Mezzogiorno region.  The southern unemployment rate rose to 21.3% in July from 21.2% in April and from 20.6% a year earlier.  Istat said 369,000 more people were employed in July than in April.  Xerox Corp.'s third-quarter net income grew 6.2% on 7.3% higher revenue, earning mixed reviews from Wall Street analysts.  Quarter net for the business-machines and financial-services company rose to $155 million, or $1.41 a share, from $146 million, or $1.37 a share, in the year-earlier period.  Revenue rose to $4.45 billion from $4.15 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Xerox closed at $62.75 a share, up $1.  Sales growth and profit in business products and systems -- Xerox's main business -- were "disappointing," said B. Alex Henderson, who follows the company for Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  Sales of Xerox copiers and other office products grew 1.6%; "we expected growth of 6% to 7%," Mr. Henderson said.  Operating-profit margins slipped almost 18%, to 4.3% of sales, the analyst noted.  Still, with competitors such as Eastman Kodak Co. faltering in copier sales, Xerox's sales increases "were encouraging," says Eugene Glazer of Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  "They are holding their own in a weak market, and the restructuring is working," he says.  David T. Kearns, Xerox chairman and chief executive officer, cited the restructuring and "strong" cost controls for the 13% growth in profit from business products and systems operations.  Mr. Glazer expects Xerox to experience tough sledding, though, in financial services because of rate pressures and uncertainty surrounding tax treatment of capital gains.  In the quarter, the Crum & Forster insurance unit reported $200 million before tax of capital gains from property and casualty operations.  The subsidiary also increased reserves by $140 million, however, and set aside an additional $25 million for claims connected with Hurricane Hugo.  For the nine months, Xerox earned $492 million, or $4.55 a share, up 5.8% from $465 million, or $4.32 a share.  Revenue rose 7.6% to $12.97 billion from $12.05 billion.  New orders for durable goods fell back slightly in September after shooting up the month before, reflecting weakening auto demand after a spurt of orders for new 1990 models, the Commerce Department reported.  Orders for military equipment, household appliances, machinery and other goods expected to last at least three years dipped 0.1% last month, to $126.68 billion, after leaping 3.9% in August, the department said.  Most analysts had expected a sharper decline after the steep rise in August.  Moreover, a recent government report showing widespread layoffs in manufacturing had contributed to perceptions that the manufacturing sector of the economy had slowed to a crawl.  But many economists pointed to a 1.8% September rise in orders outside the volatile transportation category.  That "suggests the manufacturing sector is not falling apart," said Sally Kleinman, an economist at Manufacturers Hanover Securities Corp. in New York.  She added, however: "It is not robust by any means."  While a decline in orders for cars and civilian airplanes pulled down the orders total, an enormous jump in orders for heavy military equipment propped it up.  Orders for capital defense goods skyrocketed 56%, and a government analyst said nearly all areas saw increases, including airplanes, missiles, ships, tanks and communications equipment.  Orders for military goods usually catapult in September, government officials say, as the Pentagon scrambles to spend its money before the new fiscal year begins Oct. 1.  While all the numbers in the durable goods report were adjusted for seasonal fluctuations, a Commerce Department analyst said that the adjustment probably didn't factor out all of the wide-ranging surge in defense orders.  Without the increase in defense bookings, September orders would have plummeted 3.9%.  Analysts were most unsettled by evidence the backlog of orders at factories is slipping.  Unfilled orders for durable goods rose 0.4% in September, to $476.14 billion, after declining for the first time in 2 1/2 years in August.  In July unfilled orders grew 1%.  But analysts noted that excluding transportation-where what they believe was a temporary surge in auto demand pushed up the figures-order backlogs have declined for three months in a row.  "It means we're eating into the bread that keeps us going.  That is a little disturbing," Ms. Kleinman said.  "It also means if you have a real drop-off in orders, production will likely fall off very quickly because there is less to keep things going."  Capital goods orders outside of the defense sector tumbled for the second month in a row, posting a 5.6% drop after a 10.3% decline.  Such steep drops in a category seen as a barometer of business investment would customarily be grave news for the economy.  But a Commerce Department analyst said that in both months orders would have risen had it not been for a drop in civilian aircraft bookings, a category that is showing declines only after a huge surge earlier this year.  Still, Milton Hudson, senior economic adviser at Morgan Guaranty Trust Co. in New York, said: "If you look back a half-year or so the evidence was pretty good of affirmative strength in the capital-goods sector.  Now at least there are question marks about that, and without any question the pace of growth has slowed."  Norfolk Southern Corp. directors authorized the railroad company to buy back as many as 45 million of its shares, which would have a current value of more than $1.7 billion.  The buy-back, coupled with a nearly completed earlier purchase of 20 million shares, would reduce shares outstanding by more than 26%.  The Norfolk, Va., company has 172.2 million shares outstanding.  In a statement, Arnold B. McKinnon, chairman and chief executive officer, noted that the new repurchase program "should serve to enhance shareholder value."  A spokeswoman said the company will finance the buy-back with cash on hand, borrowing and "cash Norfolk expects to generate."  Analysts said they expected the action, and investors applauded the move.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Norfolk Southern shares closed at $37.875, up $1.125.  Still, analysts don't expect the buy-back to significantly affect per-share earnings in the short term.  "The impact won't be that great," said Graeme Lidgerwood of First Boston Corp.  That is in part because of the effect of having to average the number of shares outstanding, she said.  In addition, Mrs. Lidgerwood said, Norfolk is likely to draw down its cash initially to finance the purchases and thus forfeit some interest income.  Longer term, however, the buy-back is expected to increase earnings, especially after 1990, Mrs. Lidgerwood said.  Moreover, the extensive program in effect establishes a floor for the stock price, said Joel Price, analyst for Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette.  The buy-back "is really a comfort to those who want to buy the stock that there is a {price} floor," he said.  "At a certain price, if the management thinks {the stock} is cheap, they can go in and buy it."  Under the program, Norfolk plans to acquire shares in the open market.  Under the earlier plan, Norfolk was authorized in 1987 to buy up to 20 million shares.  It has purchased about 19 million of them.  John B. Curcio, 55 years old, resigned as chairman of this diesel truck manufacturer, effective upon appointment of a successor.  Last month, Mr. Curcio was succeeded by Ralph E. Reins as chief executive officer following several quarters of lackluster or declining performance.  Falcon Holding Group Inc. said it agreed to acquire about 54,000 subscribers from First Carolina Cable TV Limited Partnership for about $100 million, or roughly $2,000 a subscriber.  The subscribers are in 52 different communities in Georgia, Alabama and Mississippi.  Completion of the sale is expected early next year, Falcon said.  Currently, Falcon has about 750,000 cable-television subscribers around the nation; the company's cable-television unit reported 1988 revenue of about $100 million.  In composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, Falcon closed at $20, unchanged.  Richard W. Lock, retired vice president and treasurer of Owens-Illinois Inc., was named a director of this transportation industry supplier, increasing its board to six members.  USX Corp. said it delayed the proposed initial public offering of common stock of RMI Titanium Co. because of market conditions.  RMI Titanium is owned jointly by USX and Quantum Chemical Corp.  USX, which hadn't set a date for the offering, didn't disclose any timetable for the offering.  Your Oct. 2 editorial "Reding, Wrighting & Erithmatic" on the recent "education summit" was like most pieces on the subject of education: It had little to say.  Oddly, though, on the very same page you printed a comment that addresses one of the most serious shortcomings of the American education system.  Unfortunately, the comment was buried in another article, so it could not stand out in an education context.  In the Manager's Journal, Atsushi Kageyama, in commenting on many differences between American and Japanese culture, said, "Japanese children are raised in a way many Americans would find severe.  After a wonderfully frivolous early childhood, they are exposed to rigid discipline as soon as they enter school."  What far too many people concerned about education either fail to understand or choose to ignore is that American children, on the whole, are among the most undisciplined in the world, making any attempt at improvements in the mode of education potentially unsuccessful.  Unless parents and educators alike start to develop more discipline in children, all the worthy concern, discussions and actions will not solve the problem.  Allen B. Richards  Peterborough, N.H.  Retired Adm. William J. Crowe, former chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, and Robert P. Luciano, chairman and chief executive officer of Schering-Plough Corp., were elected directors of this securities firm.  The board expanded to 17 seats.  Tuesday, October 24, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 3/4% high, 8 5/8% low, 8 11/16% near closing bid, 8 11/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.45% 30 to 44 days; 8.25% 45 to 68 days; 8.30% 69 to 89 days; 8.125% 90 to 119 days; 8% 120 to 149 days; 7.875% 150 to 179 days; 7.50% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.55% 30 days; 8.475% 60 days; 8.45% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.09% one month; 8.09% two months; 8.06% three months; 8% six months; 7.94% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.55% one month; 8.50% three months; 8.35% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.48% 30 days; 8.30% 60 days; 8.28% 90 days; 8.10% 120 days; 8% 150 days; 7.90% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% one month; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% two months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% three months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% four months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% five months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 11/16% one month; 8 11/16% three months; 8 1/2% six months; 8 1/2% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 9%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 15%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, October 23, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.52% 13 weeks; 7.50% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.78%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 7.875%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.75%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.70%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.59%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Roy E. Parrott, the company's president and chief operating officer since Sept. 1, was named to its board.  The appointment increased the number of directors to 10, three of whom are company employees.  Simpson is an auto parts maker.  Japan has climbed up from the ashes of World War II and a gross national product of about $800 per capita to reach the heavyweight class among industrialized nations.  Now this remarkable economic growth seems to be coming to an end because the government has not converted itself into a modern, democratic, "developed nation" mode of operation.  Until 1980, when Japan joined the $10,000 per capita GNP club of the advanced countries, it was a model developing nation.  The government built ports, bridges, highways, schools, hospitals and railways.  When industries were weak, it protected them.  It gave the Japanese people a value system, based on the rationalization that given the country's lack of natural resources, they must work hard to create value through exports and buy food with the surplus.  Individual prosperity inevitably would result.  That system has worked.  The standard of living has increased steadily over the past 40 years; more than 90% of the people consider themselves middle class.  The people have given their leading and only credible political party, the Liberal Democratic Party, clear and uninterrupted power for those 40 years.  The LDP won by a landslide in the last election, in July 1986.  But less than two years later, the LDP started to crumble, and dissent rose to unprecedented heights.  The symptoms all point to one thing: Japan does not have a modern government.  Its government still wants to sit in the driver's seat, set the speed, step on the gas, apply the brakes and steer, with 120 million people in the back seat.  In a modern system, the government's role is to give the people as much choice as possible and to keep them well informed so they are capable of making a choice.  It also allows people to buy the best and the cheapest goods from anywhere in the world.  The Japanese government doesn't allow this.  The Ministry of Agriculture and Fishery actually is a ministry for farmers and fishermen instead of a ministry of provisions.  The Ministry of Health and Welfare is a ministry of doctors and pharmaceutical companies rather than an organization dedicated to protecting the health of the people.  The Ministry of Education is nothing but a cartel for licensed teachers, and certainly does not act on behalf of students.  The Ministry of Construction spreads concrete throughout the country and boasts in international conferences that Japan's paved roadway per capita is the longest in the world, but they seldom think of the poor commuters who spend so much time sitting in traffic.  The Ministry of Transportation serves the industry, certainly not the passengers who must pay extraordinarily high prices.  And the Ministry of Foreign Affairs works for itself, supporting Japanese diplomats who sprinkle abundant aid money around the world to ensure that their seat at the dinner table is next to the host's.  This ministry has done nothing to correct the misunderstandings and misperceptions that are at the root of Japan's deteriorating image.  Instead, it seems to be using foreign pressure and even the trade conflict to expand its sphere of influence vis a vis other ministries.  All this illustrates that Japanese ministries still have a "provider" mentality; they do not serve the people, and particularly not consumers.  They serve the industries and the special-interest groups.  The rest of the world accepted such methods when Japan was developing.  Japanese put up with it because the government provided job stability and growing paychecks.  Japan is not a political country.  It is a bureaucratic country.  The Diet plays a minor role compared with the powerful bureaucratic system.  Most bills are drafted by bureaucrats, not politicians.  The Diet doesn't normally even debate bills because the opposition parties are so often opposed to whatever LDP does that it would be a waste of time.  So most bills are passed without full discussion; particularly difficult bills are passed in the absence of the opposition parties.  A recent example is the 3% consumption tax on all commercial activities.  This makes enormous sense in Japan, where direct tax accounts for more than 70% of revenues and the capture rate of direct tax is so unfair.  If you are a salaried man, Amen] 100% captured.  If you are a retailer, 50%, and a farmer, 30%.  To correct this inequality, most people would have favored an indirect tax, like the consumption tax.  But the bill was passed without debate in the Diet, in the absence of the opposition.  As a result, the Japanese people didn't know what to expect when the new law was introduced on April 1.  They were frustrated by the longer queues at the cashier and the small coins given as change.  All of a sudden, prices were no longer in denominations of 100 or 200.  They were 103 or 206.  Pockets exploded with one-yen coins.  While people were jingling their change, the LDP politicians were caught in scandals.  Money, such as in Recruit's political donations, and women, as in the cases of Prime Minister Sosuke Uno and Secretary General Tokuo Yamashita, seldom have caused political scandals in Japan.  Whereas most men were a bit ambivalent about the sex scandals (though they were furious about Recruit), women were upset about both and surged to the polls.  In the recent Upper House and Tokyo metropolitan congressional elections, in which the Socialist Party won a runaway victory, 60% of all women voted, as opposed to the usual 40%.  It is difficult to analyze how much of their anger was due to Recruit, the sex scandals, or the one-yen coins in their purses, but they obviously were voting to punish the LDP.  Taken by surprise, the Socialist Party is busy changing its doctrines.  It's now OK to deal with the U.S., but not the Soviet Union.  Nuclear power plants are acceptable.  The U.S.-Japan Security Treaty can continue, sort of.  And so on.  Against the rapid cosmetic overhaul of the Socialist Party the LDP has been paralyzed.  Now is the time to reform the government from a provider, developing-country vanguard role to that of a modern, industrialized nation in which consumers have the ultimate choice.  If the LDP, as currently composed, can't make the transformation, then it should split into two parties.  One party could stand for consumer interests, small government, free trade and globalism to put Japan clearly among the most developed and open countries.  The other party could continue on the traditional track of the LDP, representing the manufacturers' preference for larger government, control, regulation and protectionism.  The LDP must make a decision immediately; Lower House elections must take place before June.  In the current mood of the Japanese people, journalists and even some industrialists, giving power to the Socialists might be good for the LDP, cleansing it of past sins.  We must not forget, however, that such a humble political experiment could cause a global tidal wave of shocks in real-estate and financial markets.  At the most there is only nine months before the LDP fuse burns out.  ---  Mr. Ohmae is managing director of McKinsey & Co. in Japan.  Early this century, diamond mining in the magnificent dunes where the Namib Desert meets the Atlantic Ocean was a day at the beach.  Men would crawl in the sand looking for shiny stones.  It was as easy as collecting sea shells at Malibu.  Men are still combing the beach with shovels and hand brushes, searching for that unusual glint.  But only after a fleet of 336 gargantuan earthmoving vehicles belonging to De Beers Consolidated Mines Ltd., the world's diamond kingpins, do their work.  Last year, 43 million tons of desert were moved from one dune to another to recover 934,242 carats, which comes to 46 tons of sand per carat, or one-fifth gram.  Oh yes, the Atlantic was also pushed back 300 yards.  "If there's diamonds out there, we'll get to them," says Les Johns, De Beers's engineering manager.  Here, wedged between shifting dunes and pounding waves at the world's most inhospitable diamond dig, lies the earth's most precious jewel box.  Thanks to centuries of polishing by Mother Nature -- first in the gentle current of the Orange River that carried the stones from South Africa's interior, then in the cold surf of the ocean, and finally in the coarse sands of the desert -- 98% of the diamonds uncovered are of gem quality.  While other mines might yield more carats, a higher percentage of them go to industrial use.  Since this treasure chest is too big to fit in a bank vault, it has been turned into one.  Months after railway worker Zacharias Lewala first picked up a diamond from the sand in 1908, the German colonialists who controlled Namibia proclaimed a wide swath of the desert -- about 200 miles north from the Orange River and 60 miles inland from the Atlantic -- a restricted area, a designation normally reserved for military operations.  When the Germans lost World War I, they lost Namibia to South Africa and the diamonds to Ernest Oppenheimer, patriarch of Anglo American Corp. and De Beers.  Today, no one gets in or out of the restricted area without De Beers's stingy approval.  The mining zone has thus remained one of the most desolate places in Africa.  Ghost towns dot the Namib dunes, proving diamonds aren't forever.  Oranjemund, the mine headquarters, is a lonely corporate oasis of 9,000 residents.  Jackals roam the streets at night, and gemsbok, hardy antelope with long straight horns, wander in from the desert to drink from water sprinklers.  On most days, the desert's heat and the cool of the ocean combine to create a mist like a damp rag.  The wind, stinging with sand, never seems to stop.  Still, miners from all parts of Namibia as well as professional staff from De Beers's head offices in South Africa and London keep coming.  And Oranjemund boasts attractions besides diamonds.  There are six video rental shops, three restaurants, one cinema and 34 sports and recreation clubs for everything from cricket to lawn bowling.  The pride of Oranjemund is the 18-hole golf course -- with the largest sand trap in the world.  Last year, when the rising Orange River threatened to swamp the course, the same engineers who are pushing back the Atlantic rushed to build a wall to hold back the flood.  "Nothing is too good for our golf course," says Tony George, a mining engineer.  Despite fears the mine may be partially nationalized by the new Namibian government following next month's elections freeing the country from South African control, De Beers engineers are working to extend the mine's productive life for another 25 years, from the current estimate of 10.  Huge machines that look as though they came from the Star Wars desert-battle scene lumber among the dunes.  Mechanized vacuum cleaners probe the sand like giant anteaters; a whirring ferris wheellike excavator, with buckets instead of seats, chews through layers of compacted sand; tracks and conveyor belts, shuttling sand to the screening plants, criss-cross the beach.  Then there is the artifical sea wall, 600 yards long and 60 yards thick, jutting into the ocean.  Made of sand, it receives around-the-clock maintainence against the battering waves.  When the mining in front of the wall is complete, it is moved northward.  A companion jetty that helps hold back the sea looks like a rusting junkyard.  Engineers first used concrete blocks to bolster the barrier, but the ocean tossed them aside like driftwood.  Then someone decided to try broken-down earthmoving equipment that, inexplicably, held against the waves.  "The Caterpillar people aren't too happy when they see their equipment used like that," shrugs Mr. George.  "They figure it's not a very good advert."  Despite all these innovations, most of the diamonds are still found in the sand swept away by the men wielding shovels and brushes -- the ignominiously named "bedrock sweepers" who toil in the wake of the excavators.  Laboring in blue and gray overalls, they are supposed to concentrate on cleaning out crevices, and not strain their eyes looking for diamonds.  But should they spy one, the company will pay a bonus equal to one-third its value.  For these workers at the bottom of the mine's pay scale, this is usually enough to overcome the temptation to steal -- a crime that could earn them up to 15 years in jail.  Still, employees do occasionally try to smuggle out a gem or two.  One man wrapped several diamonds in the knot of his tie.  Another poked a hole in the heel of his shoe.  A food caterer stashed stones in the false bottom of a milk pail.  None made it past the body searches and X-rays of mine security.  DISASTER STATES aren't jumping to raise taxes for relief and recovery.  Not yet, anyway.  Just after Hurricane Hugo battered South Carolina, some officials talked of perhaps adding a penny to the state gasoline tax or raising property taxes.  Gov. Campbell responded, "They're mentioning rope when there's been a hanging in the family."  A spokesman says the governor believes he can avoid increases by relying on federal aid and shifting funds in state programs.  Still, Hugo's impact may revive unsuccessful proposals to give local governments authority to levy sales taxes.  A spokesman for North Carolina Gov. Martin says Hugo hasn't prompted proposals for state or local increases.  California, where earthquake damage may top $5 billion, plans a special legislative session.  Property-tax relief is likely.  Legislators are talking about temporary rises in sales or gasoline taxes, although Gov. Deukmejian says they should be a last resort.  Needs aren't clear, and the state constitution makes increasing taxes and spending very difficult.  But some legislators think the time may be ripe to revise the constitution.  THE IRS WILL PAY if its error burdens you with bank charges.  Policy statement P-5-39 sets out terms.  As a result of an erroneous IRS levy on a bank account, a taxpayer may incur administrative and overdraft charges.  If the IRS admits its error and the charges have been paid, it will reimburse a taxpayer who hasn't refused to give timely answers to IRS inquiries or hasn't contributed to continuing or compounding the error.  The IRS recently amended the policy to cover stop-payment charges for checks lost by the IRS.  If the IRS asks for and gets a replacement for a check that it concedes it lost in processing, it will reimburse the taxpayer for the stop-payment charge on the original.  Reimbursement claims must be filed with the IRS district or service-center director within a year after the expense accrues.  If the IRS seeks late-payment interest because of the lost check, you should request interest abatement, publisher Prentice Hall notes.  JUST FIVE ACRES MORE are all we need to feel really at home, they say.  A couple we'll call the Blandings spent nearly $800,000 on a 15-acre plot and main home and have an old $175,000 mortgage exempt from the new limit on mortgage-interest deductions.  They plan to expand the home site by buying five adjoining acres for $200,000, borrowed against a first mortgage on the five acres and also collateralized by the 15 acres.  Their debt will be well under the $1 million limit -- on borrowing to acquire, build, or improve a home -- that qualifies for mortgage-interest deductions.  As you can guess, the Blandings want to deduct home-mortgage interest on the $200,000 loan.  But, IRS private ruling 8940061 notes, no rule or court case bears directly on the issue of adding land to a principal residence.  So the IRS has drawn a rationale from the sale of a home site split in two and sold in different years to the same buyer; a court let the seller in that old case treat this as the sale of one residence.  Thus, the IRS says, the Blandings' $200,000 loan is home-acquisition debt, and interest on it is fully deductible.  EARTHQUAKE VICTIMS facing imminent filing and payment deadlines will get extensions and penalty waivers like those provided for Hugo's victims; IRS Notice 89108 has details.  Notice 89-107 offers added relief for hurricane-hit concerns that must file pension and benefit-plan returns.  REPORTS OF PAYMENTS to independent contractors for services must be filed by businesses, but don't bet that contractors' unreported income will be detected that way.  The General Accounting Office estimates that 50% of IRS audits don't spot companies that fail to file the reports.  UH HUH: A claim by Peter Testa of New York that a stranger paid him $500 to go into a bank and change $44,400 in small bills into large bills "is unconvincing," the Tax Court found.  It held that Testa is taxable on $44,400 of unreported income.  WHY BE A MIDDLEMAN for charitable gifts? a retiree asks.  A retired electrical engineer we'll call Ben works part-time as a consultant, but he doesn't want to earn so much that Social Security reduces his benefits.  So he has arranged for a university foundation to set up a scholarship fund for undergraduate engineering students.  He plans to tell clients to pay certain fees directly to the foundation instead of to him; he would omit those fees from income reported on his return.  So he asked the IRS if the plan would work.  Well, notes IRS private ruling 8934014, "a fundamental principle" is that income must be taxed to whoever earns it.  The rule goes back at least as far as a 1930 Supreme Court decision, Robert Willens of Shearson Lehman Hutton says.  If you assign your income to another, you still have controlled its disposition and enjoyed the fruits of your labor, even if indirectly.  Ben earns any fees sent directly to charity and is taxable on them, the IRS says; of course, he also may take a charitable deduction for them.  BRIEFS: Ways and Means veteran Gephardt (D., Mo.) moves to the House Budget Committee; Rep. Cardin (D., Md.) replaces him. . . .  Seattle's license fees for adult peep shows vary from those for other coin-operated amusements without serving a substantial government interest and are unconstitutional, the ninth-circuit appeals court holds for Acorn Investments Inc.  Blue-chip advertisers have plenty of complaints about the magazines they advertise in, ranging from inadequate consumer research to ad "clutter" and a seemingly unchecked proliferation of special interest magazines.  Criticism from such big advertisers as Estee Lauder Inc., Colgate-Palmolive Co. and Seagram Co. put a damper on the euphoria at the American Magazine Conference here.  The conference opened Monday with glowing reports about consumer magazines' growth in circulation and advertising revenue in the past year.  "Magazines are not providing us in-depth information on circulation," said Edgar Bronfman Jr., president and chief operating officer of Seagram, in a panel discussion.  "How do readers feel about the magazine?  How deeply do they read it?  Research doesn't tell us whether people actually do read the magazines they subscribe to."  Reuben Mark, chief executive of Colgate-Palmolive, said advertisers lack detailed demographic and geographic breakdowns of magazines' audiences.  "We need research that convinces us that magazines are a real value in reader's lives, that readers are really involved."  The critics also lambasted the magazine industry for something executives often are very proud of: the growth in magazine titles during the 1980s.  Leonard Lauder, president and chief executive officer of Estee Lauder, said consumer magazines are suffering from what he called "niche-itis,"the increasing number of magazines that target the idosyncratic interests of readers.  "Niche-itis fragments our advertising dollars," said Mr. Lauder.  "We are being over-magazined.  We are constantly faced with deciding which partnerships {with magazines} we can keep."  He added: "There's probably even a magazine for left-handed golfers . . . but the general interest magazine is something we all miss, and it should come back."  Mr. Lauder also attacked what he sees as the wide imitation of Elle, a fashion magazine published by Diamandis Communications Inc., and criticized the practice of stacking ads at the front of magazines.  "Readers don't want to face all those ad pages at the front of a magazine," he said.  Magazine editors did not take the criticisms lying down.  "We spend a fortune on research information," said Steve Burzon, publisher of Meredith Corp.'s Metropolitan Home.  And Tina Brown, editor of Conde Nast Publications Inc.'s Vanity Fair, said advertisers are frequently asked to take advertising positions in the back of her magazine to relieve ad clutter.  "But advertisers wouldn't think of it," she said.  Bernard Leser, president of Conde Nast, added: "Our research shows we sell more of our heavier issues . . . because readers believe they are getting more for what they pay for."  Wall Street securities giant Salomon Inc. posted a big, unexpected earnings gain in the third quarter, buoyed by its securities trading and investment banking activities.  Salomon said net income soared to $177 million, or $1.28 a share, from $65 million, or 38 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue more than doubled to $2.62 billion from $1.29 billion.  A Salomon spokesman said its stock, bond and foreign exchange trading, as well as its investment banking operations, were mostly responsible for the earnings jump.  "The earnings were fine and above expectations," said Michael W. Blumstein, an analyst at First Boston Corp. Nevertheless, Salomon's stock fell $1.125 yesterday to close at $23.25 a share in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  "I suspect October wasn't as good as the third quarter, and they'll have difficulty matching the third quarter in the fourth quarter," Mr. Blumstein said.  But some analysts say Salomon has turned the corner.  "I upgraded the firm to my buy list because I certainly see signs of improvement," says Lawrence Eckenfelder, an analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities.  "The market has been overly harsh to them."  Analysts say investors remain skittish toward Salomon because of its volatile earnings.  In the first quarter, Salomon had a record loss of $28 million on revenue of $1.54 billion.  But in the second quarter, Salomon posted a record $253 million net on revenue of $2.33 billion.  For the real estate industry, a watchword for the 1990s will be buy, more than build.  That's the word expected to be on the lips of the more than 3,000 developers, pension-fund advisers and real estate financiers slated to attend a four-day conference, beginning here today, sponsored by the Urban Land Institute.  The ULI is a non-profit research and education group based in Washington, D.C., with 14,000 members nationwide.  With the market overbuilt, builders are finding limited opportunities and increased risks.  Developers and money managers are looking for bargains among the thousands of financially troubled properties around the country.  Real estate professionals now often bill themselves as "turnaround experts" and "workout specialists."  Conference attendees are expected to be buzzing about the workings of the recently formed Resolution Trust Corp., a federal agency charged with disposing of an estimated $200 billion of real estate dumped in government hands by insolvent savings and loans.  Developers are also eyeing the real estate portfolios of major corporations.  Some plan to pursue foreign development ventures, mostly in Europe.  And other developers may shift from commercial to residential development in the U.S.  "There aren't as many economically viable alternatives for real estate developers in this country as 10 years ago," says Charles Shaw, a Chicago-based real estate developer.  "So developers are saying they will look into distressed properties.  They'll go into someone else's pasture as long as it's greener than the one they're in now."  Developers are also forming more joint ventures with pension funds and insurance companies that can finance big projects.  The builders are more willing to give up some equity and rely on management and consulting fees to stay afloat in the soft market.  "Developers are teaming up with institutions often acting as project managers," says Smedes York, ULI president and president of York Properties Inc., of Raleigh, N.C.  "They are growing more pragmatic about their role."  Real estate firms are also using their alliances with financial institutions to amass acquisition funds.  "Why should you beat your brains out fighting the environmentalists, the neighborhood groups, dealing with traffic mitigation, sewers and fighting city hall, then try to convince a lender to lend you money in an overbuilt market when you can get pension fund money, buy a portfolio, sell off pieces off it and play your own game?" says Jack Rodman, managing partner of the Los Angeles office of Kenneth Leventhal Inc. a national accounting firm.  But experts say that when it comes to distressed properties, finding diamonds in the rough isn't easy.  The level of interest in the RTC's properties has been greater than expected, and has come from larger companies than initially anticipated, says Stan Ross, Leventhal's co-managing partner.  And to succeed in the turnaround business, he says, developers may have to put in a lot of money and time.  Finding pension funds and other sources willing to invest is a high priority.  Quips David Shulman, director of real estate research for Salomon Brothers Inc.: "A theme of the Urban Land conference will be `take a pension fund manager to lunch.'"  Sheraton Corp. and Pan American World Airways announced that they and two Soviet partners will construct two "world-class" hotels within a mile of Red Square in Moscow.  U.S. and Soviet officials hailed the joint project as a new indication of the further thaw in U.S.-Soviet relations.  "This is an outstanding example of how the East and the West can work together for their mutual benefit and progress," said Soviet Ambassador Yuri Dubinin, who hosted a signing ceremony for the venture's partners at the Soviet embassy here.  Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher, who attended the ceremony, called the undertaking a "historic step" in the evolution of U.S.-Soviet ties.  He added that it likely will have a "mulitiplier effect" in stimulating further trade between the two countries.  The project will be the largest U.S.-backed joint venture to be undertaken in the Soviet Union in recent years.  One of the hotels, to be called the Sheraton Moscow, will have 450 rooms and will cost an estimated $75 million to build.  The six-story hotel will be on Gorky Street and initially will cater mostly to business travelers.  It will have a Russian tavern, an English pub, a discotheque and Japanese and Italian restaurants, according to a Sheraton announcement.  The hotel is scheduled to open in 1992.  The second hotel, to be called the Budapest Hotel, is to be constructed at a site even closer to Red Square.  Details about its size and cost haven't yet been determined.  Sheraton, a subsidiary of ITT Corp., will have a 40% share in the two hotels; Pan American, a subsidiary of Pan Am Corp., will have a 10% share.  The Soviet owners will be Mossoviet, Moscow's city governing body, and Aeroflot, the Soviet national airline.  Although a Finnish group has a minority interest in an already operating Moscow hotel, the Sheraton-Pan Am venture will be the first joint-venture hotels in the Soviet Union to have as much as 50% foreign ownership.  U.S. companies account for less than 8% of the 1,000 or more Soviet joint ventures that have been announced since the Soviets began encouraging such undertakings in 1987.  But some U.S. companies are negotiating projects that could be among the biggest ones to be launched.  Chevron Corp., Amoco Corp., Archer-Daniels-Midland Co., and Eastman Kodak Co. are among the U.S. companies known to be considering such ventures.  Sheraton and Pan Am said they are assured under the Soviet joint-venture law that they can repatriate profits from their hotel venture.  The Sheraton Moscow will charge about $140 to $150 a day for each of its rooms, and it will accept payment only in currencies that can be traded in foreign exchange markets, according to a Sheraton executive.  Thomas Plaskett, Pan Am's chairman, said the U.S. airline's participation is a natural outgrowth of its current arrangements with Aeroflot to jointly operate nonstop New York-Moscow flights.  He said the rising volume of passenger traffic on this route justifies a major investment in new high-standard Moscow hotels.  David Shaffer was named to the new post of executive vice president of the Maxwell Macmillan group of this communications giant.  Mr. Shaffer takes primary responsibility for the electronic and technical-services group.  He had been group vice president of the electronic-publishing group.  Also, Sheldon Aboff, formerly a vice president at Maxwell, was named group vice president with responsibility for various electronic and publishing-group companies.  Soichiro Honda's picture now hangs with Henry Ford's in the U.S. Automotive Hall of Fame, and the game-show "Jeopardy" is soon to be Sony-owned.  But no matter how much Japan gets under our skin, we'll still have mom and apple pie.  On second thought, make that just mom.  A Japanese apple called the Fuji is cropping up in orchards the way Hondas did on U.S. roads.  By 1995 it will be planted more often than any other apple tree, according to a recent survey of six apple-industry sages by Washington State University horticulturist Robert Norton.  Some fruit visionaries say the Fuji could someday tumble the Red Delicious from the top of America's apple heap.  It certainly won't get there on looks.  Compared to the Red Delicious, the exemplar of apple pulchritude, the Fuji is decidedly more dowdy -- generally smaller, less-perfectly shaped, greenish, with tinges of red.  To hear most U.S. growers tell it, we'd still be in Paradise if the serpent had proffered one to Eve.  But how sweet it is.  It has more sugar "than any apple we've ever tested," says Duane Greene, a University of Massachusetts pomologist, or apple scholar.  It has a long shelf life and "doesn't fool the public," says Grady Auvil, an Orondo, Wash., grower who is planting Fujis and spreading the good word about them.  "It doesn't look nice on the outside while getting mealy inside."  Mr. Auvil, razor sharp at 83, has picked and packed a zillion pecks of apples over the past 65 years.  He is known as the father of the U.S.-grown Granny Smith, a radically different apple that the conventional wisdom once said would never catch on.  It did, shaking the apple establishment to its roots.  Now, even more radical changes seem afoot as the grand old maverick of American apples plays the role of Hiroshi Appleseed.  "The Fuji is going to be No. 1 to replace the Red Delicious," he says.  The Delicious hegemony won't end anytime soon.  New apple trees grow slowly, and the Red Delicious is almost as entrenched as mom.  Its roots are patriotic -- with the first trees appearing in 1872 in an orchard near Peru, Iowa, to be exact.  For more than 50 years, it has been the apple of our eye.  A good Delicious can indeed be delicious.  More than twice as many Red Delicious apples are grown as the Golden variety, America's No. 2 apple.  But the apple industry is ripe for change.  "Red Delicious has been overplanted, and its prices have dropped below the cost of production," says Washington State's Mr. Norton.  The scare over Alar, a growth regulator that makes apples redder and crunchier but may be carcinogenic, made consumers shy away from the Delicious, though they were less affected than the McIntosh.  The glut and consequent lower prices, combined with cancer fears, was a very serious blow to growers.  "A lot of growers won't be around in a few years," says Mr. Norton, although they have stopped using Alar.  One may be William Broderick, a Sterling, Mass., grower.  "This is beautiful stuff," he says, looking ruefully at big boxes of just-picked Red Delicious next to his barn.  "But I'm going to lose $50,000 to $60,000 on it.  I'm going to have to get another job this year just to eat."  Besides rotten prices, he has been hit recently by hail, a bark-nibbling horde of mice, fungi and bugs.  Some 500 insects and 150 diseases wiggle, chew and romp through growers' nightmares, including maggots, mites, mildew, thrips, black rot and the flat-headed borer.  Even if a grower beats them back, his $2,000 rented bees might buzz off to the neighbors' orchards instead of pollinating his, Mr. Broderick says.  Though growers can't always keep the worm from the apple, they can protect themselves against the price vagaries of any one variety by diversifying -- into the recently imported Gala, a sweet New Zealand native; the Esopus Spitzenburg, reportedly Thomas Jefferson's favorite apple; disease-resistant kinds like the Liberty.  "I've ripped out a lot of Delicious" and grafted the trees with many different shoots, says Steve Wood, a West Lebanon, N.H., grower, tramping through his 100-acre Poverty Lane Orchard on a crisp autumn day recently.  "I've got 70 kinds of apples.  Here's a Waltana," he exclaims, picking one off a tree.  He bites it, scowls and throws it down.  "It's a real dog."  Supermarkets are getting into the variety act, too.  They still buy apples mainly for big, red good looks -- that's why so many taste like woodchucks' punching bags.  But freshness counts more than it once did, and stores are expanding shelf space for unconventional, but tastier, and often pricier, apples.  "Rather than sell 39-cents-a-pound Delicious, maybe we can sell 79-cents-a-pound Fujis," says Chuck Tryon, perishables director for Super Valu Inc., a Minneapolis supermarket chain and food distributor.  The Fuji is a product of meticulous Japanese pomological engineering, which fostered it 50 years ago at a government research orchard.  Japanese researchers have bred dozens of strains of Fujis to hone its color, taste and shelf life.  Now the best of them age as gracefully as Grannies, the industry's gold standard for storability.  In the cornucopia of go-go apples, the Fuji's track record stands out: During the past 15 years, it has gone from almost zilch to some 50% of Japan's market.  "The Japanese apple market is very keyed to high quality," says David Lane, a scientist at a Canadian horticulture research center in Summerland, British Columbia, and so apples are more of a delicacy there than a big food commodity.  The U.S. Department of Agriculture estimates that this year Americans will eat about 40% more fresh apples per capita than the Japanese.  The Fuji is still small potatoes in the U.S., sold mainly in fruit boutiques.  But in California, says Craig Ito, a Fuji-apple grower, "There's a Fuji apple cult.  Once somebody eats one, they get hooked."  Mr. Auvil, the Washington grower, says that he could sell Fujis to Taiwan buyers at $40 a box if he had them. (Taiwan already is a big importer of Fujis from other places, he adds.) But his first crop won't be picked till next year.  "I expect to see the demand exceed supply for Fujis for the next 10 to 15 years," he adds.  Washington Red Delicious, by the way, are wholesaling for less than $10 a box these days.  Mr. Auvil sees Fujis, in part, as striking a blow against the perversion of U.S. apples by supermarkets.  "When the chain stores took over, there was no longer a connection between grower and consumer.  A guy is sitting up in an office deciding what you're going to eat."  After all, until the 1950s even the Red Delicious was a firm, delectable morsel.  Then, as growers bred them more for looks, and to satisfy supermarket chains' demands of long-term storage, the Red went into decline.  Now, those red applelike things stores sell in summer are fruitbowl lovely, but usually not good eating.  They do deserve respect, however -- they are almost a year old, probably equal to about 106 in human years.  The Fuji, to be sure, has blemishes too.  It ripens later than most apples, and growing it in U.S. areas with chilly autumns may be tricky.  Moreover, the frumpy Fuji must compete with an increasingly dolledup Delicious.  Mr. Broderick, the Massachusetts grower, says the "big boss" at a supermarket chain even rejected his Red Delicious recently because they weren't waxed and brushed for extra shine.  And he hadn't used hormones, which many growers employ to elongate their Delicious apples for greater eye appeal.  Still, Mr. Auvil points out, Grannies became popular without big, red looks, so why not Fujis?  He sees a shift in American values -- at least regarding apples -- toward more emphasis on substance and less on glitz.  "Taste has finally come to the fore," he says.  Or, for that matter, the core.  Brush Wellman Inc. said its board increased the number of shares of common stock to be purchased under a previously authorized program to 3.9 million from 2.9 million.  The maker of engineered materials has acquired more than 2.7 million shares under the program.  The state attorney general's office filed suit against five New York brokerage firms, charging them with responsibility for much of a $200 million loss incurred by the state treasurer's office in 1987.  The suit sets the firms' liability at more than $185 million.  The firms are Morgan Stanley & Co., Salomon Brothers Inc., County Natwest Government Securities Inc., Greenwich Capital Markets Inc. and Goldman, Sachs & Co.  The firms have all said that West Virginia's suit is without merit.  On Friday, the firms filed a suit against West Virginia in New York state court asking for a declaratory judgment absolving them of liability.  That suit is pending.  The suits relate to a $200 million loss, disclosed in December, that was suffered by West Virginia's consolidated investment pool.  The pool invested idle cash for many state agencies and local governments.  In its suit, the attorney general's office alleges that brokers encouraged members of the treasurer's office to engage in high-volume, high-risk transactions that benefited the brokers.  Few people are aware that the federal government lends almost as much money as it borrows.  From 1980 to 1988, while federal budget deficits totaled $1.41 trillion, the government issued $394 billion of new direct loans and an additional $756 billion of new primary loan guarantees.  These figures omit secondary guarantees, deposit insurance, and the activities of Government-Sponsored Enterprises (a huge concern in its own right, as detailed on this page May 3).  Federal credit programs date back to the New Deal, and were meant to break even financially.  Since the 1950s, federal lending has experienced extraordinary growth in credit volume, subsidy rates, and policy applications, spurred on by the growth of government in general and budget gimmicks and deceptive management in particular.  As we will see, many of these obligations don't show up as part of the federal deficit.  But recent events indicate that federal credit is out of control.  Student loan defaults remain high at about 12%, and the program has been rocked by allegations of fraud and mismanagement.  Farmers Home Administration (FmHA) loans have turned into de facto giveaway programs; losses over the next three years are expected to exceed $20 billion.  Defaults on Veterans Affairs loan guarantees have quadrupled in the past eight years.  Last month, the General Accounting Office reported that defaults in Federal Housing Administration guarantees were five times as high as previously estimated, and that FHA's equity fell to minus $2.9 billion.  GAO's findings are particularly troubling because the FHA has about $300 billion in obligations outstanding and had previously been considered one of the most financially secure credit programs.  Scores of other credit programs, subsidizing agriculture, small business, exporters, defense, energy, transportation and others, are less visible but in no better shape.  If the programs continue their present path, the potential government losses are staggering: The federal government holds $222 billion in direct loans outstanding and backs an additional $550 billion in primary guarantees. (Secondary guarantees of pools of FHA- and VA-backed loans by the agency known as Ginnie Mae currently exceed $330 billion.)  Although external events have contributed to the morass, the principal causes of the current crisis are internal and generic to all programs.  To reduce the risks while still retaining the legitimate benefits these programs can provide, credit policy must:  1.  Use credit to improve the operation of capital markets, not to provide subsidies.  There is a fundamental conflict between providing a subsidy and maintaining the integrity of a credit program.  If the program is meant to provide a subsidy, collecting the debt defeats the original goal.  Thus, subsidized loans tend to turn into giveaway programs, with increasing subsidy and default rates over time.  To avoid this problem, government should issue credit only if it intends to use every legal method to collect.  In contrast, credit programs can be appropriate tools to improve the operation of capital markets.  For example, legal restrictions on interstate banking once inhibited the supply of credit to the agricultural sector.  Farm lending was enacted to correct this problem by providing a reliable flow of lendable funds.  However, this in no way justifies the huge government subsidies and losses on such loans.  Credit policy should separate these two competing objectives and eliminate aspects that provide the subsidy.  For example, student loans currently attempt to subsidize college attendance and mitigate problems created by the fact that students' future earnings are not accepted as collateral.  The program provides highly subsidized loans to any student whose family earns less than a particular amount.  High default rates, a low interest rate, and government coverage of all interest costs while the student is in school make program costs extremely high.  Families that do not need the loan can make money simply by putting the loan in the bank and paying it back when the student graduates.  In contrast, a student loan program that was meant solely to correct capital-market imperfections would allow loans for any student, regardless of family income, at market or near-market rates.  While the student was in school, interest costs would either be paid by the student or added to the loan balance.  This program, combined with cash grants to needy students, would reduce program costs and much more effectively target the intended beneficiaries.  2.  Provide better incentives.  Given the structure of most credit programs, it is surprising that default rates are not even higher.  Guarantee rates are typically 100%, giving lenders little reason to screen customers carefully.  Reducing those rates moderately (say, to 75%) would still provide substantial assistance to borrowers.  But it would also encourage lenders to choose more creditworthy customers, and go a long way toward reducing defaults.  For example, the Small Business Administration has had reasonable success in reducing both guarantee rates and default rates in its Preferred Lenders' Program.  Borrowers' incentives are equally skewed.  Since the government has a dismal record of collecting bad debts, the costs to the borrower of defaulting are usually low.  In addition, it is often possible to obtain a new government loan even if existing debts are not paid off.  Simple policy prescriptions in this case would be to improve debt collection (taking the gloves off contracted collection agencies) and to deny new credit to defaulters.  These provisions would be difficult to enforce for a program intended to provide a subsidy, but would be reasonable and effective devices for programs that attempt to offset market imperfections.  3.  Record the true costs of credit programs in the federal budget.  Since the budget measures cash flow, a new $1 direct loan is treated as a $1 expenditure, even though at least part of the loan will be paid back.  Loan guarantees don't appear at all until the borrower defaults, so new guarantees do not raise the deficit, even though they create future liabilities for the government.  By converting an expenditure or loan to a guarantee, the government can ensure the same flow of resources and reduce the current deficit.  Predictably, guarantees outstanding have risen by $130 billion since 1985, while direct loans outstanding have fallen by $30 billion.  The true budgetary cost of a credit subsidy is the discounted value of the net costs to government.  This figure could be estimated using techniques employed by private lenders to forecast losses, or determined by selling loans to private owners (without federal guarantees).  Neither technique is perfect, but both are better than the current system, which misstates the costs of new credit programs by amounts that vary substantially and average about $20 billion annually, according to the Congressional Budget Office.  A budget that reflected the real costs of lending would eliminate incentives to convert spending or lending programs to guarantees and would let taxpayers know what Congress is committing them to.  4.  Impose standard accounting and administrative practices.  Creative accounting is a hallmark of federal credit.  Many agencies roll over their debt, paying off delinquent loans by issuing new loans, or converting defaulted loan guarantees into direct loans.  In any case, they avoid having to write off the loans.  Some agencies simply keep bad loans on the books; as late as 1987, the Export-Import Bank held in its portfolio at face value loans made to Cuba in the 1950s.  More seriously, FmHA has carried several billion dollars of defaulted loans at face value.  Until GAO's recent audit, FHA books had not been subject to a complete external audit in 15 years.  The administration of federal credit should closely parallel private lending practices, including the development of a loan loss reserve and regular outside audits.  Establishing these practices would permit earlier identification of emerging financial crises, provide better information for loan sales and budgeting decisions, and reduce fraud.  Government lending was not intended to be a way to obfuscate spending figures, hide fraudulent activity, or provide large subsidies.  The reforms described above would provide a more limited, but clearer, safer and ultimately more useful role for government as a lender.  Without such reforms, credit programs will continue to be a large-scale, high-risk proposition for taxpayers.  ---  Mr. Gale is an assistant professor of economics at UCLA.  @ ---  @ Where the Lending Goes  @ Major components, in billions of dollars  @ Outstanding Direct Loans  @ Farmers Home Admin. $57.8  @ Rural Electification 35.8  @ Foreign Military Sales 24.0  @ Commodity Credit Corp. 23.6  @ Agency for Int'l Development 12.9  @ Export-Import Bank 9.9  @ Outstanding Guarantees  @ Federal Housing Admin. $300.8  @ Veterans Administration 149.7  @ Guaranteed Student Loans 47.6  @ Source: Budget of the United States  Malcolm S. Todt was named vice president and senior officer in charge of equipment leasing to municipalities, a new effort of this bond insurer.  Mr. Todt had been vice president and treasurer of Insilco Corp.  President Bush is considering casting a line-item veto as a test to determine whether the courts will rule that he has such authority.  Mr. Bush has long campaigned for passage of a bill or a constitutional amendment that would explicitly give him a line-item veto, which would enable him to kill individual items in a big spending bill without having to kill the entire bill.  He has argued that such presidential power is necessary to rein in congressional spending.  But some analysts, particularly conservative legal scholars, have urged Mr. Bush not to wait for explicit authorization but simply to assert that the Constitution already implicitly gives him the power to exercise a line-item veto.  Such an assertion most likely would bring about a court challenge from Congress that would clarify whether a president already has such power.  White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater, confirming comments made this week by Vice President Dan Quayle, said Mr. Bush is "interested" in finding a suitable test case.  But he also said that exercising a test line-item veto isn't a "top initiative" on the president's agenda because he faces more-pressing budget issues at the moment.  Harris Ravine, executive vice president of customer satisfaction, was named executive vice president, finance and administration of this maker of data storage equipment.  Mr. Ravine succeeds William R. Mansfield Jr., who will remain with the company until the end of the year to support the transition and to complete important projects.  The Bush administration said it is submitting a "comprehensive" proposal for overhauling agricultural trade that could help break an impasse in the current round of multilateral trade negotiations.  The proposal reiterates the U.S. desire to scrap or reduce a host of trade-distorting subsidies on farm products.  But it would allow considerable flexibility in determining how and when these goals would be achieved.  The U.S. plan also would ease the transition to freer agriculture trade by allowing some countries to convert non-tariff barriers into tariffs that, together with existing tariffs, then would be phased out over 10 years.  Trade Representative Carla Hills, who along with Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter unveiled the proposal, said she is confident it will gain considerable support from the U.S.'s trading partners.  Mr. Yeutter, seeking to allay European objections to an earlier U.S. plan that called for eliminating all farm-trade barriers by the year 2000, said the new U.S. proposal wouldn't "put farmers out of business" but would only encourage them to "grow what the markets desire instead of what the government wants."  The U.S. is submitting the proposal today in Geneva, hoping that the initiative will spur members of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade to reach agreement on new trade rules before their current negotiating round concludes in December 1990.  Another U.S. proposal filed Monday urges more "fair play" in services trade, including predictable and clear rules and equality in the treatment of foreign and domestic service companies.  Unlike the earlier U.S. farm-trade proposal which struck European countries as too extreme, the latest plan would provide some room for maneuver.  For instance, the new U.S. package makes clear there would be a transition period during which GATT members could use a combination of tariffs and quotas to cushion their farmers from foreign competition.  It also says countries could temporarily raise tariffs on certain products if they experience an unusually heavy volume of imports.  Instead of proposing a complete elimination of farm subsidies, as the earlier U.S. proposal did, the new package calls for the elimination of only the most tradedistorting ones.  Less objectionable ones would be subject only to some restraints, and others with a "relatively minor trade impact" would be allowed to continue under certain conditions.  The new U.S. plan also would establish procedures to prevent countries from using health and sanitation rules to impede trade arbitrarily.  The goal would be to resolve disputes such as one prompted by the European Community's current attempt to bar imports of beef from hormone-treated U.S. cattle.  The U.S. contends that the rules aren't justified on health grounds.  To encourage more competition among exporting countries, the U.S. is proposing that export subsidies, including tax incentives for exporters, be phased out in five years.  Procter & Gamble Co., helped by a gain from a lawsuit settlement and continued growth overseas, posted a 38% rise in fiscal first-quarter net income.  Net for the quarter ended Sept. 30 climbed to $551 million, or $1.66 a share, from $400 million, or $1.18 a share, a year earlier.  Per-share figures have been adjusted for a 2-for-1 stock split effective Oct. 20.  Sales increased 6% to $5.58 billion from $5.27 billion.  Earnings at the consumer-products giant were boosted by a gain of $125 million, or about 25 cents a share, stemming from last month's settlement of litigation with three of P&G's competitors over patents on P&G's Duncan Hines cookies.  Excluding the gain, P&G's earnings were close to analysts' predictions of about $1.40 a share for the quarter.  Wall Street had expected a modest rise in the company's domestic sales and earnings, and more substantial increases in overseas results.  One factor helping sales and earnings was a 3% price rise for most P&G products, except coffee, analysts said.  Unit volume, or amount of products shipped, rose about 11% in the international segment, with P&G continuing to win market share in Japan's diaper and detergent markets.  Jay Freedman, analyst with Kidder, Peabody & Co., said P&G's Always sanitary napkin, sold under the Whisper name in Japan, has firmly established itself as a leading brand.  He figures P&G will expand its personal-care product line in Japan to "continue that momentum."  P&G's U.S. shipments were up just 1%, partly because the company decided to shift more promotions and sales for health and beauty products to the fiscal second quarter.  Hugh Zurkuhlen, analyst with Salomon Bros., predicts the shift will mean P&G's sales growth in the second quarter will be "in the double digits."  Also slowing growth in the U.S. were lackluster results for P&G's cooking oils, which had a strong year-earlier first quarter.  Last year's drought in the Midwest prompted retailers to stock up on oils ahead of anticipated price increases, boosting sales for Crisco and Puritan oils, analysts said.  For fiscal 1990, analysts expect P&G's sales to continue to grow, with earnings climbing between 15% and 20%.  Lynne Hyman, vice president of equity research for First Boston Corp., expects P&G to post net of about $4.20 a share, on a post-split basis.  "But I'm recognizing there's a good chance they'll do a bit better than that," she says.  In fiscal 1989, P&G earned $3.56 a share, adjusted for the stock split.  One big factor affecting the fiscal second half will be the new stewardship of Edwin L. Artzt, who becomes chairman and chief executive officer in January.  Because of his remarkable success turning around P&G's international operations, analysts have high hopes for his tenure.  "If he does to the domestic operations what he did internationally," says Mr. Zurkuhlen, "this company will earn $6 or $7 a share in a few years."  The Voting Rights Act of 1965 was enacted to keep the promise of the Fifteenth Amendment and enable Southern blacks to go to the polls, unhindered by literacy tests and other exclusionary devices.  Twenty-five years later, the Voting Rights Act has been transformed by the courts and the Justice Department into a program of racial gerrymandering designed to increase the number of blacks and other minorities -- Hispanics, Asians and native Americans -- holding elective office.  In the 1980s, the Justice Department and lower federal courts that enforce the Voting Rights Act have required state legislatures and municipal governments to create the maximum number of "safe" minority election districts -- districts where minorities form between 65% and 80% of the voting population.  The program has even been called upon to create "safe" white electoral districts in municipalities where whites are the minority.  Although Section 2 of the act expressly disclaims requiring that minorities win a proportional share of elective offices, few municipal and state government plans achieve preclearance by the Justice Department or survive the scrutiny of the lower federal courts unless they carve out as many solidly minority districts as possible.  The new goal of the Voting Rights Act -- more minorities in political office -- is laudable.  For the political process to work, all citizens, regardless of race, must feel represented.  One essential indicator that they are is that members of minority groups get elected to public office with reasonable frequency.  As is, blacks constitute 12% of the population, but fewer than 2% of elected leaders.  But racial gerrymandering is not the best way to accomplish that essential goal.  It is a quick fix for a complex problem.  Far from promoting a commonality of interests among black, white, Hispanic and other minority voters, drawing the district lines according to race suggests that race is the voter's and the candidate's most important trait.  Such a policy implies that only a black politician can speak for a black person, and that only a white politician can govern on behalf of a white one.  Examples of the divisive effects of racial gerrymandering can be seen in two cities -- New York and Birmingham, Ala.  When they reapportion their districts after the 1990 census, every other municipality and state in the country will face this issue.  New York City: Racial gerrymandering has been a familiar policy in New York City since 1970, when Congress first amended the Voting Rights Act to expand its reach beyond the Southern states.  In 1972, the Justice Department required that the electoral map in the borough of Brooklyn be redrawn to concentrate black and Hispanic votes, despite protests that the new electoral boundaries would split a neighborhood of Hasidic Jews into two different districts.  This year, a commission appointed by the mayor to revise New York's system of government completed a new charter, expanding the City Council to 51 from 35 members.  Sometime in 1991, as soon as the 1990 census becomes available, a redistricting panel will redraw the City Council district lines.  The Charter Revision Commission has made it clear that in response to the expectations of the Justice Department and the commission's own commitment to enhancing minority political leadership, the new district lines will be drawn to maximize the number of solidly minority districts.  Blacks and Hispanics currently make up 38% of the city's population and hold only 25% of the seats on the council.  Several of the city's black leaders, including Democratic mayoral nominee David Dinkins, have spoken out for racial gerrymandering to accord blacks and Hispanics "the fullest opportunity for representation."  In this connection, it is important to note that several members of New York's sitting City Council represent heterogeneous districts that bring together sizable black, Hispanic, and non-Hispanic white populations -- Carolyn Maloney's 8th district in northern Manhattan and the south Bronx and Susan Alter's 25th district in Brooklyn, for example.  To win their seats on the council, these political leaders have had to listen to all the voices in their district and devise public policies that would benefit all.  Often they have found that the relevant issue is not race, but rather housing, crime prevention or education.  Birmingham, Ala.: The unusual situation in Birmingham vividly illustrates the divisive consequences of carving out safe districts for racial minorities.  In Birmingham, which is 57% black, whites are the minority.  Insisting that they are protected by the Voting Rights Act, a group of whites brought a federal suit in 1987 to demand that the city abandon at-large voting for the nine member City Council and create nine electoral districts, including four safe white districts.  The white group argued that whites were not fully and fairly represented, because in city-wide elections only black candidates or white candidates who catered to "black interests" could win.  No federal court has ruled that the Voting Rights Act protects a white minority, but in June the Justice Department approved a districting plan for Birmingham that carves out three white-majority districts and six black-majority districts.  Richard Arrington, Birmingham's black mayor, lamented the consequences.  "In the past, people who had to run for office had to moderate their views because they couldn't afford to offend blacks or whites," he said.  "Now you go to districts, you're likely to get candidates whose views are more extreme, white and black, on racial issues."  Two hundred years ago, critics of the new United States Constitution warned that the electoral districts for Congress were too large and encompassed too many different economic interests.  A small farmer and a seaport merchant could not be represented by the same spokesman, they said.  But James Madison refuted that argument in one of the most celebrated political treatises ever written, No. 10 of the Federalist Papers.  Madison explained that a representative's duty was to speak not for the narrow interests of one group but instead for the common good.  Large, heterogeneous election districts would encourage good government, said Madison, because a representative would be compelled to serve the interests of all his constituents and be servile to none.  Madison's noble and unifying vision of the representative still can guide us.  As long as we believe that all Americans, of every race and ethnic background, have common interests and can live together cooperatively, our political map should reflect our belief.  Racial gerrymandering -- creating separate black and white districts -- says that we have discarded that belief in our ability to live together and govern ourselves as one people.  ---  Ms. McCaughey is a constitutional scholar at the Center for the Study of the Presidency in New York.  The Justice Department has distributed these new guidelines for U.S. Attorneys prosecuting RICO cases.  A related editorial appears today.  Under {RICO}, the government may seek a temporary restraining order (TRO) upon the filing of a RICO indictment, in order to preserve all forfeitable assets until the trial is completed and judgment entered.  Such orders can have a wide-ranging impact on third parties who do business with the defendants, including clients, vendors, banks, investors, creditors, dependents, and others.  Some highly publicized cases involving RICO TROs have been the subject of considerable criticism in the press, because of a perception that pre-trial freezing of assets is tantamount to a seizure of property without due process.  In order to ensure that the rights of all interested parties are protected, the Criminal Division has instituted the following requirements to control the use of TROs in RICO prosecutions. (It should be noted that these requirements are in addition to any other existing requirements, such as review by the Asset Forfeiture Office.):  1.  As part of the approval process for RICO prosecutions, the prosecutor must submit any proposed forfeiture TRO for review by the Organized Crime and Racketeering Section.  The prosecutor must show that less-intrusive remedies (such as bonds) are not likely to preserve the assets for forfeiture in the event of a conviction.  2.  In seeking approval of a TRO, the prosecutor must articulate any anticipated impact that forfeiture and the TRO would have on innocent third parties, balanced against the government's need to preserve the assets.  3.  In deciding whether forfeiture (and, hence, a TRO) is appropriate, the Section will consider the nature and severity of the offense; the government's policy is not to seek the fullest forfeiture permissible under the law where that forfeiture would be disproportionate to the defendant's crime.  4.  When a RICO TRO is being sought, the prosecutor is required, at the earliest appropriate time, to state publicly that the government's request for a TRO, and eventual forfeiture, is made in full recognition of the rights of third parties -- that is, in requesting the TRO, the government will not seek to disrupt the normal, legitimate business activities of the defendant; will not seek through use of the relation-back doctrine to take from third parties assets legitimately transferred to them; will not seek to vitiate legitimate business transactions occurring between the defendant and third parties; and will, in all other respects, assist the court in ensuring that the rights of third parties are protected, through proceeding under {RICO} and otherwise.  The Division expects that the prosecutor will announce these principles either at the time the indictment is returned or, at the latest, at the first proceeding before the court concerning the TRO.  Sales of North American-built cars and trucks plunged 20.5% in mid-October from a year earlier, as domestic manufacturers paid the price for heavy incentives earlier this year.  "People are waiting for {new} factory giveaways," said Ben Kaye, sales manager of Bob Brest Auto World in Lynn, Mass., whose sales are slow.  This trend appears to be especially true at General Motors Corp., which used both dealer and consumer incentives to ignite sales in August and September.  Since then, deliveries have slumped.  GM's car sales dropped 24.8% in mid-October to 69,980, while truck sales fell 26% to 37,860.  GM also had dismal results in the first 10 days of the month, while other auto makers reported mixed results.  All of the Big Three suffered in the just-ended period, however, with sales of all domestically made cars, including those built at Japanese-managed plants, falling 19% to 158,863 from a year earlier.  The seasonal adjusted annual selling rate was six million vehicles, a small improvement from the 5.8 million rate of early October, but a big drop from the 7.1 million rate a year ago.  Sales of domestically made trucks also continued to be sluggish in mid-October, dropping 22.8% to 94,543 from a year ago.  The Big Three auto makers already have slashed fourth-quarter production plans 10.4% below year-ago levels, but that may not be enough to prevent inventories from ballooning if sales don't improve.  Industry analyst John H. Qualls, a vice president with Hill & Knowlton in St. Louis, forecasts that domestic auto makers will have a 93-day supply of cars at the end of the year, even if car sales improve to a 6.5 million vehicle rate for the quarter.  Ford Motor Co. reported a 21.2% drop in sales of domestic-made cars to 46,995 and a 24.2% drop in domestic trucks to 31,143.  The sales are being dragged down by a glut of 1989 vehicles, said Joel Pitcoff, a Ford analyst.  The earlier use of incentives depleted the market of "scavengers" for bargain-basement 1989 cars, he said.  Town & Country Ford in Charlotte, N.C., still needs to move about 850 1989 cars and trucks.  Business had been fairly strong until Hurricane Hugo hit the area, but has been down since.  Chrysler Corp. also hit the rocks in mid-October.  The No. 3 U.S. auto maker had a 23.7% plunge in car sales to 22,336 and a 17.5% drop in truck sales to 22,925, which include its minivans and Jeeps.  Honda Motor Co., which continues to have short supplies of domestically made Accords, saw its sales of North American-built cars fall 14.1% to 8,355.  But sales of domestic cars and trucks at Nissan Motor Corp. rose 26.1% to 5,651.  A Nissan spokesman attributed the increase to the use of incentives this year and not a year ago and to higher fleet sales.  Toyota Motor Corp., which opened a plant in Georgetown, Ky., last year, saw sales triple to 6,256 vehicles.  Short interest in Nasdaq over-the-counter stocks rose 6% as of mid-October, its biggest jump since 6.3% last April.  The most recent OTC short interest statistics were compiled Oct. 13, the day the Nasdaq composite index slid 3% and the New York Stock Exchange tumbled 7%.  The coincidence might lead to the conclusion that short-sellers bet heavily on that day that OTC stocks would decline further.  As it happens, the Nasdaq composite did continue to fall for two days after the initial plunge.  However, the short interest figures reported by brokerage and securities clearing firms to the National Association of Securities Dealers include only those trades completed, or settled, by Oct. 13, rather than trades that occurred on that day, according to Gene Finn, chief economist for the NASD. Generally, it takes five business days to transfer stock and to take the other steps necessary to settle a trade.  The total short interest in Nasdaq stocks as of mid-October was 237.1 million shares, up from 223.7 million in September but well below the record level of 279 million shares established in July 1987.  The sharp rise in OTC short interest compares with the 4.2% decline in short interest on the New York Stock Exchange and the 3% rise on the American Stock Exchange during the September-October period.  Generally, a short seller expects a fall in a stock's price and aims to profit by selling borrowed shares that are to be replaced later; the short seller hopes the replacement shares bought later will cost less than those that were sold.  Short interest, which represents the number of shares borrowed and sold, but not yet replaced, can be a bad-expectations barometer for many stocks.  Among 2,412 of the largest OTC issues, short interest rose to 196.8 million shares, from 185.7 million in 2,379 stocks in September.  Big stocks with large short interest gains as of Oct. 13 included First Executive, Intel, Campeau and LIN Broadcasting.  Short interest in First Executive, an insurance issue, rose 55% to 3.8 million.  Intel's short interest jumped 42%, while Campeau's increased 62%.  Intel makes semiconductors and Campeau operates department-store chains and is strained for cash.  Meritor Savings again had the dubious honor of being the OTC stock with the biggest short interest position on Nasdaq.  Meritor has headed the list since May.  First Executive and troubled Valley National Corp. of Arizona were next in line.  Short selling isn't necessarily bad for the overall market.  Shorted shares must eventually be replaced through buying.  In addition, changes in short interest in some stocks may be caused by arbitrage.  For example, an investor may seek to profit during some takeover situations by buying stock in one company involved and shorting the stock of the other.  Two big stocks involved in takeover activity saw their short interest surge.  Short interest in the American depositary receipts of Jaguar, the target of both Ford Motor and General Motors, more than doubled.  Nasdaq stocks that showed a drop in short interest included Adobe Systems, Class A shares of Tele-Communications and takeover targets Lyphomed and Jerrico.  The NASD, which operates the Nasdaq computer system on which 5,200 OTC issues trade, compiles short interest data in two categories: the approximately two-thirds, and generally biggest, Nasdaq stocks that trade on the National Market System; and the one-third, and generally smaller, Nasdaq stocks that aren't a part of the system.  Short interest in 1,327 non-NMS securities totaled 40.3 million shares, compared with almost 38 million shares in 1,310 issues in September.  The October short interest represents 1.04 days of average daily trading volume in the smaller stocks in the system for the reporting period, compared with 0.94 day a month ago.  Among bigger OTC stocks, the figures represent 2.05 days of average daily volume, compared with 2.14 days in September.  The adjacent tables show the issues in which a short interest position of at least 50,000 shares existed as of Oct. 13 or in which there was a short position change of at least 25,000 shares since Sept. 15 (see accompanying tables -- WSJ Oct. 25, 1989).  From the Sept. 30-Oct. 4 issue of The Economist:  What defeated General Aoun was not only the weight of the Syrian army.  The weight of Lebanon's history was also against him; and it is a history Israel is in danger of repeating.  Like Lebanon, and however unfairly, Israel is regarded by the Arab world as a colonial aberration.  Its best hope of acceptance by its neighbours lies in reaching a settlement with the Palestinians.  Like Lebanon, Israel is being remade by demography.  In Greater Israel more than half the children under six are Muslims.  Within 25 years Jews will probably be the minority.  Yet Israel will neither share power with all these Arabs nor, says its present prime minister, redraw its borders closer to its pre-1967 Jewish heartland.  By not choosing one of these options, Israelis will condemn themselves, as the Maronites did, to perpetual war with the Muslims in their midst, and so to the internal erosion of their state.  Unlike the Maronites, Israel's Jews will not let themselves become the weakest force in a system of private armies; Jerusalem will become Belfast before it becomes Beirut.  But that is not much of a consolation to draw from the failure of General Aoun.  The Nasdaq over-the-counter market didn't fully recover from a selling stampede, and closed down 1.2%.  The effects on the market of the mostly computer-driven sell-off among exchange-listed stocks irked many market makers, who watched the Nasdaq Composite Index tumble in sympathy with the Dow Jones Industrial Average, and then saw it get left behind in the subsequent rally.  After plummeting 1.8% at one point during the day, the composite rebounded a little, but finished down 5.52, at 461.70.  In contrast, the industrial average recovered almost completely from its skid and closed down 0.1%.  The New York Stock Exchange Composite was 0.4% lower for the day.  As usual, the over-the-counter market's biggest technology stocks were hardest hit.  Microsoft, battered by profit taking in recent sessions, sank as much as 4; but it finished at 80 7/8, down 2 1/4 on volume of one million shares.  MCI Communications, the most active issue, finished down 5/8 to 42 1/8.  MCI traded as low as 41 3/8 during the session.  Other active stocks included Jaguar, whose American depositary receipts added 1/8 to 11 1/4.  Apple Computer improved 7/8 to 47 5/8; Intel slipped 1/4 to 33 1/4, and Valley National Corp. was up 1/8 to 15 1/8.  "The market started with several strikes against it," said Peter DaPuzzo, head of retail equity trading at Shearson Lehman Hutton, referring to news that the labor-management buy-out of UAL Corp. continued to unravel, and reports that the junk-bond market is disintegrating.  But the computer-guided selling in response to those developments dealt a serious blow to the over-the-counter market, Mr. DaPuzzo said.  Even though the over-the-counter market usually doesn't fall by as much as listed stocks during program-selling blitzes, he said, "when the market does recover, the damage is done and it leaves Nasdaq down more than the Big Board."  Mr. DaPuzzo also complained that the sharp swings in stock prices lately is scaring away retail and foreign investors.  While Shearson doesn't do computer-guided program trading for its own account, the firm does execute orders for clients involved in the buying and selling of shares tied to movements in certain stock indexes, Mr. DaPuzzo acknowledged.  The volatility inherent in program trading troubled other traders, too.  They don't like the risks they are forced to assume when prices swing so drastically.  Market makers are supposed to keep supplies of stocks on hand to maintain orderly trading when imbalances occur.  That means that on days when prices are tumbling and sellers abound they must be willing to buy shares from sellers when no one else will.  In such an environment, a market maker can absorb huge losses.  But the recent volatility in stock prices caused by the program trading has made some market makers less willing to soak up the stocks that are for sale.  The market makers say they aren't comfortable carrying big positions in stocks because they realize prices can tumble quickly.  The situation makes it harder to buy and sell shares quickly, exacerbating the rise and fall in stock prices during program-dominated trading.  Groused Robert Antolini, head of over-the-counter trading at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette: "It's making it tough for traders to make money."  He said that when sell programs kick in, many traders believe that "there's no sense in sticking your nose out because you're an instant loser."  Kinder-Care Learning Centers added 1/4 to 4 7/8 on 461,200 shares.  Lodestar Group said it will make a $6-a-share offer for the remaining Kinder-Care Learning Center common stock if it acquires a majority of the company's shares in a pending rights offering by Kinder-Care Learning Center's parent, Kinder-Care Inc. Shares of KinderCare Inc. closed at 3 1/2, also up 1/4, on volume of 700,000.  Ohio Casualty dropped 2 1/8 to 49 1/2.  The company posted third-quarter earnings of 95 cents a share, down from $1.26 a year earlier.  The company estimated that losses from Hurricane Hugo reduced net income by 32 cents a share in the most recent quarter.  The company said losses from the Oct. 17 earthquake in California haven't yet been determined, but that it provides earthquake coverage to about 1,400 properties in the stricken area.  Any quake-related losses will be reported in the fourth quarter, the company said.  North Atlantic Industries jumped 1 to 5 3/4.  The electronics-instruments maker is to be acquired by Asset Management Associates for $7.25 a share.  LIN Broadcasting slid 1 3/8 to 108 3/4, despite reporting third-quarter net of 46 cents a share, up from 39 cents the previous year.  The company said the latest quarter included about $3.4 million in special legal and financial advisory costs related to McCaw Cellular Communications' bid for the company and LIN's merger pact with BellSouth.  McCaw was unchanged at 40.  XL/Datacomp slid 2 1/4 to 16 1/2 amid continuing concerns about the company's contract negotiations with International Business Machines.  IBM is reviewing its entire business-partners program, and XL/Datacomp confirmed earlier this month that it was in talks with the company about possible modifications to its current IBM-remarketer contract.  Remarketers make modifications to IBM's computer hardware and resell the products.  Omni Capital Group surged 1 3/4 to 16 1/4.  The company said net rose to 38 cents a share in its fiscal-first quarter ended Sept. 30, from 35 cents a shares a year ago.  Probably the most clear-cut Soviet violation, for example, is the Krasnoyarsk radar. -- "Arms Control Reality," Nov. 20, 1984, the first of some 20 Journal editorials saying that Krasnoyarsk violated the ABM treaty.  -- "Whether the installation is for early warning or space track, it clearly is not deployed," the lawmakers said.  "Thus we judge it to be not a violation of the ABM treaty at this time."  The delegation included a reporter from the New York Times, aides to Sen. Edward M. Kennedy and Rep. Les AuCoin, and Natural Resources Defense Council staff members. -- The Washington Post, Sept. 9, 1987.  -- The U.S.S.R. has taken unprecedented unilateral measures of openness, by giving American representatives a possibility to inspect the building site of the Krasnoyarsk radar as well as radar vans in the areas of Gomel and Moscow, so as to see for themselves that there are no violations of the ABM treaty of 1972 on the part of the Soviet Union. -- Letter from Eduard Shevardnadze to U.N. Secretary-General Perez de Cuellar, reported in Tass, June 10, 1988.  -- The construction of this station equal in size to the Egyptian pyramids constituted, I say it directly, a clear violation of ABM. -- Eduard Shevardnadze, Oct. 23, 1989.  We're happy, we guess, to receive confirmation of the Krasnoyarsk violation from the Soviets, five years after we started writing about it.  Perhaps even the American apologists will now accede.  Without question, something intriguing is going on in the policy chambers of the Politburo.  As it bids for new agreements, new loans and indeed admission to the civilized world, the Soviet government has recognized it has a credibility problem.  So after 70 years, it is confessing the obvious, hoping to be believed about other things.  It's not enough.  If the Soviets want to be believed, they need to start telling the truth about more than the totally obvious.  Our own test of "glasnost's" authenticity would be a Soviet decision to open itself to a complete international examination of one of the most troubling mysteries in U.S.-Soviet relations -- the reported 1979 anthrax outbreak at a Soviet military facility in Sverdlovsk.  The U.S. government has never waivered in its assessment of this incident as an accident at a biological weapons facility there, and hence a violation of the 1972 Biological Weapons Convention.  The Pentagon's recently issued "Soviet Military Power," though in general adopting a softer line, repeated the Sverdlovsk assessment.  It also was detailed in Congressional testimony this past February: An explosion at the Microbiology and Virology Institute in Sverdlovsk released anthrax germs that caused a significant number of deaths.  Since Mr. Shevardnadze did not address this topic before the Supreme Soviet, the Soviet Union's official position remains that the anthrax deaths were caused by tainted meat.  We doubt this claim just as we doubted Mr. Shevardnadze's assurance last year that Krasnoyarsk didn't violate the ABM treaty.  And just as we did not believe the tendentious claims of the Congressmen and arms-control advocates who visited Krasnoyarsk, we are in no way persuaded by the assent to the tainted-meat theory by a U.S. team of scientists who met with Soviet counterparts in Washington last year.  The Soviets' explanation is that the anthrax came from one lot of animal feed made from the bones of cattle that grazed on soil that was naturally infected with anthrax spores.  Harvard's Matthew Meselson -- who we read has sold something called the "scientific community" on the notion that "yellow rain" attacks on the Laotian Hmong were in fact the result of fecal showers by giant bees -- found the Soviet anthrax scenario "completely plausible."  We don't believe it.  And we certainly do not believe that Mr. Gorbachev or any of his emissaries yet deserve to have the West take their word for it.  Sverdlovsk is a large gray cloud over glasnost and indeed over the legitimacy of the arms-control process itself.  The U.S. government's Sverdlovsk complaint, as with Krasnoyarsk, is no mere political posturing.  Biological weapons violations have figured little in political debate, and indeed have not been pressed vigorously enough by the U.S. government.  But the stated U.S. position is detailed and specific, and the prospect of biological warfare is profoundly chilling.  The Soviets should be willing to set in motion a process that would allow them to acknowledge that Sverdlovsk violated the 1972 agreement or, alternatively, that would give U.S. specialists reasonable confidence that this was a wholly civilian accident.  Until that happens, glasnost cannot begin to deserve the kind of credibility Mr. Shevardnadze was bidding for with his confessions on Monday.  Manville Corp. said it offered to buy $500 million of its convertible preferred stock from the Manville Personal Injury Settlement Trust in a move that would improve the trust's liquidity and reduce the potential number of Manville shares outstanding.  Manville said it made the offer within the past several weeks as part of an effort to improve shareholder value.  It said it would purchase the stock at market price.  Manville and a spokeswoman for the trust said that the two are discussing the proposal but a decision hasn't been made.  "We are considering that offer along with all other alternatives," the trust spokeswoman said.  "We need to look at how to maximize our cash flow to pay our beneficiaries."  The trust, created as part of Manville's bankruptcy-law reorganization to compensate victims of asbestos-related diseases, owns 7.2 million of the Series A convertible preferred shares, which are each convertible into 10 Manville common shares.  The trust also owns half of Manville's 48 million common shares outstanding.  Based on Manville's closing price yesterday of $9.25 a share, Manville's offer would purchase about 5.4 million of its preferred shares, or about 75% of the trust's preferred stock holding.  In addition to the stock and 20% of Manville's profits beginning in 1992, the trust is supposed to receive $2.5 billion over its 27-year life.  But it initially was funded with about $765 million and may soon face a cash crunch.  As of June 30, it had settled about 15,000 of 81,000 claims filed and its unpaid claims totaled $136 million, a large portion of its $268 million in cash and marketable securities.  Since most of its assets are tied to Manville, a forest and building products concern, the trust might also want to diversify its holdings.  As part of its offer, Manville said it requested changes in some covenants between it and the trust to allow Manville to "reflect a more typical corporate ownership and financial structure."  A Manville spokesman wouldn't elaborate on the proposed changes.  But he said they are "to a large degree, housekeeping," although some may generate some disagreement.  Manville said the shares issued to the trust were intended to be sold, as needed, and that Manville has the right of first refusal to buy those shares.  Northeast Utilities raised its bid for Public Service Co. of New Hampshire, which is operating under Bankruptcy Code protection, to $2.25 billion from $1.85 billion.  Northeast's raised bid, which was supported by PS of New Hampshire's official shareholder committee, is a prelude to what is expected to be a round of higher bids by the other groups trying to acquire the company, the largest utility in New Hampshire.  The $2.25 billion value claimed by Northeast, based in Hartford, Conn., is the highest yet given to a bid.  Some of the three other bidding groups are expected to increase their offers tomorrow, a date set for revised offers by a bankruptcy court judge.  A hearing is set for Nov. 15, but participants don't expect a resolution until July 1990.  Under the new Northeast Utilities plan, it would pay $1.65 billion in cash to creditors and assume $100 million in pollution control bonds.  Secured creditors would recover both principal and interest, while unsecured creditors would receive only principal and interest accrued before PS of New Hampshire filed for Bankruptcy Code protection in January 1988.  The biggest change in Northeast's offer was in improvements made for equity holders who had been given short shrift previously.  Assuming full operation of the Seabrook nuclear power plant, which is completed but isn't yet operating, equity holders would receive up to $500 million in cash, preferred stock and new 10-year Seabrook bonds.  Northeast's previous offer had proposed that equity holders receive just $165 million.  In addition, Northeast promised the State of New Hampshire that rate increases would be limited to 5.5% annually for seven years.  Its previous proposal had conditioned rate limits on Seabrook operations and other contingencies.  Wilbur Ross, financial adviser to the equity holders said, "Given the state's strong bargaining position . . . we believe the NU plan provides the best recovery available" to PS of New Hampshire's equity holders.  Officials of PS of New Hampshire couldn't be reached for comment.  The company has filed an internal reorganization plan it valued at $2.2 billion that would require 5.5% rate increases.  That plan would leave existing preferred shareholders with at least a 41% stake and give common shareholders as little as 13%.  New England Electric System, Westborough, Mass., has proposed buying the company for $2 billion as part of a plan that would require rate increases of only 4.8% annually for seven years.  The state of New Hampshire has favored that plan.  The other bidder is United Illuminating Co., New Haven, Conn., with a bid valued at $2.2 billion and and a proposal for seven years of 5.5% rate increases.  The Polish rat will eat well this winter.  Tons of delectably rotting potatoes, barley and wheat will fill damp barns across the land as thousands of farmers turn the state's buyers away.  Many a piglet won't be born as a result, and many a ham will never hang in a butcher shop.  But with inflation raging, grain in the barn will still be a safer bet for the private farmer than money in the bank.  Once again, the indomitable peasant holds Poland's future in his hands.  Until his labor can produce a profit in this dying and distorted system, even Solidarity's sympathetic new government won't win him over.  In coming months, emergency food aid moving in from the West will be the one buffer between a meat-hungry public and a new political calamity.  Factory workers on strike knocked Poland's Communist bosses off balance last year; this year, it was the farmers who brought them down.  In June, farmers held onto meat, milk and grain, waiting for July's usual state-directed price rises.  The Communists froze prices instead.  The farmers ran a boycott, and meat disappeared from the shops.  On Aug. 1, the state tore up its controls, and food prices leaped.  Without buffer stocks, inflation exploded.  That was when the tame old Peasants' Party, desperate to live through the crisis, broke ranks with the Communists and joined with Solidarity in the East Bloc's first liberated government.  But by the time Solidarity took office in September, the damage was done.  "Shortageflation," as economists have come to call it, had gone hyper.  The cost of raising a pig kept bounding ahead of the return for selling one.  The farmers stayed angry.  They still are.  At dawn on a cool day, hundreds travel to the private market in Radzymin, a town not far from Warsaw, hauling pigs, cattle and sacks of feed that the state's official buyers can't induce them to sell.  Here, they are searching for a higher price.  In a crush of trucks and horse carts on the trodden field, Andrzej Latowski wrestles a screeching, overweight hog into the trunk of a private butcher's Polish Fiat.  "Of course it's better to sell private," he says, as the butcher trundles away.  "Why should anybody want to sell to them?"  The young farmer makes money on the few hogs he sells here.  He won't for long, because his old state sources of rye and potatoes are drying up.  "There's no feed," he says.  "You can't buy anything nowadays.  I don't know why."  Edward Chojnowski does.  His truck is parked across the field, in a row of grain sellers.  Like the others, it is loaded with rye, wheat and oats in sacks labeled "Asbestos.  Made in U.S.S.R."  The farmer at the next truck shouts, "Wheat] It's nice] It won't be cheaper] We sell direct]" A heavy, kerchiefed woman runs a handful through her fingers, and counts him out a pile of zlotys.  "Country people breed pigs," says Mr. Chojnowski, leaning against the back of his truck.  "They can't buy feed from the state.  There isn't enough.  Some state middlemen come to buy from me.  I sell -- a little.  I am waiting.  I have plenty more at home."  On this morning, he doesn't sell much in Radzymin, either.  At closing time, farmers cart out most of what they carted in.  A private market like this just isn't big enough to absorb all that business.  The hulk of Stalinism, it seems, will not quickly crumble away.  State monopolies will keep on stifling trade, "free" prices or not, until something else replaces them.  Polish agriculture will need a whole private network of procurement, processing and distribution -- plus a new manufacturing industry to supply it with tractors, pesticides, fertilizers and feed.  The Communists spent 40 years working to ensure that no such capitalistic structures ever arose here.  Building them now will require undergirding from the West, and removal of political deadwood, a job that Solidarity has barely started.  But Polish agriculture does possess one great asset already: the private farmer.  "We are dealing with real entrepreneurs," says Antoni Leopold, an economist who advises Rural Solidarity, the union's countryside offshoot.  "There are a lot of them, and they have property."  Polish peasants, spurning the collectivizers, were once a source of shame to orthodox Communists.  Now, among Communist reformers, they are objects of envy.  Food is the reformer's top priority, the key to popular support.  As the Chinese have shown and the Soviets are learning, family farms thrive where collectives fail.  Ownership, it seems, is the best fertilizer.  The Poles have had it all along.  Poland's 2.7 million small private farms cover 76% of its arable land.  On it, a quarter of the country's 39 million people produce three-quarters of its grain, beef, eggs and milk, and nine-tenths of its fruit, vegetables and potatoes.  Like the Roman Catholic Church, the Polish peasant is a pillar of the nation.  Try as they might, the Communists could neither replace nor break him.  And they did try.  A few miles past Radzymin, a dirt road narrows to a track of sand and leads into Zalubice, a village of tumbledown farms.  Czeslaw Pyszkiewicz owns 30 acres in 14 scattered scraps.  He grows rye and potatoes for a few hens, five cows and 25 piglets.  In patched pants and torn shoes, he stands in his barnyard eyeing the ground with a look both helpless and sardonic.  "It's bad soil," he says.  Until 1963, it was good soil.  Then the state put in a reservoir to supply the area with drinking water.  Farmers lay down before the bulldozers.  Their protest was ignored.  The dam caused the water level to drop in Zalubice.  Mr Pyszkiewicz smiles and his brow furrows.  He expected as much.  In his lifetime, 47 years, the Communists brought electricity to his village and piped in drinking water from the reservoir.  No phones.  No gas.  "We wanted them to build a road here," he says.  "They started, and then abandoned it."  A tractor, his only mechanized equipment, stands in front of the pigsty.  "It's Russian.  Good for nothing.  Parts are a tragedy.  Even if I had a lot of money, I couldn't buy what I need."  The farmer can say the same for coal, cement, saw blades.  In Poland, only 4% of all investment goes toward making things farmers want; in the West, it is closer to 20%.  The few big state farms take first crack at what does get made.  They use 60% more fertilizer per acre, twice the high-grade feed.  Yet their best boast is that they produce 32% of Polish pork.  "I've heard from friends that state farms are subsidized," Mr. Pyszkiewicz says as his wife, Wieslawa, sets some chairs out in the sun.  "We have one near here.  There is a lot of waste.  A private farmer never wastes anything."  The state quit shoving peasants onto its subsidized farms over 30 years ago.  But it never did let up on the pressure.  Until recently, a farmer with no heir had to will the state his land to collect his pension.  The pension's size still depends on how much produce he sells the state.  His allotment of materials also did, until the state couldn't hold up its end of that bargain.  Yet the state alone sells seeds and machines.  When supplies are short, it often hands them over only in exchange for milk or grain.  A private farmer in Poland is free to buy and sell land, hire help, decide what to grow and how to grow it.  He is free to invest in chickens, and to fail for lack of chicken wire.  He has plenty of freedom -- but no choices.  "I'm on my own land," Mr. Pyszkiewicz says.  "I don't have to listen to what anybody tells me to do."  "Sometimes," says his wife, "we're happy about that."  By starving the peasant, the Communists have starved Poland.  Villages like Zalubice exist in a desert of poor schools and few doctors.  Farm income is 15% below the average.  The young leave, especially girls who won't milk cows by hand.  Some men stay, their best friend a bottle of vodka, but two million acres have gone fallow.  Without machines, good farms can't get bigger.  So the potato crop, once 47 million tons, is down to 35 million.  Meat consumption is at 1979's level, pork production at 1973's, milk output at 1960's.  If a food crisis undid the Communists, a food revolution will make Solidarity.  The potential is displayed along every road into Warsaw: row upon row of greenhouses, stretching out behind modern mansions that trumpet their owners' wealth.  Vegetables are abundant and full of flavor in Poland, the pickles and sauerkraut sublime, the state monopolies long broken.  Grain, milk and meat come next.  A private challenge to the monolithic tractor industry will take more time and money than Poland can spare, although a smokehouse or a local dairy can spring up fast.  Poland makes no machinery for a plant on that scale.  Solidarity wants it from the West.  Maria Stolzman, one of its farm experts, lays it on the line: "The World Bank will be brought in to help us destroy the old system."  Felix Siemienas is destroying it now.  He packs pork.  A law went on the books in January that let him smoke bacon without breeding pigs.  He cashed in.  Poland is short on enterprises, not enterprise.  "I pay a lot to the farmer and five times the state salary to my employees," he says.  He is in Warsaw to open a shop.  "I hire transportation, and my customers have fresh cold cuts every day.  I don't subsidize anyone.  Everyone around me lives well.  Yes, my prices are high.  If nobody buys, I bring my prices down.  That's the rule.  That's the market."  Mr. Siemienas is making a fortune -- $10,000 a month, he says.  He has bought some trendy Western clothes, and a green Mercedes with an American flag in the window.  But the meat-processing machines he picked up are 50 years old.  "I don't want expensive machines.  If the situation changes, I'll get stuck with them."  That's politics.  By taking power in a deal with the Peasant Party's onetime Communist stooges, Solidarity has spooked the rural entrepreneur.  Rural Solidarity objected, to no avail, when Solidarity leader Lech Walesa accepted the Peasants' support.  It objected again in September when Prime Minister Tadeusz Mazowiecki reluctantly named a Peasant Party man as his agriculture minister.  Both the Peasants and Rural Solidarity are forming new political parties for farmers.  The Peasants can make a credible case, against Solidarity, that hell-bent reform will drive millions from the land.  Next Spring, the two will battle in local elections.  But until then, and probably long afterward, the Communists' apparat of obstruction -- from the head of the dairy co-op to the village bank manager -- will stay planted in the Polish countryside.  "We know how to get from capitalism to socialism," Sergiusz Niciporuk is saying one afternoon.  "We don't know how to get from socialism to capitalism."  He farms 12 acres in Grabowiec, two miles from the Soviet border in one of Poland's poorest places.  Now he is mounting the steps of a stucco building in a nearby village, on a visit to the Communist administrator, the "naczelnik."  "Many people in Poland hope this government will break down," says Mr. Niciporuk, who belongs to the local council and to Rural Solidarity.  "That's what the naczelnik counts on.  He is our most dangerous enemy.  Every time he sees me, he gets very nervous."  The farmer barges into the naczelnik's office.  A thin man in a gray suit looks up from a newspaper.  Mr. Niciporuk sits.  Anatol Pawlowski's leg begins jiggling beneath his desk.  "Solidarity doesn't care for the good of this region," he says after a few pleasantries.  "They want to turn everything upside down in a week.  Mr. Niciporuk here wants 60 acres used at the moment by a state farm.  He can't guarantee that he can use it any better."  "I am ready at any moment to compete with a state farm."  The naczelnik averts his eyes.  "What have you got?  Not even a tractor.  And you want to make wicker baskets, too."  "I can do five things at once -- to be a businessman."  "Big business," Mr. Pawlowski snorts in English.  The farmer stands to go.  The naczelnik stands, too.  "I care very much for this post," he says.  "Eight years I've had it.  A cultural center has been built, shops.  Suddenly, I am not a comfortable man for Solidarity.  I have accomplished too much.  They want to do more.  I wish them all the best]"  The farmer leaves.  And the naczelnik shuts his door.  The House approved a short-term spending bill to keep the government operating through Nov. 15 and provide $2.85 billion in emergency funds to assist in the recovery from Hurricane Hugo and the California earthquake.  The 321-99 roll call vote reflected broad support for the disaster assistance, but the cost to the Treasury is sure to aggravate budget pressures this year and next under the Gramm-Rudman deficit reduction law.  By a lopsided 401-18 margin, the chamber rejected an effort to waive Gramm-Rudman for purposes of addressing the two disasters, and budget analysts estimate the increased appropriations will widen the fiscal 1990 deficit by at least $1.44 billion unless offsetting spending cuts or new revenues are found by Congress.  The budget impact will be greater still in fiscal 1991, and the issue forced a confrontation between the Appropriations Committee leadership and Budget Committee Chairman Leon Panetta, whose California district was at the center of the earthquake last week.  Going to the well of the chamber, Mr. Panetta demanded the costs be fully counted.  His prominent role put him in the awkward position of challenging the very committee members on whom his state will be most dependent in the months ahead.  "We do not come to this House asking for any handout," said the California Democrat.  "We do not intend to hide these costs from the American people."  The $2.85 billion package incorporates $500 million for low-interest disaster loans, $1 billion in highway construction funds, and $1.35 billion divided between general emergency assistance and a reserve to be available to President Bush to meet unanticipated costs from the two disasters.  The funds are in addition to $1.1 billion appropriated last month to assist in the recovery from Hugo, bringing the total for the two disasters to nearly $4 billion in unanticipated spending.  Because of the vagaries of Gramm-Rudman, the immediate impact is relatively small.  But the appropriations set in motion spending that adds to an already grim budget picture for fiscal 1991.  Within the appropriations process, the situation is even more difficult since the costs will be counted against the share of funds to be allocated to those subcommittees that recently have had the greatest difficulty in staying within the budget.  The underlying bill approved yesterday is required to keep the government operating past midnight tonight, and this urgency has contributed to the speed -- and, critics say, mistakes -- that have accompanied the package of disaster assistance.  The hastily drafted measure could hurt California by requiring it to put up more matching funds for emergency highway assistance than otherwise would be required.  And the state's delegation is fearful that the new funding will be counted against a separate $185 million in federal highway funds it would expect to receive under its normal allocation this year.  Also, the high price of San Francisco real estate puts the state at odds with federal regulations more attuned to the national average.  For example, disaster loans, which will go to small businesses and homeowners, offer credit as low as 4% in some cases.  But the San Francisco delegation finds itself asking that the cap per household be lifted to $500,000 from $100,000 to assist the hard hit but often wealthy Marina district.  The Senate is expected to make some modifications today, but both the White House and Congress appear most anxious to speed final approval before tonight's deadline.  Administration pressure discourages any effort to add to total funding, and the Senate changes are expected to be largely technical -- dealing with highway aid and lifting the ceiling on total Small Business Administration loans to $1.8 billion to accommodate the increased activity expected.  Yesterday's floor action came as a House-Senate conference approved a nearly $8.5 billion fiscal 1990 military construction bill, representing a 5% reduction from last year and making severe cuts from Pentagon requests for installations abroad.  An estimated $25.8 million is allocated to continue work in Oman.  But all funding is cut for the Philippines, and projects in South Korea are cut to $13.6 million, or less than a sixth of the administration's request.  Closer to home, the negotiators were more generous.  An estimated $38.9 million was set aside for military installations in the home state of North Carolina Rep. W.G. Hefner, the House chairman.  And $70.2 million would go to projects in Tennessee represented by his Senate counterpart and fellow Democrat, Sen. James Sasser.  Texas and California are traditionally powerful within the conference, but equally striking is the dominance of Alaska, Pennsylvania and West Virginia because of their power elsewhere in the appropriations process.  Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd (D., W.Va.) even added report language listing $49.4 million in projects he wants in the budget next year.  No individual illustrated this mix of power more yesterday than Sen. Daniel Inouye (D., Hawaii), who chairs the Senate defense subcommittee.  In the final trading, the House was insistent on setting aside $500 million to carry out base closings ordered to begin in fiscal 1990.  But it gave ground to Mr. Inouye on a number of projects, ranging from a $11 million parking garage here, to a land transfer in Hawaii, to a provision to assist the Makwah Indian Tribe in Washington state.  The tribe is one of the poorest in the Pacific Northwest.  Mr. Inouye, who chairs the select committee on Indian Affairs, used his power to move $400,000 from the Air Force to the Bureau of Indian Affairs to assist in renovating a decommissoned base to accommodate a drug and alcohol rehabilitation center.  Meanwhile, House-Senate negotiators have tentatively agreed on a $3.18 billion anti-drug and anti-crime intitiative, cutting other federal spending 0.43% to pay for it.  A formal House-Senate conference is expected to ratify the accord later this week.  Mobil Corp. is preparing to slash the size of its work force in the U.S., possibly as soon as next month, say individuals familiar with the company's strategy.  The size of the cuts isn't known, but they'll be centered in the exploration and production division, which is responsible for locating oil reserves, drilling wells and pumping crude oil and natural gas.  Employees haven't yet been notified.  Sources said that meetings to discuss the staff reductions have been scheduled for Friday at Mobil offices in New Orleans and Denver.  This would be a second round of cuts by Mobil, which along with other oil producers and refiners reduced its work force by 15% to 20% during the mid-1980s as part of an industrywide shakeout.  Mobil's latest move could signal the beginning of further reductions by other oil companies in their domestic oil-producing operations.  In yesterday's third-quarter earnings report, the company alluded to a $40 million provision for restructuring costs involving U.S. exploration and production operations.  The report says that "the restructuring will take place over a two-year period and will principally involve the transfer and termination of employees in our U.S. operations."  A company spokesman, reached at his home last night, would only say that there will be a public announcement of the reduction program by the end of the week.  Most oil companies, including Mobil, have been reporting lower third-quarter earnings, largely as a result of lower earnings from chemicals as well as refining and marketing businesses.  Individuals familiar with Mobil's strategy say that Mobil is reducing its U.S. work force because of declining U.S. output.  Yesterday, Mobil said domestic exploration and production operations had a $16 million loss in the third quarter, while comparable foreign operations earned $234 million.  Industrywide, oil production in this country fell by 500,000 barrels a day to 7.7 million barrels in the first eight months of this year.  Daily output is expected to decline by at least another 500,000 barrels next year.  Some Mobil executives were dismayed that a reference to the cutbacks was included in the earnings report before workers were notified.  One Mobil executive said that the $40 million charge related to the action indicates "a substantial" number of people will be involved.  Some will likely be offered severance packages while others will be transferred to overseas operations.  The Justice Department is in the process of trying to gain control over a law that federal Judge David Sentelle recently called a "monster."  Needless to say, he was talking about RICO.  With its recently revised guidelines for RICO, Justice makes it clear that the law currently holds too many incentives for abuse by prosecutors.  The text of the "new policy" guidelines from the Criminal Division are reprinted nearby.  They strongly suggest that Justice's prosecutions of Drexel Burnham Lambert, Michael Milken and Princeton/Newport violated notions of fundamental fairness.  Justice is attempting to avoid a replay of these tactics.  This amounts to an extraordinary repudiation of the tenure of New York mayoral candidate and former U.S. Attorney Rudolph Giuliani, who was more inclined to gathering scalps than understanding markets.  The new guidelines limit the pretrial forfeitures of assets of RICOed defendants and their investors, clients, bankers and others.  This follows earlier new guidelines from the Tax Division prohibiting Princeton/Newport-like tax cases from masquerading as RICO cases.  The forfeiture memo cited "considerable criticism in the press, because of a perception that pre-trial freezing of assets is tantamount to a seizure of property without due process."  It told prosecutors not to seek forfeitures if there are "less intrusive" alternatives, such as bonds, and in any case not to seek forfeitures "disproportionate to the defendant's crime."  These changes come a tad late for Princeton/Newport, the first RICOed securities firm.  It was forced into liquidation before trial when investors yanked their funds after the government demanded a huge pre-trial asset forfeiture.  Princeton/Newport investors, including McKinsey & Co. and the Harvard endowment, made the rational decision to withdraw their money; for the firm, the liquidation was sentence first, verdict later.  Prosecutors wanted $23.8 million in forfeiture for alleged tax fraud of some $400,000.  The experience of Princeton/Newport and initiation of other RICO-forfeiture cases against legitimate businesses taught Drexel that a RICOed investment bank would be an ex-investment bank.  Drexel therefore agreed instead to an arrangement allowing it to plea to charges "which the company is not in a position to dispute" because of RICO. Part of Drexel's plea was to cut Mr. Milken loose.  So after all the prosecutorial hoopla no one has established what, if anything, Drexel did wrong.  So two cheers for the new rules.  Justice has finally recognized its employees' abuses, thanks largely to the demands for reform by former U.S. attorney in Washington Joseph diGenova, who wants to salvage RICO for real criminals.  But prosecutorial guidelines are effective only if someone at Justice is willing and able to supervise hyperactive prosecutors.  Judge Sentelle, of the appeals court in Washington, made this point at a Cato Institute conference last week in a remarkable speech titled, "RICO: The Monster That Ate Jurisprudence."  He said ours is supposed to be "a government of laws not of men," and yet RICO defenders "tell us that we should rely on prosecutorial discretion to protect against overbreadth of RICO."  No prosecutorial guidelines, observed or unobserved, limit civil RICO cases by plaintiffs for damages.  What now for Princeton/Newport officials, Drexel and Mr. Milken?  Justice should review these cases to see what other prosecutorial abuses may have occurred.  We suspect that Justice will some day agree that only the complete repeal of RICO can guarantee an end to injustices in its name.  "The Famous Teddy Z," which CBS Inc. had hoped would emerge as one of the few bright spots in its otherwise lackluster prime-time schedule, isn't turning out to be the hit the network envisaged.  Although the half-hour situation comedy seen Mondays at 9:30 p.m. Eastern and Pacific time isn't a candidate for cancellation, it is slated for fine-tuning and by next week the network may announce "Teddy Z" is moving to 8:30 p.m. from its 9:30 time slot, replacing "The People Next Door," which became the first network show to be canceled this season.  "Teddy Z," which centers on a mailroom clerk-turned agent at a Hollywood talent agency, was scheduled in the coveted 9:30 p.m. slot to follow "Murphy Brown," a situation comedy about a television news magazine, starring Candice Bergen.  "Teddy Z" was boosted by favorable reviews and a network-wide promotional tie-in contest with K mart Corp.  It was promoted on cable services, including MTV, Nick at Night and VH-1, and premiered as the No. 22-rated show for the week.  But five weeks after the premiere, the series has floundered.  In figures released yesterday by A.C. Nielsen Co. "Teddy Z," produced by the television unit of Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc., was in 37th place.  Worse, every week it suffers audience drop-off from "Murphy Brown" and viewership on CBS picks up again once "Teddy Z" is over and is followed by "Designing Women."  "There is strong indication that `Teddy Z' is not compatible with the shows it is surrounding," said John Sisk, senior vice president at J. Walter Thompson Co., a unit of WPP Group PLC.  Last week, "Murphy Brown" was viewed by 14.1% of the available television households, while the number dropped to 12.6% for "Teddy Z" and rose to 14.2% for "Designing Women."  CBS executives said the program is also slated to undergo some plot changes.  Creator Hugh Wilson, for example, included the lead character's Greek family in the cast, "but that is not the right focus anymore," said one CBS executive.  Instead, CBS hopes the show will increasingly highlight the talent agency and the business of being an agent.  "We're making adjustments on the show, yes, but nothing radical," said Craig Nelson, the story consultant on "Teddy Z."  "But we hope to keep a balance between the office and the family."  The opening credits are being redone, Mr. Nelson said, "to make Teddy's situation clear to viewers who have not been with us since the beginning.  Those viewers find the show confusing."  The stock market's woes spooked currency traders but prompted a quiet little party among bond investors.  Prices of long-term Treasury bonds moved inversely to the stock market as investors sought safety amid growing evidence the economy is weakening.  But the shaky economic outlook and the volatile stock market forced the dollar lower against major currencies.  The bond market got an early boost from the opening-hour sell-off in stocks.  That rout was triggered by UAL Corp.'s announcement late Monday that the proposed management-labor buy-out had collapsed.  The 80-point decline in the Dow Jones Industrial Average during the morning trading session touched off a flight to safety that saw investors shifting assets from stocks to Treasury bonds.  At its strongest, the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose more than a point, or more than $10 for each $1,000 face amount.  As the stock market recovered some of its losses later in the day, bond prices retreated.  But analysts said the combination of a second consecutive decline in monthly durable-goods orders and lackluster mid-October auto sales helped prop up the Treasury market.  A slowing economy and the implication of lower inflation and interest rates tend to bolster bond prices.  On the surface, the decline in September durable goods -- only 0.1% -- didn't appear very weak.  But orders for non-defense capital goods, a precursor of future plant and equipment spending, were off 5.6% after falling 10.3% in August.  Auto makers reported that mid-October sales were running at an annual rate of about 5.8 million units, far less than the 6.6 million units analysts had expected.  Taken together, the auto-sales and durable-goods reports confirmed perceptions that the economy is bogging down.  Although analysts don't expect the Federal Reserve to ease credit policy soon, reports like those yesterday help build the case for lower rates.  Now bond investors are looking toward next week's report from national purchasing managers and the government's October employment report as potentially prompting the Fed to lower rates.  The stock market's precipitous drop frightened foreign investors, who quickly bid the dollar lower.  But as stock prices recovered some of the early losses, so did the U.S. currency.  Although dealers said investors are becoming more bearish toward the dollar in the wake of the stock market's recent troubles and as the U.S. economy weakens, the dollar ended down only modestly.  In major market activity:  Bond prices rose.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond gained nearly half a point, or about $5 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield on the issue slipped to 7.89%.  The dollar retreated.  In late New York trading the currency was quoted at 1.8355 marks and 141.45 yen, compared with 1.8470 marks and 141.90 yen Monday.  "Lifestyles of the Rich and Famous" may be visiting some new venues in the near future.  Judge Robert ("Maximum Bob") Potter sentenced Jim Bakker to 45 years in the big house yesterday, while a Beverly Hills judge tucked away Zsa Zsa Gabor for three days, plus 120 hours of work with homeless women.  Miss Gabor recanted her earlier-expressed fear of jailhouse lesbians.  Mr. Bakker said he was guilty of sin but not fraud.  We can only wonder who will be the next lost soul chosen to be America's Celebrity Convict.  Boeing Co. said Trans European Airways ordered a dozen 737 jetliners valued at a total of about $450 million.  The 300 and 400 series aircraft will be powered by engines jointly produced by General Electric Co. and Snecma of France.  Currently, Boeing has a backlog of about $80 billion, but production has been slowed by a strike of 55,000 machinists, which entered its 22nd day today.  Last week, a mediator failed to rekindle talks between the company and the strikers, who have rejected a pay raise offer of 10% over three years.  When the good fairy assigned to Slovakia hovered over the cradle of Edita Gruberova many years ago in Bratislava, she sprinkled her with high E flats, sparkling Ds, clean trills, and coloratura ornaments silvery as magic dust.  Maybe she could drop by at the Metropolitan Opera and bring along what she forgot, a little charm, a few smidgins of thespian skills and a nice wig.  Cast as Violetta Valery in a new production of Verdi's "La Traviata," Ms. Gruberova last week did many things nicely and others not so well.  It isn't every day that we hear a Violetta who can sing the first act's high-flying music with all the little notes perfectly pitched and neatly stitched together.  Never once did she gasp for air or mop her brow.  She was as cool as a cucumber.  But as you may know, things are not going well for Violetta.  There are times when she must show a little emotion.  She has TB, after all, and a weak-kneed lover; and though a successful courtesan, she is just about overdrawn at the bank.  Worse, her walls move all the time -- at least in this production.  Just when Ms. Gruberova sat down away from her guests to cough in private, her salon began sliding around the stage; her country hideaway also has a very active set of drapes.  Hold on to those funny braids] you wanted to caution her as the sets started to roll around once more.  This is the most moving "Traviata" I've ever seen.  Normally, Violetta can go about her business without wondering whether she is moving as gracefully as the scenery.  But this is a production designed and directed by Franco Zeffirelli and paid for by Sybil Harrington, who has no need to count her pennies, unlike Violetta, down to 20 louis at the opera's end.  Seeing all those millions in action, I was just so relieved that Ms. Gruberova, gawky thing that she is, didn't accidentally smother herself in a drape.  Large and lavish, "Traviata" is another addition to the Met's growing stock of cast-proof productions mostly by Mr. Zeffirelli.  They have a life of their own and can be counted on to look good and perform whenever a cast isn't up to either.  If a strike ever hits the Met, the company can still sell tickets to his "Boheme" and "Turandot" and boom out recordings (of another era).  Last week's discerning audience gave a bigger hand to a greenhouse than to the tenor Neil Shicoff, who sang an aria inside it.  Inexplicably costumed as a rabbinical student, tottering around on lifts, Mr. Shicoff hardly seemed the fellow to catch a fancy cocotte's eye.  I wish he could wear lifts in his voice.  Not nearly in his best form, the tenor made dullish sounds along with his usual clumsy hand gestures.  Maybe Mr. Z. was too busy taming his set to work with his naturally ungainly Alfredo.  Or is it that Mr. Z. is getting a little tired of "Traviata"?  This is the same production already seen in Paris and Florence, and its scenic ideas echo the movie he made with Placido Domingo and Teresa Stratas.  Decades earlier, Maria Callas sang the Dallas staging that introduced the flashback idea.  In an invention that drives Verdi purists bananas, Violetta lies dying in bed during the prelude, rising deliriously when then she remembers the great parties she used to throw.  The entire opera is her dream.  Given the prelude's thematic connections with the music preceding the last act, the idea is more worn than bad, though as luck would have it, for a change there actually was a conductor in the pit whom we wanted to hear, Carlos Kleiber, trying to make memorable music while we all waited for the bed lump to stir into song.  Once she did so, the big-souled German maestro with the shaky nerves who so often cancels offered a limpid, flowing performance that in its unswagged and unswaggering approach was totally at odds with the staging.  Of heart-pounding moments there were nearly none, and whether this has to do with Mr. Kleiber or the wooden cast is hard to say.  In any event, Ms. Gruberova barely ventilated Violetta's anguish in her long meeting with Wolfgang Brendel, who as Germont seemed fairly desperate trying to inject an Italianate lilt into his heavy, teutonic baritone.  "Di Provenza" wasn't much of an advertisement for sunny, southern France.  Perhaps Mr. Kleiber could let him substitute one of the songs about dead children and dark nights from Mahler's "Kindertotenlieder."  Speaking of dark nights, the Met's next-door neighbor, the New York City Opera, has canceled its season after failing to reach a settlement with its musicians, who wanted pay parity with the the Chicago Lyric and San Francisco Opera orchestras.  Well, they can now go and audition there.  Good luck.  Common sense suggests that people who play for a company that charges about half what those houses do for a ticket are not in the same market.  The cancellation bodes poorly for a company already beset with an identity crisis exacerbated by the retirement of general director Beverly Sills and the amazing appointment of Christopher Keene as her successor after his years of feckless toiling in the pit.  As the Met discovered years ago following a belated December opening, it is nearly impossible to recapture subscribers once they have had time to ponder their entertainment choices.  I, for instance, was perfectly happy at Avery Fisher Hall the other day listening to Helmuth Rilling conduct the Messa per Rossini, a strange piece written by 13 different Italian composers to honor Rossini after his death in 1868.  Each of them contributed a section at the behest of Verdi, who was nearly driven to his own early grave by the troublesome arrangements.  For all that, the piece landed unperformed in a dusty archive after Bologna refused to supply a chorus and orchestra.  We know Verdi's own contribution was mighty impressive since the operatic "Libera me" was reworked for the Manzoni Requiem, of which he wrote every note himself having learned his lesson.  The surprising discovery of the evening at Fisher was the high standard achieved by some of his now-obscure colleagues, notably Raimondo Boucheron.  His melodious "Confutatis" was smoothly sung by bass Brian Matthews.  Also, Teodulo Mabellini's "Lux aeterna" was intriguingly scored and splendidly put across by Mr. Rilling.  He brought along his Stuttgart-based Gaechinger Kantorei chorus, and even better, the Czech soprano Gabriela Benackova.  She was in her most radiant, expressive voice.  Maybe she could step across the plaza to the Met -- where she has still to make her debut -- and help out her Czech compatriot by singing the slow parts of "Traviata."  TOKYO'S FILM FESTIVAL  The Tokyo International Film Festival was no match for the Cannes Film Festival in terms of prestige, but it made its mark: It awarded the largest cash prize of any film festival to young and first-time film makers.  At this year's event, the third since the festival got under way in 1985, Idrissa Ouedraogo of Burkina Faso won the Sakura Gold prize of $143,000 for "Yaaba" ("Old Woman").  By comparison, Cannes now gives $39,000 to the winner of its young director's award.  Says director George Miller ("Mad Max"): "I think the Tokyo festival may become known as a major attraction for young directors because of the money as well as the recognition."  There are drawbacks.  Vincent Tolentino, a correspondent for the French magazine Telerama, says of the recently ended Tokyo festival: "No one makes deals . . . and most of the films have been seen before at other festivals."  BELGIAN SECURITIES  Belgium decided that investors who demand the delivery of their securities when they buy shares or domestic bonds will have to pay an additional 100 Belgian francs (about $2.60) for each transaction, bringing the total fee to 200 francs.  While no figures exist, it is thought that many small investors in Belgium store securities privately, in some cases to avoid paying high inheritance taxes.  The law could redound to the advantage of brokers and banks, who incur high administrative costs to deliver securities to investors.  HELPING EASTERN EUROPE  Japan is considering giving aid to Hungary and Poland to support their recent political reforms, a spokesman for the Foreign Ministry said.  "This is the first time, if we decide to do so, for Japan to extend aid of this kind to Eastern European countries," the spokesman said.  He said Prime Minister Toshiki Kaifu also is studying the possibility of a visit to the two Eastern bloc nations and to Western Europe next January.  FRANCO-SPANISH MEETING  Drugs were a major issue in two days of talks between French President Francois Mitterrand and Spanish Prime Minister Felipe Gonzalez.  "I demand the utmost severity in the fight against drug traffickers," President Mitterrand said after the meeting in Valladolid, Spain.  He added: "Banks must open their books."  The leaders' talks coincided with a meeting in Madrid of anti-drug experts from the U.S., France, Italy, Spain, Peru, Bolivia and Colombia.  That conference, which began yesterday, was expected to cover such matters as police training and extradition agreements, Spanish officials said.  IRANIAN COMINGS AND GOINGS  Three Soviet government officials -- the ministers of railroads, of foreign economic relations and of heavy-machine building -- will visit Tehran next month for talks, Iran's official news agency reported.  Under an agreement signed last June, the Soviets will help Iran in oil exploration and other areas in return for exports of Iranian natural gas.  And in Paris, Mahmoud Vaezi, Iran's vice minister of foreign affairs, began a five-day visit to discuss such matters as compensation to French enterprises for contracts broken by the Khomeini regime.  JAPANESE INGENUITY  Toto Co., a Japanese ceramics maker, has developed a toilet that can check the user's health.  A Toto spokesman said the toilet not only tests blood pressure, pulse and urine, it also stores the data for up to 130 days.  Nippon Telegraph & Telephone Corp. and Omron Tateisi Electronics are involved with Toto's new product, which will go on the market in about two years time.  "It will be very expensive," the spokesman warned.  "The price cannot be less than $7,000."  FIGHTING CORRUPTION IN MEXICO  Since Mexican President Carlos Salinas de Gortari took office last December, special agents have arrested more than 6,000 federal employees on charges ranging from extortion to tax evasion.  Hector Castaneda Jimenez, chief prosecutor at the Attorney General's Office, said that an estimated $82.8 million in government property and unpaid taxes have been recovered in the campaign to root out official corruption.  Mr. Castaneda's office will reportedly issue warrants during the next six months for the arrest of another 10,000 federal employees.  Those employees are suspected of illegally gaining an estimated $376.8 million, the prosecutor was quoted as saying by the Excelsior news service.  He added that federal agents hope to recover at least half that amount.  "The rest will probably not be recoverable either because the statute of limitations expired or because many prefer to spend additional time in jail rather than return the money," the prosecutor said.  POSTSCRIPTS . . .  The United Nations, which is distributing farm tools to returning refugees in Namibia, is rethinking a plan to hand out machetes because of the tense political climate during preparations for independence from South Africa.  "The decision to distribute machetes at this time, which could be used as weapons, is under review," said a U.N. spokesman. . . .  Sources close to the family of Pakistani Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto said she is expecting a second child, probably early next year.  Cray Research Inc. forecast that 1990 will be a no-growth year for its supercomputer line.  In what has become a series of bad-news announcements, the world's largest maker of supercomputers said that after reviewing its order prospects, "we have concluded it is prudent to plan for next year on the assumption that revenue again will be flat."  Cray jolted the market in July when it slashed revenue and earnings projections for this year, citing a slowing economy that has delayed orders from government as well as commercial customers.  The company made its 1990 projection -- an unusual event for Cray -- in announcing improved net income for the third quarter.  Cray said it earned $30.6 million, or $1.04 a share, up 35% from $22.6 million, or 73 cents a share, a year ago.  Revenue gained 45% to $210.2 million from $145.2 million.  For the nine months, earnings totaled $36.6 million, or $1.24 a share, down 46% from $68.1 million, or $2.19 a share, a year earlier.  Revenue was $454.6 million, a 6.9% gain from $425.4 million.  Cray made its announcement after the stock market closed.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Cray closed down $1.125 at $34.25.  Cray said its order backlog at Sept. 30 was $315 million, down $25 million from June 30.  Marcello Gumucio, president, said the company "did well in the quarter as far as revenues and earnings are concerned, and not quite as well in terms of signing orders."  As for the current period, Mr. Gumucio said, "We anticipate that fourth-quarter revenue and earnings will be substantially greater than any of the preceding three quarters, but not up to the record levels of last year's fourth quarter" when Cray earned $88.5 million, or $2.80 a share.  He added that the company expects "strong" operating profit for the year, "but at a level significantly lower than last year."  He said 1989's net income could be 11% to 13% of revenue, which, assuming current expectations, would be 40% to 45% below 1988's level.  Last year, Cray earned $156.6 million, or $4.99 a share, on revenue of $756.3 million.  Next year "looks dismal," said analyst Paul Luber of Robert Baird & Co., Milwaukee.  Noting that Cray doesn't have a low-end supercomputer to compete with the likes of Convex Computer Corp. and International Business Machines Corp., Mr. Luber said such a machine would be necessary "to get things back on line here."  Cray has indicated it will decide on whether to build such a machine before year end.  Johnson & Johnson reported a 10% rise in third-quarter net income on a 12% sales increase-results that were driven particularly by new products including pharmaceuticals and the company's professional operations.  Net for the New Brunswick, N.J., maker of health-care products climbed to $265 million, or 80 cents a share, from $240 million, or 71 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  Sales rose to $2.45 billion from $2.2 billion.  The year-ago per-share earnings are adjusted to reflect a 2-for-1 stock split last May.  In a statement, Ralph S. Larsen, chairman and chief executive officer, said the company was pleased with its third-quarter sales performance, "especially in light of the extremely competitive environment in domestic consumer markets and the negative impact of unfavorable exchange rates this quarter."  David J. Lothson, an industry analyst for PaineWebber Group Inc., said Johnson & Johnson's results slightly exceeded his expectations for the third quarter.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Johnson & Johnson shares fell 37.5 cents to $54.625.  Mr. Larsen noted "substantial sales growth" for the recently introduced Acuvue disposable contact lens and Hismanal, a once-a-day antihistamine.  Eprex, used by dialysis patients who are anemic, and Prepulsid, a gastro-intestinal drug, did well overseas, he said.  Despite health-care cost controls and programs to hold down inventory, the professional division, which makes products including sutures and surgical stapling equipment, "achieved solid growth," Johnson & Johnson said.  But domestic consumer sales slipped 1.2% for the quarter, to $490 million from $496 million.  The company cited softness in the retail health and beauty aids category, "as well as the intense competition in the company's sanitary protection product line."  Overseas sales were stronger, principally because of a rebound in Brazil, where economic turmoil had hurt year-earlier results, Johnson & Johnson said.  Mr. Lothson of PaineWebber said the company's sales pace has been picking up largely because the effect of unfavorable exchange rates has been easing -- a pattern continuing this quarter.  He cautioned, however, that a "tough tax-rate comparison" may slow the company's earnings growth for the current quarter.  For last year's fourth quarter, the company's tax rate was less than 20%, he said.  While the third period contained no major surprises, Mr. Lothson said, the results show how sensitive the multinationals can be to developments in a single country such as Brazil.  He also questioned whether recent gains in that country can be sustained.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Bergen Brunswig Corp., proposed offering of liquid yield option notes, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Columbia Gas System Inc., shelf offering of up to $200 million of debentures.  Laserscope, initial offering of 1,656,870 common shares, of which 1,455,000 shares are to be sold by the company and 201,870 by holders, via Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. and Volpe, Covington & Welty.  TeleVideo Systems Inc., proposed offering of 1,853,735 common shares, to be sold by holders.  Western Gas System Inc., initial offering of 3,250,000 common shares, of which 3,040,000 shares will be sold by the company and 210,000 by a holder, via Prudential-Bache Capital Funding, Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. and Hanifen, Imhoff Inc.  Insiders have been selling shares in Dun & Bradstreet Corp., the huge credit-information concern.  Six top executives at the New York-based company sold shares in August and September.  Four of those insiders sold more than half their holdings.  The stock, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, closed at $51.75, up 62.5 cents, well below the $56.13 to $60 a share the insiders received for their shares.  Much of the recent slide in Dun & Bradstreet's stock came late last week, after negative comments by analysts at Merrill Lynch & Co. and Goldman, Sachs & Co.  A company spokesman declined to comment and said that the officials who sold shares wouldn't comment.  One of Dun & Bradstreet's chief businesses is compiling reports that rate the credit-worthiness of millions of American companies.  It also owns Moody's Investors Service, which assigns credit-ratings to bonds and preferred stock; A.C. Nielsen, known for its data on television-viewing patterns, and Yellow-pages publisher Donnelley.  Last March, this newspaper reported on widespread allegations that the company misled many customers into purchasing more credit-data services than needed.  In June, the company agreed to settle for $18 million several lawsuits related to its sales practices, without admitting or denying the charges.  An investigation by U.S. Postal inspectors is continuing.  Among the insider sales, Charles Raikes, the firm's general counsel, sold 12,281 shares in August, representing 46% of his holdings in the company.  He received $724,579 for the shares, according to insider filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  John C. Holt, an executive vice president and Dun & Bradstreet director, sold 10,000 shares on Aug. 31 for $588,800, filings show.  He retains 9,232 shares.  William H.J. Buchanan, the firm's secretary and associate general counsel, sold 7,000 shares in two separate sales in September for $406,000.  The shares represented 66% of his Dun & Bradstreet holdings, according to the company.  The other insiders, all senior or executive vice presidents, sold between 2,520 and 6,881 shares, representing between 8% and 70% of their holdings, according to SEC filings.  Dun & Bradstreet's stock price began its recent spiral downward last Wednesday, when the company reported third-quarter results.  Net income rose to 83 cents a share from 72 cents a share the year-earlier period.  But analysts focused more on the drop in revenue, to $1.04 billion from $1.07 billion, reflecting in part a continuing drop in sales of the controversial credit-reporting services.  Last Thursday, Merrill Lynch securities analyst Peter Falco downgraded his investment rating on the firm, according to Dow Jones Professional Investors Report, citing a slowdown in the credit-reporting business.  He cut his rating to a short-term hold from above-average performer and reduced his 1990 earnings estimate.  Mr. Falco continues to rank the stock a longterm buy.  The stock slid $1.875 on more than four times average daily volume.  The stock received another blow on Friday, when Goldman Sachs analyst Eric Philo advised that investors with short-term horizons should avoid Dun & Bradstreet stock because it is unlikely to outperform the market.  The stock fell 75 cents.  Insider selling is not unusual at Dun & Bradstreet; in fact, the recent pace of selling is just about average for the company, according to figures compiled by Invest/Net, a North Miami, Fla., firm that specializes in tracking and analyzing SEC insider filings.  But previous sales have often been sales of shares purchased through the exercise of stock options and sold six months later, as soon as allowed, said Robert Gabele, president of Invest/Net.  The most recent sales don't appear to be option-related, he said.  ---  TASTY PROFITS: Michael A. Miles, chief executive officer of Philip Morris Cos.' Kraft General Foods unit, bought 6,000 shares of the company on Sept. 22 for $157 each.  The $942,000 purchase raised his holdings to 74,000 shares.  The stock split four-for-one on Oct. 10.  Mr. Miles's newly purchased shares are now worth $1,068,000, based on Philip Morris's closing price of $44.50, up 62.5 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday.  A spokesman for Mr. Miles said he bought the shares because he felt they were "a good investment."  The executive made his purchases shortly before being named to his current chief executive officer's position; formerly he was Kraft General Foods' chief operating officer.  ---  SHEDDING GLITTER: Two directors of Pegasus Gold Inc., a Spokane, Wash., precious-metals mining firm, sold most of their holdings in the company Aug. 31.  John J. Crabb sold 4,500 shares for $11.13 each, leaving himself with a stake of 500 shares.  He received $50,085.  Peter Kutney sold 5,000 shares, all of his holdings, for $11.38 a share, or $56,900.  Gary Straub, corporate counsel for the company, said the directors sold for "personal financial reasons."  Both insiders declined to comment.  On Wall Street, Merrill Lynch & Co. analyst Daniel A. Roling rates the stock "neutral" and Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. lists it as a "buy."  Pegasus Gold "has been on a lot of recommended lists as a junior growth company stepping into the big leagues," says Marty McNeill, metals analyst at Dominick & Dominick, a New York investment firm.  "It's a good company, and growing; there's nothing that would warrant that it be sold."  Yesterday, in composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, Pegasus closed at $10.125, up 12.5 cents.  Medieval philosophers used to hold the sensible belief that it was more perfect to exist than not to exist, and that to exist as a matter of necessity was most perfect of all.  Now, only God exists as a matter of absolute necessity; it is built into His nature.  But since the time of Darwin, we humans could at least claim a sort of natural necessity for the existence of our species.  Aren't we, after all, the inevitable culmination of that stately pageant called evolution?  If mutation and natural selection slowly but surely give rise to more and more advanced forms of life, then it was only a matter of eons before splendid beings endowed with reason, self-awareness and taste shimmered onto the scene.  Now along comes Stephen Jay Gould to dash this flattering illusion.  His credentials are excellent for the task.  Star lecturer at Harvard, author of numerous popular books on science, and scourge of the creationist lobby, Mr. Gould is perhaps the world's most eminent evolutionary theorist.  Yet he puts quite a twist on the old story handed down from Darwin.  For him, natural history is anything but a gradual, predictable march from primordial slime to human consciousness; it is a careening, chaotic affair in which the emergence of a featherless biped was a one-in-a-million shot.  In "Wonderful Life: The Burgess Shale and the Nature of History" (Norton, 326 pages, $19.95), Mr. Gould makes his case for "the awesome improbability of human evolution."  The argument turns on the discovery in 1909 of an amazing fossil quarry high in the Canadian Rockies called the Burgess Shale.  Here, in an area smaller than a city block, lay buried traces of countless weird creatures that had frolicked more than 500 million years ago -- creatures whose anatomical variety far exceeded what can be found in all the world's oceans today.  Such an embarrassment of riches was inconceivable to the man who discovered the Burgess Shale, one Charles Doolittle Walcott.  The received Darwinian wisdom of the day said that animals living so long ago must be simple in design, limited in scope and ancestral to contemporary species.  Accordingly, the hidebound traditionalist reconstructed hypothetical organisms from the Burgess fossils in such a way that they could be shoehorned into familiar categories.  It was not until the early 1970s that Cambridge Prof.  Harry Whittington and two sharp graduate students began to publish a reinterpretation of the Burgess Shale.  By making clever inferences about how the squashed and distorted fossil remains corresponded to three-dimensional structures, this trio was able to piece together a series of wondrous beasties quite unlike anything currently on the planet.  One was so fantastic in appearance, it was dubbed Hallucigenia.  Would that Mr. Gould's minute descriptions of these creatures was always so colorful.  A good deal of the book is boring, particularly the endless allusions to high and pop culture and the frequent jokes festooning the text.  These turns do not provide sufficient relief from sentences like, "Most modern chelicerates have six uniramous appendages on the prosoma."  Interest picks up, though, when Mr. Gould gets around to discussing the meaning of the Burgess oddities for the theory of evolution.  Not long after the appearance of life, evidently, there was an explosive proliferation in the number of animal designs seen on the earth.  The vast majority of them, however, were wiped out by a succession of environmental upheavals that were too sudden and catastrophic for the normal rules of natural selection to operate.  Consequently, the winnowing process was like a lottery "in which each group {held} a ticket unrelated to its anatomical virtues."  So much for survival of the fittest.  So much, too, for the notion that we humans triumphed in the Darwinian struggle by evolving big brains.  Our mammalian forerunners lucked out through the extraterrestrial impact that did in the dinosaurs because they were small, not smart.  If anyone has difficulty imagining a world in which history went merrily on without us, Mr. Gould sketches several.  In one, birds are the dominant carnivores; in another the seas abound with "little penises."  Back when the Burgess fauna were flourishing, it seems, human evolutionary hopes hung on the survival of a little worm with a backbone called Pikaia.  Mr. Gould finds this oddly exhilarating; like an existentialist of old, he views our contingency as "a source of both freedom and consequent moral responsibility."  I, by contrast, cannot help feeling that if some other curiosity from the Burgess Shale had survived instead, beings at once wiser and less boorish than Homo sapiens might have eventually gained earthly dominion.  But even if no conscious life had evolved here at all, the universe is a big place, and given the right conditions, sympathetic to creating some form of life.  Surely at some other cosmic address a Gouldoid creature would have risen out of the ooze to explain why, paleontologically speaking, "it is, indeed, a wonderful life."  ---  Mr. Holt is a columnist for the Literary Review in London.  The Justice Department scrambled to play down the significance of its new guidelines concerning prosecutions under the federal racketeering law.  The guidelines were distributed to U.S. attorneys last summer but were disclosed for the first time by press reports this week.  They discourage prosecutors, under certain circumstances, from seeking court orders seizing the assets of racketeering defendants prior to trial.  But David Runkel, chief Justice Department spokesman, said the guidelines "are a codification and a clarification far more than a new direction."  Use of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law against white-collar defendants, as opposed to alleged organized-crime figures, has come under attack from some defense lawyers and legal scholars.  Critics have complained that the law unfairly strips defendants of assets before a jury determines they have committed a crime and that aggressive use of the forfeiture provisions can ruin corporate defendants or force them into unfavorable plea bargains.  In the new guidelines, the Justice Department says that in attempting to freeze disputed assets before trial, "the government will not seek to disrupt the normal, legitimate business activities of the defendant" and "will not seek. . .to take from third parties assets legitimately transferred to them."  The guidelines also state, "The government's policy is not to seek the fullest forfeiture permissible under the law where that forfeiture would be disproportionate to the defendant's crime."  Another provision clarifies certain limits on when prosecutors may use tax-fraud charges as a basis for bringing a racketeering case.  Mr. Runkel declined to speculate on whether the guidelines would curb racketeering prosecutions against corporate defendants.  "The impact, if there is any, will be impossible to judge ahead of time because the decision whether to use {racketeering charges} is made in individual cases" by Justice Department officials in Washington, he said.  In a memorandum describing the guidelines, Assistant Attorney General Edward Dennis Jr. said that government efforts to freeze defendants' assets pending racketeering prosecutions "have been the subject of considerable criticism in the press."  But Mr. Runkel said the government isn't "backing off on these kinds of matters at all."  California legislators, searching for ways to pay for the $4 billion to $6 billion in damages from last week's earthquake, are laying the groundwork for a temporary increase in the state's sales tax.  The talk of a sales tax rise follows a rebuff from Congress on the question of how much the federal government is willing to spend to aid in California's earthquake relief efforts.  The state had sought as much as $4.1 billion in relief, but yesterday the House approved a more general scaled-back measure calling for $2.85 billion in aid, the bulk of which would go to California, with an unspecified amount going to regions affected by Hurricane Hugo.  That leaves the state roughly $2 billion to $4 billion short.  A sales tax increase appears to be the fastest and easiest to raise funds in a hurry.  According to the state department of finance, a one-penny increase in the state's six-cent per dollar sales tax could raise $3 billion.  Willie Brown, speaker of California's Assembly, said that Gov. George Deukmejian has agreed to schedule a special session of the legislature within two weeks.  California's so-called Gann limit effectively prevents the state from spending new tax money and so drastically limits its options in an emergency.  Both Mr. Brown, the state's most influential legislator, and Gov. Deukmejian favor a temporary sales tax increase -- should more money be needed than the state can raise from existing sources and the federal government.  According to a spokesman, the governor is also studying the possibility of raising state gasoline taxes.  Mr. Brown, meanwhile, believes "only one tax will be feasible, and it will be a one-penny sales tax increase," said Chuck Dalldorf, an aide.  One immediate source of money is an emergency fund set up by Gov. Deukmejian.  The fund has about $1 billion and is set up to handle "precisely the kind of emergency" the state faces, said Tom Beermann, the Governor's deputy press secretary.  But the fund's size is disputed by Mr. Brown's office, which estimates the fund holds from $630 million to $800 million.  Moreover, an aide to Mr. Brown said Gov. Deukmejian "has expressed a desire not to spend all the reserve on this."  To push through a sales tax increase, however, the state will have to suspend the Gann limit, citing an emergency.  And then it will be required to lower taxes by a corresponding amount during a three-year period after the temporary tax increase ends, said Cindy Katz, assistant director of the state department of finance.  A sales tax increase would require two-thirds approval in both houses of the state's legislature.  But observers expect broad support.  "If there's an emergency and there aren't sufficient funds from elsewhere, I think the attitude will be supportive," said Kirk West, president of the California Chamber of Commerce.  But others think property owners ought to pay a higher portion of the state's earthquake relief tab.  Since the late 1970s, California property owners have benefited from a tax rollback as a result of a state ballot initiative known as Proposition 13.  The state could also increase gasoline taxes; every one penny increase in the tax would yield $11 million a month.  But Gov. Deukmejian and others are reluctant to do anything to harm the state's chances of sharply raising gasoline taxes on a permanent basis.  To raise more highway funds, a measure to double the state's nine-cent a gallon tax over five years is set to appear on the state's June election ballot.  But some fear imposing a temporary gasoline tax increase in the meantime could undercut support among voters for the measure.  Not everyone is convinced the state must raise new revenue to meet its earthquake needs.  "It's possible, though not probable," that the state could get by with its existing resources and federal help, said Quentin Kopp, chairman of the state senate's transportation committee.  Separately, two men injured in last week's earthquake-triggered freeway collapse in Oakland began a legal battle against the state over whether officials adequately heeded warnings about the structure's safety.  The claims, which were filed with the State Board of Control but will probably end up in court, are the first arising out of the collapse of the so-called Cypress structure viaduct.  The men can defeat immunities that states often assert in court by showing that officials knew or should have known that design of the structure was defective and that they failed to make reasonable changes.  A Board of Control spokesman said the board had not seen the claim and declined to comment.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Exxon Capital Corp. -- $200 million of 8 1/4% notes due Nov. 1, 1999, priced at 99.60 to yield 8.31%.  The notes, which are noncallable, were priced at a spread of 45 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated triple-A by both Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through Salomon Brothers Inc.  Citicorp -- $200 million of 8 3/4% notes due Nov. 1, 1996, priced at 99.64 to yield 8.82%.  The noncallable issue was priced at a spread of 98 basis points above the Treasury's seven-year note.  Rated single-A-1 by Moody's and double-A by S&P, the issue will be sold through Salomon Brothers.  Boatmen's Bancshares Inc. -- $150 million of 9 1/4% subordinated notes due Nov. 1, 2001, priced at 99.821 to yield 9.275%.  The noncallable issue was priced at a spread of 140 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated single-A-3 by Moody's and single-A-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Morgan Stanley & Co.  Xerox Corp. -- $150 million of 8 3/4% notes due Nov. 1, 1995, priced at 99.555 to yield 8.85%.  The noncallable issue was priced to yield 105 basis points above the Treasury's fiveyear note.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Salomon Brothers.  American General Finance Corp. -- $150 million of 8.45% notes due Oct. 15, 2009, through Bear, Stearns & Co., being offered at a price of 99.661 to yield 8.50%.  The noncallable issue, which has a one-time put Oct. 15, 1999, was priced at a spread of 66 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  The issue is rated single-A-1 by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P.  Baltimore Gas & Electric Co. -- $100 million of first and refunding mortgage bonds, due Oct. 15, 1999, through Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., offered at par to yield 8.40%.  The noncallable issue is rated double-A-3 by Moody's and double-A-minus by S&P.  It was priced at a spread of 55 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  @ MUNICIPALS  Massachusetts -- $230 million of general obligation bonds, consolidated loan of 1989, Series D, due 1990-2009, through a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group.  The insured bonds, rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P, were priced to yield from 6.00% in 1990 to 7.20% in 2009.  Broward County School District, Fla. -- $185 million of school district general obligation bonds, Series 1989, due 1991-1999 and 2008, tentatively priced by a First Boston Corp. group to yield from 6.20% in 1991 to 7.30% in 2008.  There are $120.7 million of 7 1/8% term bonds due 2008, priced to yield 7.30%.  Serial bonds are priced to yield to 7% in 1999.  The bonds are rated single-A-1 by Moody's and double-A-minus by S&P.  Culver City Redevelopment Financing Authority, Calif. -- $145 million of revenue bonds, Series 1989, tentatively priced by a Stone & Youngberg group.  The issue includes $100 million of insured senior lien bonds.  These consist of current interest bonds due 1990-2002, 2010 and 2015, and capital appreciation bonds due 2003 and 2004, tentatively priced to yield from 5.75% in 1990 to 7.14% in 2010.  Bonds due 2003, 2004 and 2015 aren't being formally reoffered.  There are also $40 million of uninsured subordinate lien bonds, due Dec. 1, 2008, and Dec. 1, 2015.  There are $15,015,000 of 7 1/2% bonds priced at par and due 2008 and $24,985,000 of 7.6% bonds priced at par and due 2015.  The insured bonds are rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  The uninsured subordinate lien bonds aren't rated, according to the lead underwriter.  West Virginia Parkways, Economic Development and Tourism Authority -- $143 million of parkway revenue bonds, Series 1989, with current interest bonds due 1990-2002 and 2019 and capital appreciation bonds due 2003-2008, tentatively priced by a PaineWebber Inc. group to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.31% in 2019.  There are $86,525,000 of 7 1/8% bonds priced at 97 3/4 to yield 7.31% in 2019.  Current interest serial bonds are tentatively priced to yield to 7.05% in 2002.  Capital appreciation bonds are priced to yield to maturity from 7.10% in 2003 to 7.25% in 2007 and 2008.  The bonds are insured and rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  Connecticut Housing Finance Authority -- $132.8 million of housing mortgage revenue bonds priced by a PaineWebber Inc. group.  The $82.8 million of Series B bonds, which aren't subject to the alternative minimum tax, were priced at par to yield from 6.85% in 2000 to 7.20% in 2009.  Meanwhile, the $50 million of Series C bonds, which are suject to the alternative minimum tax, were priced at par to yield from 6.25% in 1990 to 7.10% to 2000.  The issue is expected to receive a double-A rating from Moody's, the underwriter said.  An S&P rating of double-A-plus has already been confirmed.  Montgomery County, Md. -- $75 million of general obligation, Series B, consolidated public improvement bonds of 1989, through a Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. group.  The bonds, rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P, were priced to yield from 5.75% in 1990 to 6.90% in 2006 to 2009.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $500 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered by Prudential-Bache Capital Funding Inc.  There were no details available on the pricing of the issue, Freddie Mac's Series 108.  The issue is backed by Freddie Mac 8 1/2% securities.  @ EUROBONDS  Hanwa Co. (Japan) -- Two-part, $800 million issue of bonds due Nov. 9, 1994, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 3/8% coupon at par.  European portion of $700 million via Yamaichi International Europe Ltd. Asian portion of $100 million via Yamatane Securities Europe Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Nov. 28, 1989, through Oct. 26, 1994, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Oct. 26.  Japan Storage Battery Co. -- $100 million of bonds due Nov. 9, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 3 7/8% coupon at par via Nikko Securities Co. (Europe) Ltd. Guaranteed by Mitsubishi Bank Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Nov. 27, 1989, through Oct. 26, 1993, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Nov. 1.  Sanraku Inc. (Japan) -- $100 million of bonds due Nov. 9, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 3 7/8% coupon at par, via Nomura International.  Guaranteed by Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Nov. 21, 1989, through Oct. 19, 1993, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Oct. 31.  Nippon Signal Co. (Japan) -- 80 million marks of bonds with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 1 1/2% coupon, due Nov. 9, 1994, and priced at par, via Commerzbank.  Guaranteed by Fuji Bank.  Each 5,000 mark bond carries one warrant and one certificate for four warrants, exercisable from Dec. 18, 1989, to Oct. 26, 1994, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% above the closing share price when prices are fixed Oct. 30.  Miyoshi Oil & Fat Co. (Japan) -- 120 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Dec. 31, 1993, with a fixed 0.25% coupon at par, via Union Bank of Switzerland.  Put option on Dec. 31, 1991, at a fixed 107 to yield 3.43%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc bond convertible from Nov. 28, 1989, to Dec. 20, 1993, at a 5% premium over closing share price Oct. 30, when terms are scheduled to be fixed.  Fokker N.V. (Netherlands) -- 150 million Swiss francs of convertible bonds due Nov. 15, 1997, with a fixed 4% coupon at par via Union Bank of Switzerland.  Each 5,000 Swiss franc bond convertible from Jan. 3, 1989, to Oct. 31, 1997.  Fees 2 1/8.  Sapporo Lion Ltd. (Japan) -- 50 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Dec. 31, 1994, with a 0.25% coupon at par, via Yamaichi Bank (Switzerland).  Put option on Dec. 31, 1991, at an indicated 107 7/8 to yield 3.84%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Dec. 1, 1989, to Dec. 16, 1994, at 5% premium over the closing share price Oct. 26, when terms are scheduled to be fixed.  Credit Local de France -- 100 million Swiss francs of 6%, privately placed notes due Dec. 1, 1996, priced at 100 1/2 to yield 5.91%, via Swiss Bank Corp.  People start their own businesses for many reasons.  But a chance to fill out sales-tax records is rarely one of them.  Red tape is the bugaboo of small business.  Ironically, the person who wants to run his or her own business is probably the active, results-oriented sort most likely to hate meeting the rules and record-keeping demands of federal, state and local regulators.  Yet every business owner has to face the mound of forms and regulations -- and often is the only one available to tackle it.  There is hope of change.  Last week, Sen. Malcolm Wallop (R., Wyo.) held hearings on a bill to strengthen an existing law designed to reduce regulatory hassles for small businesses.  "A great many federal regulations are meant for larger entities and don't really apply to small businesses," says Marian Jacob, a legislative aide to Sen. Wallop.  Other lawmakers are busy trying to revive the recently lapsed Paperwork Reduction Act, which many feel benefited small enterprises.  Thus, optimistic entrepreneurs await a promised land of less red tape -- just as soon as Uncle Sam gets around to arranging it.  Meanwhile, they tackle the mounds of paper -- and fantasize about a dream world where bulk-mail postal regulations and government inspectors are banished.  To find out what red tape riles entrepreneurs most, the Journal asked a completely unscientific, random sample of business owners to fantasize about the forms and regulations they would most like to get lost in the mail.  Some entrepreneurs say the red tape they most love to hate is red tape they would also hate to lose.  They concede that much of the government meddling that torments them is essential to the public good, and even to their own businesses.  Rules that set standards for products or govern business behavior, generally the best regarded form of red tape, "create a level playing field and keep unscrupulous competitors away," says Sidney West, president of TechDesign International Inc., a Springfield, Va., business that designs telecommunication and other products.  Mr. West cites the Federal Communications Commission and its standards for telecommunications equipment: "They monitor product quality and prevent junk from flooding the market."  Some gripes about red tape are predictable: Architects complain about a host of building regulations, auto leasing companies about car insurance rules.  Determining when handicapped access is required can be a nightmare for architects, says Mark Dooling, president of Dooling & Co., a Newton, Mass., architectural firm.  There is such a maze of federal, state and local codes that "building inspectors are backing away from interpreting them," Mr. Dooling says.  Taxi, leasing and other companies that maintain fleets of vehicles devote substantial resources to complying with state insurance laws and a host of agencies.  "It's very costly and time-consuming," says Phil Rosen, a partner in Fleet & Leasing Management Inc., a Boston car-leasing company.  One senior executive at his firm spends nearly 20% of his time on insurance, he says.  Other forms of red tape are more pervasive.  The most onerous, many entrepreneurs say, is the record-keeping and filing required by tax authorities.  Complying with environmental and workplace regulations runs a close second.  But gripes run the gamut.  Here is the red tape that irks surveyed business owners the most:  ENVIRONMENTAL REGULATIONS: Next to medical insurance, "costs of compliance" are the fastest-growing expense at Impco Inc., a Providence, R.I., chemical company.  Peter Gebhard, the company's owner, says spending on regulatory paper work and the people to do it -- mostly to comply with federal, state and local environmental laws -- will rise almost 30% this year to $100,000.  Mr. Gebhard adds that spending on environmental red tape amounts to between 6.5% and 7.5% of Impco's total operating expenses.  Eastern Reproduction Corp., a Waltham, Mass., maker of thin metal precision parts, must report to five federal and state agencies as well as to local fire, police, hospital and plumbing authorities, says Robert Maguire, president.  One state environmental regulator returned a report because "it wasn't heavy enough, it couldn't have been correct," Mr. Maguire says.  WITHHOLDING RULES: Employers must deposit withholding taxes exceeding $3,000 within three days after payroll -- or pay stiff penalties -- and that's a big problem for small businesses.  It's especially nettlesome "if you're on the road and you're the one responsible," says Eddie Brown, president of Brown Capital Management Inc., a Baltimore money-management firm.  EMPLOYEE MANUALS: Revising employee manuals on pensions, health care and other subjects costs over $25,000 a year for Bert Giguiere, president of Professional Agricultural Management Inc., a Fresno, Calif., provider of business services to farmers.  An employer leaves itself open to a great deal of liability if its employee manuals don't reflect the most recent laws, he says.  But the ever-changing laws are usually so complicated and confusing that "you need professionals to help you; you can't do it yourself," he adds.  PENSION AND PROFIT-SHARING RULES: Complying with these is enough to make business owners look forward to their own pension days.  Yearly changes in federal benefit laws force small businesses to repeatedly re-evaluate and redesign existing plans.  Alice Fixx, who runs her own public-relations concern in New York, says she has had to overhaul her pension and profit-sharing plans three times in the past three years.  "It doesn't increase benefits, but it's costly and time-consuming," Ms. Fixx says.  Compliance added 15% to 20% to her accounting bill last year, she says.  SALES TAX RECORDS: Advertising agencies and other service companies are exempt from city and state sales tax in most locales -- but the exemption comes at a price of exhaustive records and rigorous reviews.  To justify their exempt status and avoid penalties, these businesses must show once a year that each and every transaction on which they didn't pay sales tax was a legitimate business expense.  "You need one person to just take care of sales tax," says Jennie Tong, executive vice president of Lee Liu & Tong Advertising Inc., New York.  When the Trinity Repertory Theater named Anne Bogart its artistic director last spring, the nation's theatrical cognoscenti arched a collective eyebrow.  Ms. Bogart, an acclaimed creator of deconstructed dramatic collages that tear into such sacred texts as Rodgers and Hammerstein's "South Pacific," is decidedly downtown.  Trinity Rep meanwhile is one of the nation's oldest and most respected regional theaters, still hosting an annual "A Christmas Carol."  How would this bastion of traditional values fare in Ms. Bogart's iconoclastic hands?  She held her fire with her first production at the Trinity earlier this season.  It was a predictable revival of her prize-winning off-Broadway anthology of Bertolt Brecht's theoretical writings, called "No Plays, No Poetry."  Now, with the opening of Maxim Gorky's bourgeois-bashing "Summerfolk," Ms. Bogart has laid her cards on the table.  Hers is a hand that will test the mettle of her audiences.  For Ms. Bogart, who initially studied and directed in Germany (and cites such European directors as Peter Stein, Giorgio Strehler and Ariane Mnouchkine as influences) tends to stage her productions with a Brechtian rigor -- whether the text demands it or not.  And Gorky, considered the father of Soviet socialist realism, did not write plays that easily lend themselves to deliberately antirealistic distancing techniques.  Gorky was a loyal if occasionally ambivalent proletarian writer committed to enlightening the masses with plain speaking rooted in a slightly sour version of Chekhovian humanism.  And "Summerfolk," penned in 1904 as a kind of sequel to Chekhov's "Cherry Orchard," is a lawn party of Russian yuppies engaged in an exhausting ideological fight to the finish between the allrightniks and the reformers.  Along the way there also are lots of romantic dalliances.  Wisely Ms. Bogart has kept Gorky's time and place intact.  Despite the absence of samovars (and a tendency to turn the furniture upside down), the production is rich in Russian ennui voiced by languorous folk sporting beige linen and rumpled cotton, with boaters and fishing poles aplenty.  But beyond this decorative nod to tradition, Ms. Bogart and company head off in a stylistic direction that all but transforms Gorky's naturalistic drama into something akin to, well, farce.  The director's attempt to force some Brechtian distance between her actors and their characters frequently backfires with performances that are unduly mannered.  Not only do the actors stand outside their characters and make it clear they are at odds with them, but they often literally stand on their heads.  Like Peter Sellars, Ms. Bogart manipulates her actors as if they were rag dolls, sprawling them on staircases, dangling them off tables, even hanging them from precipices while having them perform some gymnastic feats of derring-do.  There are moments in this "Summerfolk" when the characters populating the vast multilevel country house (which looks like a parody of Frank Lloyd Wright and is designed by Victoria Petrovich) spout philosophic bon mots with the self-conscious rat-a-tat-tat pacing of "Laugh In."  "Talk hurts from where it spurts," one of them says.  The clash of ideologies survives this treatment, but the nuance and richness of Gorky's individual characters have vanished in the scuffle.  As for the humor that Gorky's text provides, when repainted in such broad strokes (particularly by the lesser members of the ensemble) it looks and sounds forced.  Ms. Bogart does better with music than with words when she wants, as she so often does want, to express herself through Gorky's helpless play.  Here she has the aid of her longtime associate Jeff Helpern, whom she appointed Trinity's first-ever musical director and whom she equipped with a spanking new $60,000 sound system and recording studio.  For Gorky, Mr. Helpern provided an aural collage of Debussy and Rachmaninoff, which is less a score than a separate character with a distinct point of view.  Like Brecht, and indeed Ezra Pound, Ms. Bogart has said that her intent in such manipulative staging of the classics is simply an attempt to "make it new."  Indeed, during a recent post-production audience discussion, the director explained that her fondest artistic wish was to find a way to play "Somewhere Over the Rainbow" so that the song's "original beauty comes through," surmounting the cliche.  The danger that Ms. Bogart seems to be courting here is one of obfuscation rather than rejuvenation, a vision so at odds with the playwright's that the two points of view nullify, rather than illuminate, each other.  Ms. Bogart's cast is part and parcel of the problem.  Ed Shea and Barbara Orson never find a real reason for their love affair as the foolish, idealistic young Vass and the tirelessly humanitarian doctor Maria Lvovna.  Cynthia Strickland as the long-suffering Varvara is a tiresome whiner, not the inspirational counterrevolutionary Gorky intended.  Better to look in the corners for performances that inspire or amuse.  Janice Duclos, in addition to possessing one of the evening's more impressive vocal instruments, brings an unsuspected comedic touch to her role of Olga, everybody's favorite mom.  Marni Rice plays the maid with so much edge as to steal her two scenes.  But it is the Trinity Rep newcomer, Jonathan Fried (Zamislov, the paralegal) who is the actor to watch, whether he is hamming it up while conducting the chamber musicians or seducing his neighbor's wife (Becca Lish) by licking her bosom. ---  Ms. de Vries writes frequently about theater.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  MORGAN STANLEY, THE ONCE STODGY investment house, in 1974 helped a corporate client complete a hostile takeover.  It was the start of a boom in unfriendly, even ungentlemanly, mergers.  On July 18, 1974, International Nickle of Canada -- advised by Morgan -- offered $28 a share, equal to $157 million, for ESB, a Philadelphia battery maker.  ESB said it was given only a three-hour advance warning on a "take it or leave it" basis from Inco, as the Toronto company is called.  "ESB is aware that a hostile tender offer is being made by a foreign company for all of ESB's shares," said F.J. Port, ESB's president.  "Hostile" thus entered the merger-acquisition lexicon.  Joseph Flom, of Skadden, Arps, Slote, Meagher & Flom, which became a leading legal firm in merger cases, said the case "made takeovers respectable."  ESB spurned Inco and within five days ESB had a "white knight" as United Aircraft -- headed by Harry Gray, a shrewdly friendly acquirer of companies -- offered $34 a share.  Gray was advised by Goldman Sachs and Merrill Lynch.  ESB directors warmly accepted, but a whirlwind bidding match ensued.  Within a few days in July, Inco raised its bid to $36 and United matched it.  On a single day Inco lifted its offer to $38 and then to $41, equal to $225.5 million.  United met the $38 but then withdrew.  ESB on July 29 accepted the Inco offer and the brief battle -- unlike the intricate and lengthy big takeovers of 1984-1989 -- was over.  The new gritty game became a money maker for Wall Street's once austere old-name houses.  Inco paid Morgan an advisory fee of about $250,000, a paltry figure by today's measures.  Early this year Morgan and three other investment houses each received $25 million in advisory fees from Kohlberg Kravis & Roberts in its $25 billion friendly buy-out of RJR Nabisco.  HomeFed Corp. said third-quarter net income slid 14% to $23.9 million, or $1.10 per fully diluted share, from $27.9 million, or $1.21 a fully diluted share, because of increased bad assets and unexpected trouble in unloading foreclosed property.  The decline surprised analysts and jolted HomeFed's stock, which lost 8.6% of its value, closing at $38.50 on the New York Stock Exchange, down $3.625.  HomeFed had been one of the handful of large West Coast thrifts that in recent quarters had counteracted interest-rate problems dogging the industry by keeping a lid on problem assets and lending heavily into the furious California housing market.  Analysts had been projecting fully diluted earnings in the third quarter in the range of about $1.30 a share.  However, HomeFed's loan originations and purchases plunged 26% in the quarter, to $1.4 billion from $1.9 billion a year earlier.  Meanwhile, non-performing assets rose to $593 million from $518.7 million.  Some $380 million of the troubled assets is repossessed real estate, a 55.6% surge from the $244.2 million of repossesed property HomeFed held a year ago.  HomeFed has $17.9 billion of assets.  HomeFed said most of the troubled assets are apartment complexes, shopping malls and other commercial real estate.  It said about half are in California, with the rest scattered across the country.  It said sales of such properties were slower than anticipated in the third quarter, but it expects sales to pick up in the rest of the year.  HomeFed said the slide in loan originations was more a matter of design than a sign of cooling in the California market.  Any such downturn in California would be grim news for West Coast thrifts, particularly the less healthy ones, which have performed poorly even with a torrid market.  But HomeFed said it purposely curbed loan originations in the quarter because of uncertainty over the new capital requirements and regulations that will emerge from negotiations over implementing the government's massive thrift bailout bill.  It said its real-estate operations earned a record $21.7 million, more than double year-earlier real estate profit of $9 million.  And analysts said they see no signs of an imminent swoon in California real estate, even with last week's earthquake.  The thrift said earnings also were nicked in the quarter by a $4 million provision for losses associated with its previously reported plan to liquidate a real-estate franchise network.  For the nine months, HomeFed earned $82.5 million, or $3.52 a fully diluted share, a 4.3% increase from year-earlier net income of $79.1 million, or $3.43 a fully diluted share.  Yields on certificates of deposit at major banks were little changed in the latest week.  The average yield on six-month CDs of $50,000 and less slipped to 7.96% from 8.00%, according to Banxquote Money Markets, an information service based here.  On one-year CDs of $50,000 and less, the average slid to 8.02% from 8.06%.  Both issues are among the most popular with individual investors.  "Because of shrinkage in the economy, rates can be expected to decline over a one-year horizon," said Norberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote.  "It's unclear how much rates can fall and how soon."  Changes in CD yields in the week ended Tuesday were in line with blips up and down within a fairly narrow range for the last two months.  Interest rates generally began declining last spring after moving steadily upward for more than a year.  The average yield on small-denomination three-month CDs moved up two-hundredths of a percentage point in the latest week to 7.85%.  Long-term CDs declined just a fraction.  The average yield on both two-year CDs and five-year CDs was 7.98%.  Only CDs sold by major brokerage firms posted significant increases in average yields in the latest week, reflecting increased yields on Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction.  The average yield on six-month broker-sold CDs rose to 8.29% from 8.05% and on one-year CDs the average yield rose to 8.30% from 8.09%.  The brokerage firms, which negotiate rates with the banks and thrifts whose CDs they sell, generally feel they have to offer clients more than they can get on T-bills or from banks and thrifts directly.  T-bills sold at Monday's auction yielded 7.90% for six months and 7.77% for three months, up from 7.82% and 7.61%, respectively, the week before.  So-called jumbo CDs, typically in denominations of $90,000 and up, also usually follow T-bills and interest rate trends in general more than those aimed at small investors.  Some jumbos posted fractional changes in average yields this week, both up and down.  The average yield on threemonth jumbos rose to 8.00% from 7.96%, while the two-year average fell by the same amount to 7.89%.  Six-month and oneyear yields were unchanged, on average.  "The (CD) market is unsettled right now," said Banxquote's Mr. Mehl.  "It's very easily influenced by changes in the stock market and the junk bond market."  The small changes in averages reflect generally unchanged yields at many major banks.  Some, however, lowered yields significantly.  At Chase Manhattan Bank in New York, for example, the yield on a small denomination six-month CD fell about a quarter of a percentage point to 8.06%.  In California, Bank of America dropped the yield on both six-month and one-year "savings" CDs to 8.33% from 8.61%.  Yields on money-market deposits were unchanged at an average 6.96% for $50,000 and less and down just a hundredth of a percentage point to 7.41% for jumbo deposits.  Lion Nathan Ltd. agreed to buy the franchise to bottle, distribute and market Pepsi-Cola soft-drink products in Australia, the company said.  The New Zealand brewing and retail concern didn't disclose terms.  The agreement is effective Jan. 1 and is subject to approval from Australia's Foreign Investment Review Board.  Cadbury Schweppes Australia Ltd. has held the Australian Pepsi franchise for the past four years.  Lion Nathan and PepsiCola Australia, a unit of PepsiCo Inc. of the U.S., didn't say why Cadbury Schweppes will no longer hold the franchise.  Wang Laboratories Inc. has sold $25 million of assets and reached agreements in principle to sell an additional $187 million shortly, Richard Miller, president, said at the annual meeting.  He said Wang had reached an agreement with a "major financial firm" to sell for $150 million its domestic equipment lease portfolio and that of its Wang Credit Corp. subsidiary.  He said it also agreed to sell a portion of its European real estate unit for $37 million.  Mr. Miller said that Wang has already sold some $12 million of miscellaneous assets and disclosed that it had received $13 million from Compaq Computer Corp., Houston, in the previously announced sale of its Stirling, Scotland, plant.  Mr. Miller repeated that in the next six months he plans to sell another $200 million to $300 million of assets to repay debt and reduce interest costs at Wang, a minincomputer maker in Lowell, Mass.  In response to questions after the annual meeting, Mr. Miller said the company is no longer looking for an equity investor.  During the summer, Wang executives had said they might seek outside investment.  Murata Mfg.  Co. said it is establishing a subsidiary in Britain to produce electric parts, including ceramic condensers.  The Tokyo maker of ceramic capacitors said it purchased a plant in Plymouth.  The company didn't disclose a purchase price or capitalization figures.  Murata said, however, it will invest about 1.4 billion yen ($9.9 million) in the new company.  Production is slated to begin in April.  The company, which has a European foothold, Murata Europe Management G.m.b.H. in Germany, said the latest venture is designed to meet demand for electric parts in European Community countries ahead of the creation of the unified market by the end of 1992.  Murata expects sales at the unit of about 1.5 billion yen in the first year.  Safeway Stores Inc. reported a 69% decline in profit for the fiscal third quarter, but said operating improvements were masked by unusual gains in the year-earlier period.  The Oakland grocery retailer, closely held since a $4.2 billion leveraged buy-out in 1986, said profit for the three months ended Sept. 9 was $7.1 million, compared with $23 million a year earlier.  But it said the year-earlier results included gains of $23.5 million from divestitures.  Sales rose 4.2% to $3.31 billion from $3.2 billion.  For the nine months, the company said profit fell 49% to $23.5 million from $46 million in the year-earlier quarter, which included divestiture-related gains of $50.6 million.  Sales increased 5.5% to $9.81 billion from $9.3 billion.  Benjamin Jacobson & Sons has been the New York Stock Exchange specialist firm in charge of trading stock in UAL Corp. and its predecessors since the early 1930s.  But the firm has never had a day like yesterday.  At first UAL didn't open because of an order imbalance.  When it did a half-hour into the session, it was priced at $150 a share, down more than $28 from Monday's close.  It sank further to as low as $145, but a big rally developed in the last half hour, pushing the stock back up to close at $170, down just $8.375 from Monday.  In the process, 4.9 million shares traded, making UAL the second most active issue on the Big Board.  Munching pizza when they could and yelling until their voices gave out, the two Benjamin Jacobson specialists at the Big Board's UAL trading post yesterday presided over what can only be described as a financial free-for-all.  "It was chaotic.  But we like to call it 'controlled chaos,'" said 47-year-old Robert J. Jacobson Jr., grandson of the firm's founder.  He manned the UAL post yesterday with Christopher Bates, 33, an energetic Long Islander who's a dead ringer for actor Nicolas Cage.  Who was doing all the selling?  "Options traders, arbitrage traders -- everyone," said Mr. Bates, cooling down with a carton of apple juice after the close yesterday.  Added Mr. Jacobson, "There were some pretty bad losses in the stock."  Big Board traders said a 200,000-share buy order at $150 a share entered by Bear, Stearns & Co., which was active in UAL stock all day, is what set off the UAL crowd in the late afternoon.  A subsequent rally in UAL helped the staggering stock market stage an astonishing recovery from an 80-point deficit to finish only slightly below Monday's close.  Both Jacobson traders, who had been hoping UAL trading would get back to normal, read the news about the unraveling of UAL takeover plans on the train into work yesterday morning.  The news told them it would be a while longer before UAL resumed trading like a regular airline stock after months of gyrations.  When Mr. Jacobson walked into the office at 7:30 a.m. EDT, he announced: "OK, buckle up."  Messrs.  Jacobson and Bates walked on the Big Board floor at about 8:45 a.m. yesterday and immediately spotted trouble.  Already entered in the Big Board's computers and transmitted to their post were sell orders for 65,000 UAL shares.  The UAL news had already caused a selling furor in the so-called third market, in which firms buy and sell stock away from the exchange floor.  UAL, which closed on the Big Board Monday at $178.375 a share, traded in the third market afterward as low as $158 a share.  There were rumors of $148-a-share trades.  In the 45 minutes before the 9:30 opening bell, the Jacobson specialists kept getting sell orders, heavier than they imagined.  And at 9:15, they posted a $135 to $155 "first indication," or the price range in which the stock would probably open.  That range was quickly narrowed to $145 to $155, although traders surrounding the post were told that $148 to $150 would be the likely target.  When UAL finally opened a half hour late, some 400,000 shares traded at $150.  There was "selling pressure from everyone," said one trader.  This month's Friday-the-13th market plunge spurred by UAL news wasn't as bad for the Jacobson specialists as yesterday's action.  On that earlier day, the stock's trading was halted at a critical time so the specialists could catch their breath.  Not yesterday.  Mr. Jacobson, his gray hair flying, didn't wear out his red-white-and-blue sneakers, but he sweat so much he considered sending out for a new shirt.  Mr. Bates usually handles day-to-day UAL trading on his own.  But yesterday, the heavy trading action eventually consumed not only Messrs.  Jacobson and Bates but four other Jacobson partners, all doing their specialist-firm job of tugging buyers and sellers together and adjusting prices to accommodate the market.  About 30 floor traders crammed near the UAL post most of the day, and probably hundreds more came and went -- a "seething mass," as one trader described it.  The 4.9 million-share volume flowing through the Jacobson specialist operation was about five times normal for the stock.  The heavy buying in the last half hour led the specialists to take special steps.  The Bear Stearns order that marked the late-day turnaround caused a "massive buying effort" as UAL jumped $20 a share to $170 in the last half hour, said Mr. Bates.  With 15 seconds of trading to go, Mr. Jacobson, with what voice he had left, announced to the trading mob: "We're going to trade one price on the bell."  That meant no trading would occur in the final seconds, as a way of making sure that last-second orders aren't subjected to a sudden price swing that would upset customers.  About 11,000 shares sold at $170 on the bell, representing about eight to 10 late orders, the specialists estimate.  Big Board traders praised the Jacobson specialists for getting through yesterday without a trading halt.  In Chicago, a UAL spokesman, "by way of policy," declined to comment on the company's stock or the specialists' performance.  Leaving the exchange at about 5 p.m., the Jacobson specialists made no predictions about how trading might go today.  Said Earl Ellis, a Jacobson partner who got involved in the UAL action, "It all starts all over again" today.  Britain's current account deficit dropped to #1.6 billion ($2.56 billion) in September from an adjusted #2 billion ($3.21 billion) the previous month, but the improvement comes amid increasing concern that a recession could strike the U.K. economy next year.  The Confederation of British Industry's latest survey shows that business executives expect a pronounced slowdown, largely because of a 16-month series of interest-rate increases that has raised banks' base lending rates to 15%.  "The outlook has deteriorated since the summer, with orders and employment falling and output at a standstill," said David Wigglesworth, chairman of the industry group's economic committee.  He also said investment by businesses is falling off.  Of 1,224 companies surveyed, 31% expect to cut spending on plant equipment and machinery, while only 28% plan to spend more.  But despite mounting recession fears, government data don't yet show the economy grinding to a halt.  Unemployment, for example, has continued to decline, and the September trade figures showed increases in both imports and exports.  As a result, Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher's government isn't currently expected to ease interest rates before next spring, if then.  Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson views the high rates as his chief weapon against inflation, which was ignited by tax cuts and loose credit policies in 1986 and 1987.  Officials fear that any loosening this year could rekindle inflation or further weaken the pound against other major currencies.  Fending off attacks on his economic policies in a House of Commons debate yesterday, Mr. Lawson said inflation "remains the greatest threat to our economic well-being" and promised to take "whatever steps are needed" to choke it off.  The latest government figures said retail prices in September were up 7.6% from a year earlier.  Many economists have started predicting a mild recession next year.  David Owen, U.K. economist with Kleinwort Benson Group, reduced his growth forecast for 1990 to 0.7% from 1.2% and termed the risk of recession next year "quite high."  But he said the downturn probably won't become a "major contraction" similar to those of 1974 and 1982.  Still, Britain's current slump is a cause for concern here as the nation joins in the European Community's plan to create a unified market by 1992.  Compared with the major economies on the Continent, the U.K. faces both higher inflation and lower growth in the next several months.  As a result, Mr. Owen warned, investment will be more likely to flow toward the other European economies and "the U.K. will be less prepared for the single market."  Britain's latest trade figures contained some positive news for the economy, such as a surge in the volume of exports, which were 8.5% higher than a year earlier.  But while September exports rose to #8.43 billion, imports shot up to #10.37 billion.  The resulting #1.9 billion merchandise trade deficit was partly offset by an assumed surplus of #300 million in so-called invisible items, which include income from investments, services and official transfers.  Despite the narrowing of the monthly trade gap, economists expect the current account deficit for all of 1989 to swell to about #20 billion from #14.6 billion in 1988.  Increasingly, economists say the big deficit reflects the slipping competitive position of British industry.  "When the country gets wealthier, we tend to buy high-quality imports," Mr. Owen said.  Vickers PLC, a British aerospace, defense and automotive conglomerate, said it reached an agreed cash bid of #108.2 million ($173.3 million) for Ross Catherall Group PLC, a maker of specialty alloy and ceramics.  The company said it expects to receive acceptances for its offer of 253 pence ($4.05) per share representing at least 67% of Ross Catherall's issued share capital, or 12.7 million ordinary shares.  Vickers said its offer also includes an option to receive a redeemable loan note in lieu of cash.  The notes can be redeemed starting in July 1991.  The company said its acquisition of Ross Catherall will be covered largely by cash raised in its July disposal of Howson-Algraphy for #241.7 million.  If bluebloods won't pay high prices for racehorses anymore, who will?  Breeders are betting on the common folk.  The Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association, a Lexington, Ky.-based trade group, has launched "seminars" for "potential investors" at race tracks around the country.  The group, which has held half a dozen seminars so far, also is considering promotional videos and perhaps a pitch to Wall Street investment bankers.  "People in this business have been insulated," says Josh Pons, a horse breeder from Bel Air, Md.  "But the real future of this game is in a number of people owning a few horses."  At the Laurel race track, the breeders are romancing people like Tim Hulings, a beer packaging plant worker.  Right now, Mr. Hulings is waving his racing program, cheering for Karnak on the Nile, a sleek thoroughbred galloping down the home stretch.  Mr. Hulings gloats that he sold all his stocks a week before the market plummeted 190 points on Oct. 13, and he is using the money to help buy a 45-acre horse farm.  "Just imagine how exciting that would be if that's your horse," he says.  But experts caution that this isn't a game for anyone with a weak stomach or wallet.  "It's a big-risk business," warns Charles C. Mihalek, a Lexington attorney and former Kentucky state securities commissioner.  "You have to go into it firmly believing that it's the kind of investment where you can lose everything."  And many have done just that.  Consider Spendthrift Farm, a prominent Lexington horse farm that went public in 1983 but hit hard times and filed for bankruptcy-court protection last year.  A group of investors recently bought the remaining assets of Spendthrift, hoping to rebuild it.  Other investors have lost millions in partnerships that bought thoroughbred racehorses or stallion breeding rights.  One big problem has been the thoroughbred racehorse market.  From 1974 to 1984, prices for the best yearlings at the summer sales rose 918% to an average of $544,681.  Since then, prices have slumped, to an average of $395,374 this summer.  But that's for the best horses, with most selling for much less -- as little as $100 for some pedestrian thoroughbreds.  Even while they move outside their traditional tony circle, racehorse owners still try to capitalize on the elan of the sport.  Glossy brochures circulated at racetracks gush about the limelight of the winner's circle and high-society schmoozing.  One handout promises: "Pedigrees, parties, post times, parimutuels and pageantry."  "It's just a matter of marketing and promoting ourselves," says Headley Bell, a fifth-generation horse breeder from Lexington.  Maybe it's not that simple.  For starters, racehorse buyers have to remember the basic problem of such ventures: These beasts don't come with warranties.  And for every champion, there are plenty of nags.  Katherine Voss, a veteran trainer at the Laurel, Md., track, offers neophytes a sobering tour of a horse barn, noting that only three of about a dozen horses have won sizable purses.  One brown two-year-old filly was wheezing from a cold, while another had splints on its legs, keeping both animals from the racetrack.  "You can see the highs and lows of the business all under one roof," she tells the group.  "There aren't too many winners."  Perhaps the biggest hurdle owners face is convincing newcomers that this is a reputable business.  Some badly managed partnerships have burned investors, sometimes after they received advice from industry "consultants."  So owners have developed a "code of ethics," outlining rules for consultants and agents, and disclosure of fees and any conflicts of interest.  But some are skeptical of the code's effectiveness.  "The industry is based on individual honesty," says Cap Hershey, a Lexington horse farmer and one of the investors who bought Spendthrift.  Despite the drop in prices for thoroughbreds, owning one still isn't cheap.  At the low end, investors can spend $15,000 or more to own a racehorse in partnership with others.  At a yearling sale, a buyer can go solo and get a horse for a few thousand dollars.  But that means paying the horse's maintenance; on average, it costs $25,000 a year to raise a horse.  For those looking for something between a minority stake and total ownership, the owners' group is considering a special sale where established horse breeders would sell a 50% stake in horses to newcomers.  BUELL INDUSTRIES Inc. halved its quarterly dividend to five cents a share, payable Nov. 17 to stock of record Nov. 3.  The company's quarterly dividend had been 10 cents a share since April 30, 1988.  Buell recently said it would incur an aftertax charge of about $3.6 million in its fourth quarter ending Tuesday, in connection with the sale and discontinuance of several lines at a plant.  The Waterbury, Conn., maker of industrial fasteners and metal stampings has 2.3 million shares outstanding.  Dunkin' Donuts Inc., battling a takeover proposal by Canada's DD Acquisition Corp., said that its directors will evaluate takeover offers submitted by Nov. 10.  Dunkin' Donuts, based in Randolph, Mass., previously said it would explore "alternatives," including a leveraged buy-out of the company, but hadn't set a date for submission of proposals.  Dunkin' Donuts Chairman and Chief Executive Robert M. Rosenberg said "a sale is one alternative being considered," but he added the board hasn't decided whether to sell the doughnut franchiser.  DD Acquisition, jointly owned by Unicorp Canada Corp.'s Kingsbridge Capital Group unit and Cara Operations Ltd., has made a $45-a-share tender offer valued at $268 million for Dunkin' Donuts.  Dunkin' Donuts' announcement followed DD Acquisition's request to the Delaware Court of Chancery Monday to set a trial date for its suit against the company.  The trial had been postponed to allow Dunkin' Donuts to seek alternatives to DD Acquisition's offer.  Combustion Engineering Inc. said third-quarter net income of $22.8 million, reversing a $91.7 million year-earlier loss.  The Stamford, Conn., power-generation products and services company said per-share earnings were 56 cents compared with the year-ago loss of $2.39.  Sales fell 1.5% to $884 million from $897.2 million.  Strong profit in the process industries, including chemical and pulp and paper, were offset by higher interest expense and by lower earnings as the company closed out certain long-term contracts.  Combustion reported improved profits in its automation and control products businesses, and it narrowed its losses in its public sector and environmental segment.  Power generation had higher sales but lower earnings; the company cited factors including work on certain low profit-margin contracts from previous years.  Net in the latest quarter included a pretax gain of $22.4 million from the sale of Combustion's minority interest in Stein Industrie to GEC Alsthom N.V. of the Netherlands.  Last year's results reflected a gain of $28.2 million on disposition of assets and a $165 million pretax provision mainly from costs of completing certain waste-to-energy and other power plants.  Claude Bebear, chairman and chief executive officer, of Axa-Midi Assurances, pledged to retain employees and management of Farmers Group Inc., including Leo E. Denlea Jr., chairman and chief executive officer, if Axa succeeds in acquiring Farmers.  Mr. Bebear added that the French insurer would keep Farmers' headquarters in Los Angeles and "will not send French people to run the company."  Axa would also maintain Farmers' relationships with the insurance exchanges that it manages.  Mr. Bebear made his remarks at a breakfast meeting with reporters here yesterday as part of a tour in which he is trying to rally support in the U.S. for the proposed acquisition.  The bid is part of Sir James Goldsmith's unfriendly takeover attempt for B.A.T Industries PLC, the British tobacco, retailing, paper and financial-services giant that acquired Farmers last year for $5.2 billion.  Axa has agreed to acquire Farmers from Sir James's investment vehicle, Hoylake Investments Ltd., for $4.5 billion plus a $1 billion investment in Hoylake.  Any acquisition of Farmers needs the approval of insurance commissioners in the nine states where Farmers operates, and Mr. Bebear's trip will take him to Idaho, Arizona and New York after his stay here; he will meet with insurance regulators, legislators, industry excutives and the press.  Hearings on Axa's acquisition application have been set for Nov. 13 in Idaho; Nov. 20 in Illinois; Nov. 24 and Dec. 4 in Arizona; Dec. 11 in Washington state; and Jan. 8 in Oregon.  Hearings haven't yet been set in Texas, Ohio and Kansas.  California's insurance commissioner doesn't hold hearings on acquisition applications.  Although Axa has been rebuffed by Farmers and hasn't had any meetings with management, Mr. Bebear nonetheless appears to be trying to woo the company's executives with promises of autonomy and new-found authority under Axa.  He said Mr. Denlea would be a member of the top management team of the Axa-Midi group of companies, and would "help define policies and strategies of the group."  Farmers was quick yesterday to point out the many negative aspects it sees in having Axa as its parent.  For one, Axa plans to do away with certain tax credits that have resulted in more than $600 million paid to the Farmers exchanges during the past few years to offset underwriting losses.  Those credits result because of taxes that Farmers, as the management company, has paid, and have "proved to be very important for the exchanges," a Farmers spokesman said.  Mr. Bebear contended that the tax cost to the exchanges under the revised structure would be about $8 million a year, which he described as "peanuts."  Honeywell Inc., Minneapolis, said it completed its previously announced sale of 16% of the shares outstanding in its Japanese joint venture, Yamatake-Honeywell, for $280 million.  The stake was acquired by a group of 10 Japanese financial institutions and industrial corporations, primarily insurance companies, Honeywell said.  Proceeds will be used to repurchase as many as 10 million shares of Honeywell stock, as previously announced.  Honeywell said a second sale of Yamatake-Honeywell is still being negotiated.  The company, which now holds a 34% stake in the venture, has indicated that it intends to retain at least a 20% stake long term.  A 20% stake would allow Honeywell to include Yamatake earnings in its results.  A company spokesman said the gain on the sale couldn't be estimated until the "tax treatment has been determined."  OPPENHEIMER CAPITAL LIMITED PARTNERSHIP increased the quarterly distribution to 40 cents a limited partnership unit from 36.25 cents.  The distribution represents available cash flow from the partnership between Aug. 1 and Oct. 31.  It is payable Nov. 30 to units of record Oct. 31.  The money manager is controlled 67.7% by its top officers and top officers of Oppenheimer & Co., a securities firm.  Both firms are in New York.  Oppenheimer Capital has about 7.9 million limited partnership units outstanding.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, the units closed at $15.125, up 12.5 cents.  Bank of Montreal said it added 850 million Canadian dollars (US$725.8 million) to its reserves against losses on Third World loans, bringing the total it has set aside this year to C$1 billion.  The bank said the C$1 billion in reserves will result in a charge of C$595 million against earnings but said it still expects to report a profit for the year ending Tuesday.  The bank reported net income of C$389 million for the nine months ended July 31.  The bank said the increase in loan-loss provisions won't affect the payment of dividends.  The bank said reserves now amount to 61% of its total less-developed-country exposure.  Excluding Mexico, reserves equal 95% of LDC exposure.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading, Bank of Montreal closed at C$33.25, up 87.5 Canadian cents.  Knight-Ridder Inc. said third-quarter earnings jumped 18%, partly because of the sale of two of its media properties.  The media concern said net income rose to $37.8 million, or 72 cents a share, from $32 million, or 57 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  The latest results include a gain of $4.2 million, or eight cents a share, on the sale of television stations in Oklahoma City and Flint, Mich.  Revenue increased 7.5% to $540.9 million from $503.1 million.  Robert F. Singleton, Knight-Ridder's chief financial officer, said the company was "pleased" with its overall performance, despite only single-digit growth in newspaper revenue.  That division's revenue rose 2.3% to $472.5 million from $461.9 million in the year-ago period.  Gains in advertising revenue, however, resulted in operating profit of $78.4 million -- up 20% from $65.6 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Knight Ridder closed at $51.50 a share, down 12.5 cents.  ALBERTA ENERGY Co., Calgary, said it filed a preliminary prospectus for an offering of common shares.  The natural resources development concern said proceeds will be used to repay long-term debt, which stood at 598 million Canadian dollars (US$510.6 million) at the end of 1988.  The company plans to raise between C$75 million and C$100 million from the offering, according to a spokeswoman at Richardson Greenshields of Canada Ltd., lead underwriter.  The shares will be priced in early November, she said.  General Electric Co. executives and lawyers provided "misleading and false" information to the Pentagon in 1985 in an effort to cover up "longstanding fraudulent" billing practices, federal prosecutors alleged in legal briefs.  The government's startling allegations, filed only days before the scheduled start of a criminal overcharge trial against GE in Philadelphia federal district court, challenge the motives and veracity of the nation's third-largest defense contractor.  In a strongly worded response summarizing a filing made in the same court yesterday, GE asserted that "prosecutors have misstated the testimony of witnesses, distorted documents and ignored important facts."  The company attacked the government's allegations as "reckless and baseless mudslinging," and said its management "promptly and accurately reported" to the Pentagon all relevant information about billing practices.  The case strikes at the corporate image of GE, which provides the military with everything from jet engines and electronic warfare equipment to highly classified design work on the Strategic Defense Initiative, and could cause a loss of future defense contracts if Pentagon and Justice Department officials take a tough stance.  The company has been considered an industry leader in advocating cooperation and voluntary disclosures of improper or inflated billing practices.  But the government now claims that a group of company managers and lawyers engaged in an elaborate strategy over five years to obscure from federal authorities the extent and details of "widespread" fraudulent billing practices.  The problems were uncovered during a series of internal investigations of the company's Space Systems division, which has been the focus of two separate overcharge prosecutions by the government since 1985.  The dispute stems from pretrial maneuvering in the pending court case, in which prosecutors have been demanding access to a host of internal company memos, reports and documents.  Last November, a federal grand jury indicted GE on charges of fraud and false claims in connection with an alleged scheme to defraud the Army of $21 million on a logistics computer contract.  The company, for its part, maintains that many of the disputed documents are privileged attorney-client communications that shouldn't be turned over to prosecutors.  A hearing is scheduled on the issue today.  The government's 136-page filing covers events leading up to the current case and an earlier indictment in March 1985, when GE was accused of defrauding the Pentagon by illegally claiming cost overruns on Minuteman missile contracts.  GE pleaded guilty and paid a fine of more than $1 million in the Minuteman case, which involved some of the same individuals and operations that are at the center of the dispute in the Philadelphia court.  In order to show that all of its units had corrected billing problems and therefore should become eligible again for new contracts, prosecutors contend that "high-level GE executives" and company lawyers provided "misleading statements" to then-Air Force Secretary Verne Orr and other Pentagon officials during a series of meetings in 1985.  Overall, the government contends that GE's disclosure efforts largely were intended to "curry favor" with Pentagon officials without detailing the extent of the management lapses and allegedly pervasive billing irregularities uncovered by company investigations.  Prosecutors depict a company that allegedly sat on damaging evidence of overcharges from 1983 to 1985, despite warnings from an internal auditor.  When GE finally disclosed the problems, prosecutors contend that Mr. Orr "was erroneously informed that the {suspected} practices had only just been discovered" by GE management.  In its brief, the government asserted that it needs the internal GE documents to rebut anticipated efforts by GE during the trial to demonstrate "its good corporate character."  GE, which was surprised by the last-minute subpoena for more than 100 boxes and file cabinets of documents, countered that senior GE managers didn't find out about questionable billing practices until 1985, and that the information was passed on quickly to Mr. Orr at his first meeting with company representatives.  Subsequent meetings, initiated after the company and two of its units were briefly suspended from federal contracts, were held to familiarize Mr. Orr with the company's self-policing procedures and to disclose additional information, according to GE.  GE's filing contends that the billing practices at the heart of the current controversy involved technical disputes rather than criminal activity.  The company's conduct "does not even raise a question of wrongful corporate intent, ratification or cover-up," GE's brief asserts.  "On the contrary, it shows a corporation reacting swiftly and aggressively to very difficult issues in largely uncharted waters."  Mr. Orr couldn't be reached for comment yesterday.  Applied Solar Energy Corp. of City of Industry, Calif., said it and its majority shareholder, American Cyanamid Co., signed a non-binding letter of intent for the acquisition of Applied Solar by McDonnell Douglas Corp. for about $38 million.  The proposed acquisition provides for a cash payment of $10 a share at closing and a contingent payment of as much as 80 cents a share placed in escrow.  Details of the escrow agreement haven't been completed, the companies said.  There are 3.5 million shares of Applied Solar, of which American Cyanamid owns 2.7 million.  American Cyanamid is a Wayne, N.J., chemicals, drugs and fertilizer concern.  Completion of the acquisition is subject to execution of a definitive agreement, approval by all three companies' boards and the approval of Applied Solar's shareholders.  An Applied Solar spokesman said completion is expected at the end of the year or early next year.  A spokeswoman for the St. Louis aerospace and defense concern said it wanted the acquistion because Applied Solar is involved in solar cells and solid-state laser components, and this fits with McDonnell's business of laser applications for military space.  Trading in Cineplex Odeon Corp. shares was halted on the New York and Toronto stock exchanges late yesterday afternoon at the company's request, Toronto Stock Exchange officials said.  Brian Hemming, a spokesman for the company's committee of independent directors, established in May to solicit and evaluate offers for the company, said it was expected to make an announcement early this morning.  But Mr. Hemming said he wasn't aware of the nature of the talks under way between committee members and their advisers.  Cineplex traded on the New York Stock Exchange at $11.25 a share, up $1.125, before trading was halted.  Analysts have speculated in recent days that the value of offers received by the committee fell well short of what they had hoped, or even that the company's chairman, president and chief executive officer, Garth Drabinsky, is the only bidder for the company as a whole.  The current effort to auction off the company was triggered by a dispute between Mr. Drabinsky and the Toronto-based movie chain's major shareholder, MCA Inc.  London share prices closed sharply lower Tuesday on the back of Wall Street's steep drop and renewed fears over U.K. economic fundamentals.  Tokyo's winning streak came to an end, and stocks fell in Frankfurt and across Europe as well.  London's Financial Times 100-share index shed 40.4 points to finish at 2149.3.  At London's close, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was 51.23 points lower at 2611.68.  Dealers said the initial pressure came from mildly disappointing U.K. trade figures for September and a worrisome report by the Confederation of British Industry that a decline in orders for manufactured goods is depressing both business optimism and investment plans for the coming year.  The trade and CBI reports refocused attention on high interest rates and corporate profitability and helped rekindle underlying concerns over prospects for a recession in the U.K., dealers said.  The 30-share index fell 33.3 points to 1739.3.  Volume was a modest 405.4 million shares traded, but better than the year's lowest turnover of 276.8 million Monday.  Market watchers also noted an absence of institutional interest later in the session helped pave the way for broader declines when Wall Street opened weaker.  They added that market-makers were knocking share prices down in midafternoon in a bid to attract some interest, but the action largely helped open the way for London's late declines.  Insurance stocks provided some early support to the market, partly on favorable brokerage recommendatons and talk of continental European interest in British life and composite insurers.  British life insurer London & General, which firmed 2 pence to 356 pence ($5.70), and composite insurer Royal Insurance, which finished 13 lower at 475, were featured in the talk.  On the life insurance side, Pearl Group finished 5 lower at 640, and Sun Life dropped 15 to #11.53.  Jaguar finished 4 lower at 694.  Dealers said the market didn't react substantially to Ford Motor Co.'s disclosure to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that it will seek 100% of Jaguar's shares outstanding when U.K. government share regulations are lifted at the end of next year.  Tokyo stocks closed easier, posting their first loss in six trading days, partly because of programmed index-linked selling by trust investment funds in the afternoon session.  The Nikkei index fell 58.97 points to 35526.55.  The index gained 99.14 points Monday.  In early trading in Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index rose 17.92 points to 35544.47.  On Tuesday, the Tokyo stock price index of all first section issues was down 6.31 at 2681.22.  First section volume was estimated at 900 million shares, up from 605 million Monday.  Observers said the market again failed to find a trading focus, discouraging much participation by investors.  The market, however, is expected to remain stable and expectations for future gains are high, traders said.  Such sentiment is being supported by word that a large amount of cash from investment trust funds is scheduled to enter the market later this week and in early November.  The expected amount is said to be 700 billion yen ($4.93 billion) to 1.05 trillion yen -- the second largest amount this year in a given period, following the record high set at the end of July, according to market observers.  In addition to a large amount of investment trust fund cash, analysts generally see the market environment improving compared with the past couple of weeks.  Toshiyuki Nishimura, an analyst at Yamaichi Securities, said, "The market sentiment is bullish, simply because there are few bad factors."  Buying activity Tuesday centered on a wide range of midcapitalization, domestic demand-related shares whose prices range from 1,000 to 2,000 yen.  Investors expect these shares will be targets of investment trust funds, which often buy small amounts spread across a wide range of issues.  On the other hand, high-priced shares such as Pioneer Electronic and Sony failed to spark investor interest because these issues are unlikely to be bought by investment trust funds, observers said.  Tuesday's notable losers were highpriced shares such as Pioneer, which shed 210 yen to 5,900 yen.  Sony was down 130 to 8,590.  TDK fell 120 to 5,960, Fuji Photo Film declined 160 to 4,830, and Fanuc dropped 160 to 7,440.  Share prices on the Frankfurt stock exchange closed sharply lower in thin dealings as worried investors remained idle as the result of two potentially destabilizing domestic developments.  The DAX index fell 15.85 to end at 1507.37.  Cutting against the downward trend was Continental, which jumped 4 marks to 346 marks ($187) in heavy trading on rumors that the tire maker is about to be taken over.  It jumped 7.5 Monday.  Traders said the market was exceptionally thin, as small investors remain on the sidelines.  Market participants say investors are not only licking their wounds following the turbulence last week, but they have also been made nervous by two events in West Germany.  On Sunday, the governing Christian Democratic Union suffered a series of setbacks, the extent of which became fully known only late Monday, in municipal elections in Baden-Wuerttemberg.  Traders say investors are worried that the CDU won't be able to hold office in federal elections at the end of 1990.  And statements by the chairman of the IG Metall labor union, Franz Steinkuehler, also cast a cloud over trading, dealers said.  Mr. Steinkuehler said at a convention in West Berlin that the union has to prepare for "a big fight" to achieve its main goal of a 35-hour workweek, down from current 37-hour workweek.  The decline in prices cut broadly through the blue-chip issues, as Siemens tumbled 7.5 to 544, Deutsche Bank plunged 7 to 657, and the auto makers fell sharply as well.  Daimler-Benz dropped 12.5 to 710.5, Bayerische Motoren Werke dropped 10.5 to 543.5, and Volkswagen lost 7.1.  Elsewhere, share prices closed lower in Zurich, Amsterdam, Milan and Stockholm.  Uneasiness about Wall Street was cited in several markets.  Prices closed lower in Sydney, Singapore and Wellington, were mixed in Hong Kong and higher in Taipei, Manila, Paris, Brussels and Seoul.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Oct 20 Oct 19 Year  @U.S. .................. 319.1 318.8 + 24.6  @Britain................ 651.7 654.5 + 19.3  @Canada................. 432.4 434.4 + 17.8  @Japan.................. 1550.4 1540.3 + 9.1  @France................. 530.4 533.9 + 19.8  @Germany................ 242.8 243.0 + 16.8  @Hong Kong.............. 2048.0 2016.6 + 0.9  @Switzerland............ 221.3 222.4 + 28.0  @Australia.............. 334.5 330.6 + 15.2  @World index............ 535.2 535.1 + 8.2  Directors of Bergen Bank and Den Norske Creditbank, two of Norway's leading banks, announced they had agreed to the formal merger of the banks.  The merger would create Scandinavia's seventh largest bank, with combined assets of 210 billion Norwegian kroner ($30.3 billion).  The banks said an application for a concession to merge into one entity to be called Den Norske Bank AS was sent Monday to the Finance Ministry.  The two boards said in a joint statement that the proposed merger agreement was considered in separate board meetings in Oslo Monday.  They said the agreement will be submitted to their respective supervisory boards next Wednesday.  Extraordinary general meetings, to be held Nov. 28, will decide the share exchange ratio.  The merger requires the approval of Norwegian authorities.  Savings and loans reject blacks for mortgage loans twice as often as they reject whites, the Office of Thrift Supervision said.  But that doesn't necessarily mean thrifts are discriminating against blacks, the agency said.  The office, an arm of the Treasury, said it doesn't have data on the financial position of applicants and thus can't determine why blacks are rejected more often.  Nevertheless, on Capitol Hill, where the information was released yesterday at a Senate banking subcommittee hearing, lawmakers said they are worried that financial institutions are routinely discriminating against minorities.  They asked regulators to suggest new ways to force banks and thrifts to comply with anti-discrimination laws.  Sen. Alan Dixon (D, Ill.), chairman of the subcommittee on consumer and regulatory affairs, said, "I'm not a statistician.  But when blacks are getting their loan applications rejected twice as often as whites -- and in some cities, it is three and four times as often -- I conclude that discrimination is part of the problem."  James Grohl, a spokesman for the U.S. League of Savings Institutions, said, "The data is a red flag, but lacking the financial data you can't make a case that discrimination is widespread."  The trade group official added: "Certainly the federal government should take a hard look at it."  Sen. Dixon held the hearing to follow up on a provision in the savings and loan bailout bill that required regulators to report on evidence of discimination in mortgage lending.  The legislation also requires broad new disclosures of the race, sex and income level of borrowers, but that information won't be gathered in new studies for several months at least.  The Federal Reserve said its studies in recent years, which adjust for income differences and other variables, showed that blacks received fewer home mortgages from banks and thrifts than whites.  But John LaWare, a Fed governor, told the subcommittee the evidence is mixed and that the Fed's believes the vast majority of banks aren't discriminating.  For instance, he noted, the Fed studies have shown that blacks receive more home improvement loans than whites.  Several lawmakers were angered that the bank and thrift regulators generally said they have been too busy handling the record number of bank and thrift failures in the past few years to put much energy into investigating possible discrimination.  "We would be the first to admit that we have not devoted the necessary amount of emphasis over the past several years" to developing examinations for discrimination, said Jonathan Fiechter, a top official of the Office of Thrift Supervision.  "If we've got folks out there who are being turned away in the mortgage market improperly and unfairly," said Sen. Donald Riegle (D., Mich.), chairman of the banking committee, "then that is a matter that needs remedy now, not six months from now, or six years from now, or 26 years from now."  Officials of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. and the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency said they have punished only a few banks for violations of anti-discrimination laws.  The FDIC said it has issued five citations to banks over the past three years for discriminatory practices.  The comptroller's office said it found no indications of illegal discrimination in 3,437 examinations of banks since April 1987.  The comptroller's office also said that of 37,000 complaints it received since January 1987, only 16 alleged racial discrimination in real estate lending.  The agency investigated the complaints but no violations were cited.  Thrift regulators didn't give any figures on their enforcement actions.  Mr. Fiechter said that among the possibilities being considered by regulators to fight discrimination is the use of "testers" -- government investigators who would pose as home buyers.  The Department of Housing and Urban Development has used testers to investigate discrimination in rental housing.  Using testers could be controversial with financial institutions, but Mr. Grohl said the U.S. League of Savings Institutions hadn't yet taken any position on the matter.  Time Warner Inc. is considering a legal challenge to Tele-Communications Inc.'s plan to buy half of Showtime Networks Inc., a move that could lead to all-out war between the cable industry's two most powerful players.  Time is also fighting the transaction on other fronts, by attempting to discourage other cable operators from joining Tele-Communications as investors in Showtime, cable-TV industry executives say.  Time officials declined to comment.  Last week, Tele-Communications agreed to pay Viacom Inc. $225 million for a 50% stake in its Showtime subsidiary, which is a distant second to Time's Home Box Office in the delivery of pay-TV networks to cable subscribers.  Tele-Communications, the U.S.'s largest cable company, said it may seek other cable partners to join in its investment.  Tele-Communications is HBO's largest customer, and the two have a number of other business relationships.  Earlier this year, Time even discussed bringing Tele-Communications in as an investor in HBO, executives at both companies said.  The purchase of the Showtime stake is "a direct slap in our face," said one senior Time executive.  Time is expected to mount a legal challenge in U.S. District Court in New York, where Viacom in May filed a $2.5 billion antitrust suit charging Time and HBO with monopolizing the pay-TV business and trying to crush competition from Showtime.  Executives involved in plotting Time's defense say it is now preparing a countersuit naming both Viacom and Tele-Communications as defendants.  The executives say Time may seek to break up the transaction after it is consummated, or may seek constraints that would prevent Tele-Communications from dropping HBO in any of its cable systems in favor of Showtime.  Viacom officials declined to comment.  Jerome Kern, Tele-Communications' chief outside counsel, said he wasn't aware of Time's legal plans.  But he said that any effort by Time to characterize the Tele-Communications investment in Showtime as anti-competitive would be "the pot calling the kettle black."  "It's hard to see how an investment by the largest {cable operator} in the weaker of the two networks is anti-competitive, when the stronger of the two networks is owned by the second largest" cable operator, Mr. Kern said.  In addition to owning HBO, with 22 million subscribers, Time Warner separately operates cable-TV system serving about 5.6 million cable-TV subscribers.  Tele-Communications controls close to 12 million cable subscribers, and Viacom has about one million.  In its suit against Time, Viacom says the ownership of both cable systems and cable-programming networks gives the company too much market power.  Time argues that in joining up with Tele-Communications, Viacom has potentially more power, particularly since Viacom also owns cable networks MTV, VH-1 and Nick at Nite.  Ironically, Tele-Communications and Time have often worked closely in the cable business.  Together, they control nearly 40% of Turner Broadcasting Systems Inc.; Tele-Communications has a 21.8% stake, while Time Warner has a 17.8% stake.  But since Time's merger with Warner Communications Inc., relations between the two have become strained.  Each company worries that the other is becoming too powerful and too vertically integrated.  Meanwhile, some legal observers say the Tele-Communications investment and other developments are weakening Viacom's antitrust suit against Time.  Viacom accuses Time in its suit of refusing to carry Showtime or a sister service, The Movie Channel, on Time's Manhattan Cable TV system, one of the nation's largest urban systems.  But yesterday, Manhattan Cable announced it will launch Showtime on Nov. 1 to over 230,000 subscribers.  Showtime has also accused HBO of locking up the lion's share of Hollywood's movies by signing exclusive contracts with all the major studios.  But Showtime has continued to sign new contracts with Hollywood studios, and yesterday announced it will buy movies from Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc., which currently has a non-exclusive arrangement with HBO.  The Federal Trade Commission said it authorized its staff to seek a preliminary injunction barring Imo Industries Inc. from acquiring the shares outstanding of the U.S. unit of the British company, United Scientific Holdings PLC, for $69 million.  The FTC said it "had reason to believe that the proposed acquisition could substantially reduce competition" in the production of certain image intensifier tubes, which are important components of night-vision devices sold primarily to the defense industry.  The FTC said it would seek to enjoin the proposed acquisition in a federal trial court, but declined to specify which one.  Under federal law, if the court grants a preliminary injunction, the FTC must begin administrative proceedings to determine the legality of the proposed stock purchase within 20 days.  Officials at the United Scientific unit, Optic-Electronic Corp. of Garland, Texas, and at Imo Industries of Lawrenceville, N.J., couldn't be reached for comment.  The airline industry's fortunes, in dazzling shape for most of the year, have taken a sudden turn for the worse in the past few weeks.  Citing rising fuel costs, promotional fare cuts and a general slowdown in travel, several major carriers have posted or are expected to post relatively poor third-quarter results.  Yesterday, USAir Group Inc., recently one of the industry's stellar performers, posted a worse-than-expected $77.7 million net loss for the period.  So far, the industry's fourth quarter isn't looking too strong either, prompting many analysts to slash earning projections for the rest of the year by as much as one-fourth.  And they say the outlook for 1990 is nearly as bad.  Airlines in 1989 "came in like a bang and are going out like a whimper," said Kevin Murphy, an airline analyst at Morgan Stanley & Co.  This turn of events has put a big damper on an industry that seemed almost invincible last spring, when fares were rising at double-digit rates and many carriers seemed to be growing fat on near-monopolies in certain markets.  Now, many airline companies might become a lot less attractive as takeover targets on Wall Street.  The downturn also raises questions about the carriers' ambitious orders for new airplanes, which currently total $32.5 billion over the next three years.  For travelers, though, the industry's problems have had some positive effects.  In recent weeks, airlines have cut numerous fares in leisure markets to try to win back customers.  Others have tried to spruce up frequent-flier programs.  Previously, airlines were limiting the programs because they were becoming too expensive.  Just last week, for example, Trans World Airlines and Pan Am Corp.'s Pan American World Airways went so far as to offer cash rebates or gift checks of $200 to $1,000 to certain frequent-flier members making trans-Atlantic flights in business class or first class.  The industry's slowdown became apparent this month when AMR Corp., parent of American Airlines, reported an 8.8% drop in third-quarter net income and said its fourth quarter would be "disappointing."  Shortly before that, USAir had said its third-quarter results would be "significantly lower" than a year earlier.  Yesterday, it provided the details: Its loss of $77.7 million, or $1.86 a share, contrasted with net of $68.5 million, or $1.58 a share, in the 1988 third quarter.  Revenue rose only 3.3% in the latest period, to $1.53 billion from $1.48 billion.  For the nine months, the Arlington, Va., company's net plunged 73% to $38.5 million, or 76 cents a share, from $142.2 million, or $3.28 a share.  Revenue rose 12% to $4.75 billion from $4.22 billion.  The results surprised many analysts, because USAir has almost no competition in its Pittsburgh hub and has expanded operations by completing its acquisition of Piedmont Airlines.  Shortly after announcing its quarterly loss, USAir's stock tumbled $3 a share.  It ended at $40.125, down $2.375, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  "Nobody was expecting this size of a loss," said Paul Karos, an analyst with First Boston Corp.  One airline executive, who declined to be identified, called the loss "amazing."  In announcing the results, USAir cited many of the same problems that several other industry officials have named recently.  It said the industry's domestic traffic was flat in the third quarter; analysts say this was because hefty fare increases earlier in the year scared off many leisure travelers this summer.  To try to combat the traffic slowdown, airlines started reducing fares; average fares rose only 1.7% in August, in contrast to increases of 16% each in February and March.  But so far, the effort has failed, and traffic is still slow.  Some other fare promotions have backfired.  This summer, the industry introduced a "kids fly free" program, in which children were allowed to fly free if they were traveling with an adult.  Airlines tried to restrict the program substantially by limiting the offer to certain days of the week, but it still was apparently used far more heavily than the airlines expected.  Airlines also say their frequent-flier programs are squeezing profits because awards are being redeemed at a heavier-than-normal rate.  One airline official said about three times as many free-travel coupons are being turned in as in previous years -- not surprisingly, as the airlines last year allowed many travelers to build up mileage at triple the normal rate.  Rising operating expenses are another problem.  Fuel costs were up 10% in the third quarter.  Labor costs, which leveled off in the past few years because of lower pay scales for newer employees, are on the upswing again at many carriers.  And some carriers are facing other unexpected headaches: USAir, for example, blamed some of its loss on merger expenses and on disruptions caused by Hurricane Hugo last month.  "We cannot quantify the total adverse effects of Hugo," said Edwin Colodny, chairman and president of USAir Group.  Whatever the cause for the downturn, few people are predicting any sudden improvement.  Airline Economics Inc., an aviation consulting firm, is projecting an industrywide operating profit of $2.5 billion for 1989, compared with earlier forecasts of $3 billion to $3.5 billion.  As for 1990, the firm predicts that profit will slip to between $1 billion and $1.5 billion.  Good grief] Charlie Brown is selling out.  Those Metropolitan Life ads were bad enough.  But now, Charlie Brown is about to start pitching everything from Chex Party Mix to light bulbs.  Why is he cashing in now?  Turns out that next year, Charlie Brown, Snoopy and the gang turn 40 -- and Scripps Howard's United Media unit, the syndicator and licensing agent for Charles Schulz's comic strip, sees a bonanza in licensing the cartoon characters to a bevy of advertisers for ads, tie-ins and promotions.  "Peanuts has become a major part of American culture," says Peter Shore, United Media's vice president of marketing and licensing.  The comic strip "has a magical, everlasting quality about it.  Our plan is to honor Charles Schulz and the strip all year long."  The effort will make the Peanuts gang very familiar pitchmen in 1990.  General Electric plans to use the characters to plug its Miser light bulb.  Teleflora will run TV ads at Valentine's Day promoting its "Snoopy's Love Bouquet."  Ralston Purina will promote its Chex Party Mix's three new flavor packets named for Charlie Brown, Lucy and Linus.  The characters will also be featured in a new public service effort for the United Way.  Beyond the advertisements, the syndicator is planning a traveling arena show, new TV specials for CBS and even an exhibit at the Smithsonian Institute.  The yearlong schedule of festivities will be kicked off officially with a combination live and animation half-time special at the Super Bowl in January.  All the tie-ins, though, have some marketing experts questioning whether the party may go too far.  "There are too many people participating," says Al Ries, of Trout & Ries, a Greenwich, Conn., marketing consulting firm.  "If you want to cut through the clutter, you have to make your message as distinct, sharp and individual as possible.  Sharing a character with other advertisers isn't a way to do that."  But United Media says it's very scrupulous with the contracts it hands out.  "We're not interested in promoting every single product that comes along," Mr. Shore says.  Metropolitan Life ad executives couldn't be reached about the use of the Peanuts characters by others.  But Mr. Shore says that company's exclusive advertising rights extend only to the insurance and financial services category.  ---  Berry Rejoins WPP Group  Norman Berry, the creative executive who was apparently squeezed out of Ogilvy & Mather in June, is returning to Ogilvy's parent company, WPP Group PLC.  Mr. Berry, 58, had resigned after being asked by Ogilvy 's chairman and chief executive officer, Kenneth Roman, to give up his title as creative head of the New York office and to take a fuzzier international role.  Yesterday, just a day after Mr. Roman announced he would leave to take a top post at American Express, WPP said Mr. Berry would return to take an international role at the parent company.  Mr. Berry said the timing was a coincidence and that his decision was unrelated to Mr. Roman's departure.  RJR Taps FCB/Leber  RJR Nabisco Inc. awarded its national broadcast media-buying assignment to FCB/Leber Katz Partners, the New York outpost of Chicago-based Foote, Cone & Belding.  The naming of FCB/Leber Katz Partners as agency of record for Nabisco Brands Inc. and Planters LifeSavers Co. follows RJR Nabisco's announcement last week that it will disband its RJR Nabisco Broadcast division and dismiss its 14 employees Dec. 1. to cut costs.  New York-based RJR Nabisco wouldn't say what it spends annually, but industry executives say it will spend more than $140 million this year, down from about $200 million last year.  Ad Notes. . . .   EARNINGS: Interpublic Group of Cos. said third-quarter net rose 15% to $6.9 million, or 21 cents a share, from $6 million, or 18 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  Revenue increased more than 5% to $283.2 million from $268.6 million.  HOLIDAY PROMOTION: PepsiCo Inc. will give away 4,000 sets of "Game Boy," Nintendo's new hand-held video game in a two-month promotion scheduled to begin Nov. 1.  Pepsi said it will spend $10 million advertising the promotion.  International Business Machines Corp. agreed to acquire a 15% stake in Paxus Corp., an Australian computer-software and information-services concern, for 20 million Australian dollars (US$17 million).  The investment will be made through IBM Australia Ltd., a unit of IBM, the two companies said yesterday.  IBM can raise its stake in Paxus to 20% over three years, but agreed to not go beyond 20% in that time.  Paxus said in a statement it has several "well developed product and services relationships" with the U.S. computer company, and plans to expand these links.  The company earns about half its revenue overseas and plans further expansion.  A majority stake in Paxus currently held by NZI Corp. will be diluted to slightly less than 50% after IBM acquires its interest.  The agreement requires approval from Australia's Foreign Investment Review Board and National Companies and Securities Commission, and from shareholders of Paxus.  Bond Corp. Holdings Ltd.'s consolidated debt totals 6.9 billion Australian dollars (US$5.32 billion), including A$1.6 billion of bonds convertible into shares.  Alan Bond, chairman and controlling shareholder of the cash-strapped Australian media, brewing, resources and property concern, disclosed the debt figures yesterday.  The disclosure follows last Friday's news that Bond Corp. incurred an overall loss of A$980.2 million for the fiscal year ended June 30, the largest loss in Australian corporate history.  The debt load would have been higher but for a reduction of A$5 billion over the past year from asset sales, Mr. Bond said at a business gathering.  Mr. Bond indicated the consolidated debt figures, which include debt of units such as Bell Group Ltd., will be published soon in Bond Corp.'s 1989 annual accounts.  He predicted the debt will be reduced by another A$3.8 billion this fiscal year ending June 30, 1990, but didn't explain how this will be achieved.  Mr. Bond blamed rising Australian interest rates and the acquisition of Bell Group "with its very high levels of shortterm debt" for producing a condition "that was no longer sustainable.  "In order to restore confidence and ensure the support of our principal lenders," Mr. Bond said, "we embarked on fundamantal changes in the structure and direction of the group."  That reassessment resulted in continuing asset sales, as well as write-offs exceeding A$1.1 billion last fiscal year.  "In essence we have made a decision to clear the decks," Mr. Bond told the meeting.  While some assets have been written down, others are undervalued in the accounts, Mr. Bond maintained.  Among these are the company's Australian brewing assets, in the books at A$950 million but actually worth A$2.5 billion, he said.  An investment in Chile's telephone company is carried at US$300 million but really worth US$500 million, and the company's property portfolio is undervalued by at least A$250 million, Mr. Bond said.  Mr. Bond forecast that by next June, "what will emerge will be a company with a honed sense of purpose . . . a stable balance sheet, with good-quality assets in brewing, telecommunications, media and property."  He didn't name energy resources in that list, signaling that all the company's coal and oil interests might be for sale in total or in part.  Some of the oil interests already have been sold.  Mercedes-Benz of North America Inc., Grosse Pointe Shores, Mich., estimated it will sell about as many cars in 1990 as the 75,000 it expects to deliver this year.  Mercedes officials said they expect flat sales next year even though they see the U.S. luxury-car market expanding slightly.  Erich Krampe, president of the U.S. sales arm of West German auto maker Daimler Benz AG, predicted luxury-car sales will rise to 840,000 in 1990 from 830,000 this year primarily because of the new Japanese makes.  Most of the growth, he said, will come in the $35,000-to-$50,000 price range, where Mercedes has a 35% U.S. market share.  Mercedes sold 82,348 cars in 1988.  Mr. Krampe also said that Mercedes plans to bring out new models every year through the mid-1990s and it will shorten its product development cycle to eight years from 10 or 12 years to compete more effectively with Toyota Motor Corp.'s Lexus, Nissan Motor Co.'s Infiniti and Honda Motor Co.'s Acura luxury-car divisions.  Homestake Mining Co., San Francisco, blamed the continued slump in gold prices for an 83% plunge in third-quarter net income to $2 million, or two cents a share, from $11.2 million, or 12 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 5% to $110.4 million from $105.4 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Homestake closed at $15.25, down 25 cents.  "A significant increase in gold sales to 248,279 ounces for the quarter from 188,726 in the third quarter of 1988 was more than offset by the continued decline in average gold price realization to $367 from $429 per ounce," the company said.  For the nine months, the mining company posted a 40% drop in profit to $30.1 million, or 31 cents a share, from $50.6 million, or 52 cents a share, on a 6% rise in revenue to $323.2 million from $305.7 million.  The Treasury plans to raise $1.8 billion in new cash with the sale Monday of about $15.6 billion in short-term bills to redeem $13.81 billion in maturing bills.  The offering will be divided evenly between 13-week and 26-week bills maturing Feb. 1, 1990, and May 3, 1990, respectively.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum $10,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EST Monday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  The Treasury said it will alter the auctions unless it has assurance of enactment of legislation to raise the statutory debt limit before the scheduled auctions Monday.  Apogee Enterprises Inc. said profit for the third quarter ending Dec. 2 will fall below the year-earlier results because of an after-tax charge of $1.9 million related to a project that was guaranteed by the company.  A year ago, the Minneapolis glass products and aluminum window maker earned $4 million, or 30 cents a share, on revenue of $114 million.  Apogee said the charge stems from a building supply contract in which the company guaranteed a contractor's performance.  Apogee said a subcontractor had severe cost overruns and was unable to fulfill the contract terms on its own, making it necessary for Apogee to advance cash to ensure completion of the project.  The company said its core businesses have performed well and it expects them to continue to do so in the remainder of the fiscal year.  Japan's production of cars, trucks and buses in September fell 4.1% from a year ago to 1,120,317 units because of a slip in exports, the Japan Automobile Manufacturers' Association said.  Domestic demand continues to grow, but its contribution to higher production was sapped in September by the estimated 2% fall in imports, accompanied by a growing tendency for Japanese manufacturers to build vehicles overseas, according to the association.  The association said domestic demand grew 8.8% in September.  Demand has been growing consistently under the encouragement of pro-consumption government policies, an association spokesman said.  He also said the introduction of a 3% consumption tax in April has helped sales.  The new tax, though a source of general resentment among Japanese taxpayers, replaced a higher commodities tax that applied to automobiles.  Japanese domestic motor-vehicle sales rose 12% in September, the Japan Automobile Dealers' Association said earlier this month.  The manufacturers' association will issue statistics on vehicle exports later this month.  Production of cars rose to 801,835 units in September, a 5.5% increase from a year earlier.  Midsized cars accounted for the greatest growth in units, rising 62,872 units to 134,550 units, or 88%.  Minicar output more than tripled.  Manufacturers produced 46,835 of the vehicles -- which have engines of 500 cubic centimeters or less -- an increase of 31,777 units.  Total truck production fell 22% from a year earlier to 315,546 units.  Minitruck production fell 13% to 94,243 units.  Bus production also slipped, by 49% from a year earlier to 2,936 units.  The association spokesman said bus production has declined since January, but couldn't offer an explanation for the fall.  Auto production for the first half of the fiscal year, which began in August, totaled 6,379,884 units, the association said.  Half-year production was up 3.4% compared with the same period a year earlier.  Stock of United Airlines parent UAL Corp. gyrated wildly yesterday amid speculation that one or more investors may challenge the UAL board's decision to remain independent instead of pursuing a buy-out or other transaction.  The board's decision, announced after the market closed Monday, initially prompted a severe sell-off in UAL shares, which at midday traded as low as $145 a share, down $33 a share, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  The deepening bloodbath for takeover-stock traders, who by then had seen UAL stock tumble 49% since Oct. 12, also triggered a marketwide sell-off that sent the Dow Jones Industrial Average down more than 80 points at 10:40 a.m.  But then steady, concentrated buying by Bear, Stearns & Co., which frequently buys stock for corporate raiders, took hold and steadied the fall in UAL, which eventually buoyed the entire market.  The industrial average closed down only 3.69 points at 2659.22.  Late in the afternoon, several big purchases by Bear, Stearns, particularly a block of 200,000 shares at 2:43 p.m. at $150 a share, triggered a buying spree that took UAL up more than 18 points in the final hour of trading.  UAL stock closed at $170 a share, down $8.375.  Volume was a tumultuous 4.9 million shares, or 22% of the 21.8 million UAL shares outstanding.  Traders estimated that Bear, Stearns bought more than 1 million shares.  The two most frequently rumored buyers, neither of whom would comment, were Coniston Partners, which battled the UAL board in 1987, and New York real estate developer Donald Trump, who recently made and withdrew an offer for American Airlines parent AMR Corp. However, one person familiar with UAL said the signs pointed to Coniston because Mr. Trump hasn't asked for permission to buy more than $15 million of stock under federal antitrust rules.  Takeover-stock traders, stung by their huge losses in UAL stock, remained eager for some action by an outside catalyst following the collapse Oct. 13 of a $300-a-share, $6.79 billion labor-management buy-out.  Their hope was that the catalyst would seek to oust the board in a solicitation of shareholder consents.  Baker, Nye Investments, a New York takeover-stock trader that owns UAL stock, wouldn't comment on reports the firm is considering seeking such a shareholder vote.  But partner Richard Nye said, "This is the most extraordinary failed transaction I've seen in 25 years in this business.  It would make sense for somebody to do it.  I have never seen a case of incompetence shared by so many participants."  In 1986, Baker, Nye waged a proxy fight for control of Leaseway Transportation Inc. that ultimately led to Leaseway's being sold.  Some traders pointed hopefully to earlier estimates by UAL's investment adviser, First Boston Corp., that recapitalizations could yield $245 to $280 a share.  But those would require pilots' cooperation.  Any investor who acquires UAL stock in an attempt to force a buy-out or recapitalization must deal with United's contentious unions.  The pilots are working under an expired contract, and the machinists contract expires next month.  That gives them enormous leverage, including the threat of a strike to block any buy-out or recapitalization attempt they oppose.  However, a catalyst like Coniston could seek shareholder support for a sale to a labor-management group at the last price discussed by that group before the board meeting Monday.  The pilots had been working on a buy-out bid between $225 and $240 a share, or $5.09 billion to $5.42 billion.  One person familiar with UAL said the unsettled labor situation and the uncertain world-wide financial markets contributed to the board's decision to avoid "rushing around selling the company at a bargain price," particularly since it accepted a $300-a-share offer just last month.  Even some takeover-stock traders said they couldn't quarrel with the board's logic.  But the board's decision prompted many to bail out of the stock yesterday.  "We had a lot of people who threw in the towel today," said Earl Ellis, a partner in Benjamin Jacobson & Sons, a specialist in trading UAL stock on the Big Board.  Another trader noted that many arbitrage firms are afraid to sell their UAL stock at the bottom, but already own so much they can't buy any more.  "This deal is like a Roach Motel," he said.  "They check in, but they can't check out."  But both the traders and the pilots remain interested in some transaction.  So too, according to many reports, is British Airways PLC, despite its public withdrawal from the buy-out.  The pilots might end up teaming up with their longtime adversaries, the machinists union, in a recapitalization.  The machinists are reviewing proposals they made in the past for recapitalizations that would pay a special shareholder dividend and give employees a minority stake.  The company rejected those past proposals.  It is unclear, however, if the machinists would support a majority stake, as the pilots want.  A machinist official said that would depend on how much in concessions machinists would have to give in return for the majority stake.  Some investors whose names were bandied about by traders as potential UAL stock buyers said they weren't buying.  "I'm not interested," said Dallas investor Harold Simmons.  A source close to Carl Icahn, a corporate raider who owns Trans World Airlines Inc., said he hasn't owned any UAL stock and isn't buying.  One person familiar with Texas billionaire Robert Bass said he isn't likely to make any hostile moves.  And a spokesman for Reliance Group Holdings Inc., which had held 7% of UAL before the first buy-out bid but later reduced its holdings below 5%, wouldn't comment.  Marvin Davis, whose $5.4 billion takeover bid originally put the nation's second-largest airline in play, is limited by a standstill agreement with UAL he signed in September.  The Los Angeles investor can't buy UAL stock, solicit shareholder consents or make a new offer unless he makes a formal offer of $300 a share or UAL accepts an offer below $300.  However, Mr. Davis could pressure the board by asking that the agreement be waived, or letting it be known that he has financing for an offer at a lower price.  Times Mirror Co. said third-quarter net income fell 13% to $70.1 million, or 54 cents a share, compared with net income of $81 million, or 62 cents a share, a year earlier.  The Los Angeles media concern said that the year-ago period included a $26.5 million gain from the sale of assets, primarily timberlands.  Revenue was $873.9 million, up 7.3% from $814.8 million.  Stronger results from the company's broadcast and cable television units and professional and textbook publishing divisions, plus increased advertising at the company's largest newspaper, the Los Angeles Times, offset advertising declines in the company's newspapers in the Eastern U.S., the company said.  "Looking ahead to the fourth quarter, the outlook for the newspaper group remains guarded, with no improvement yet seen in operating trends in our Eastern markets," said Robert F. Erburu, Times Mirror's chairman and chief executive.  Copper futures sold off sharply yesterday, influenced by declines in the stock market and dollar, and a rally in bonds.  December copper opened near Monday's close, tried to rally but failed, and then triggered stop-loss orders on its way down to settle at $1.1510 a pound, off 4.50 cents for the day.  Stop-loss orders are placed previously with instructions to execute them if the market hits a predetermined price.  William Kaiser, president of the Kaiser Financial Group in Chicago, said the decline was almost certainly influenced by the early sell-off in the stock market, which partly reflected a weakening economy.  He said the recent decline in copper stocks was misleading in the face of a slowdown in manufacturing.  Mr. Kaiser said traders could have picked up signals of an imminent price decline had they been watching the scrap metal markets, which became noticeably weaker two to three weeks ago.  But though a weakening economy implies reduced demand, Mr. Kaiser said that Third World copper-producing countries haven't any choice but to sell copper.  They might even step up sales in a falling market, he said, in an effort to maintain the flow of foreign exchange into their treasuries.  Technically, Mr. Kaiser noted that a lot of traders had bought into the market when the price was in the $1.24 to $1.26 range, thinking there was support at the $1.20 level.  When the market fell below that level on Monday and then yesterday couldn't climb above that level, traders started selling out their positions.  Betty Raptopoulos, senior metals analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities in New York, agreed that most of the selling was of a technical nature.  She said the market hit the $1.18 level at around 10 a.m. EDT where it encountered a large number of stop-loss orders.  More stop-loss orders were touched off all the way down to below $1.14, where modest buying was attracted.  Ms. Raptopoulos said the settling of strikes in Canada and Mexico will have little effect on supplies of copper until early next year.  She thinks the next area of support for copper is in the $1.09 to $1.10 range.  "I believe that as soon as the selling abates somewhat we could see a rally back to the $1.20 region," she added.  She thinks a recovery in the stock market would help copper rebound as well.  She noted that the preliminary estimate of the third-quarter gross national product is due out tomorrow and is expected to be up about 2.5% to 3%.  "If the number is a little better, then copper will respond positively, if it is worse then more selling could ensue," she predicted.  Ms. Raptopoulos noted that relating economic numbers to specific market activity is tricky.  Yesterday, for example, "the durable goods numbers came out for September and the number was down only 0.1%," she said.  "However, if you exclude defense-related orders then durable goods were down 3.9%.  I believe that number reflects a slowing economy."  She said copper traders will also be looking toward the release of the index of leading economic indicators next Tuesday.  However, David Threlkeld, president of Threlkeld & Co., an international metals company, noted that so far this year copper consumption is way ahead of the same period of 1988, and that projected production is below last year.  Mr. Threlkeld said the copper market seems to be anticipating a recession in three months, with declining use being the result.  "But," he added, "we have had that exact same perception six times in the last six years."  He noted that currently the ratio of available copper to consumption is about 3.5 weeks.  He said the normal ratio is five to six weeks.  According to Mr. Threlkeld, the bottleneck in copper production isn't at the mines but at the copper refineries.  "It takes three months to turn copper concentrate into cathodes," he said.  If there isn't a recession, he said, "we will be out of copper by the end of March.  If there is a recession that will change the statistical situation."  He thinks that without a recession copper prices could exceed a high of $1.65 a pound, which was reached last year.  In the past Mr. Threlkeld has been known to have substantial long positionsthat is, he had bought copper futures in anticipation of rising prices -- in the copper futures market.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: The attitude was "wait-and-see" in crude oil futures yesterday in trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  Prices for the U.S. benchmark West Texas Intermediate crude remained locked in a fairly narrow range before ending the session four cents lower at $19.72 a barrel for December delivery.  Several analysts and brokers said the petroleum market was ready to rally after two days of price declines from profit-taking.  But an early 80-point drop in the Dow Jones Industrial Average stopped the crude rally cold.  The industrial average recovered to close only 3.69 points lower, but petroleum futures never shook off the chill.  Most market participants said they were looking to this week's inventory statistics from the American Petroleum Institute to give the market some direction.  The report isn't generally available until late on Tuesdays.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices inched upward in mostly lackluster trading.  December gold was up $3.20 an ounce at $373.40; December silver gained 5.7 cents to $5.1950 an ounce.  January platinum rose $2.30 an ounce to $488.60.  Mr. Kaiser said there were no fundamental factors moving these markets.  He noted that two weeks ago there were rumors of Soviet sales of precious metals to finance grain purchases, but the sales don't seem to have materialized.  Ms. Raptopoulos thought yesterday's price action reflected weakness in the stock market and the dollar.  "Gold still acts as a haven when uncertainty prevails in the financial markets as it did" yesterday, she said.  Mr. Kaiser noted that gold was more than 71 times the price of silver at the close yesterday, which is historically high.  "The high ratio reflects the fact that silver is still regarded as about a half-industrial metal and its price lagging relative to gold says that traders are expecting a weakening economy," he said.  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Prices closed lower after trading in relatively narrow ranges because of strong selling in the cash market and continued favorable harvest weather.  The sale to the Chinese government of 330,000 metric tons of wheat under the government's export enhancement program was announced after the close of trading Monday, but the sale was expected and failed to buoy prices yesterday, said Dale Gustafson, a futures analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. in Chicago.  As for other export customers, the Soviet Union isn't expected to be back buying U.S. corn in significant amounts until early next year, he said.  A number of commercial grain users buttressed that opinion yesterday by buying certain corn options for delivery in March, indicating to analysts that the commercial companies would use the options to hedge against expected corn sales in next year's first quarter.  COCOA: Futures at first continued the rally begun on Monday, but then faltered and closed lower.  The December contract opened just under Monday's close, triggered some previously placed buy orders just above $1,030 a metric ton, pushing the price to $1,040, and then encountered heavy selling by traders who buy and sell for their own accounts and by commercial interests.  The contract settled at $1,014 a ton, off $13.  Robert Hafer, senior commodities analyst at Kaiser Financial Group, said Monday's rally continued yesterday for only about 20 minutes after the opening.  He said even though there was arbitrage buying in New York because of the weak dollar, cocoa fell to relentless pressure from bearish traders.  But he noted that speculators apparently don't believe there is much more of a decline in store for cocoa.  The December contract reached its life-of-contract low of $975 a ton on Oct. 11; its lifetime high was $1,735, set in 1988, and its recent high was $1,368, set in early August.  The last time cocoa traded at prices as low as currently was in 1974.  But while further modest declines might be ahead, Mr. Hafer said it would be difficult to get through resistance levels just above yesterday's high. 